
--**--**--
 medicines; doctors would be called in when people were well; the Royal
 Humane Society would be rooted out like a horde of assassins. Yet we
 never speculate as to whether the conversational pessimist will
 strengthen or disorganize society; for we are convinced that theories
 do not matter.
 
 This was certainly not the idea of those who introduced our freedom.
 When the old Liberals removed the gags from all the heresies, their
 idea was that religious and philosophical discoveries might thus be
 made. Their view was that cosmic truth was so important that every one
 ought to bear independent testimony.  The modern idea is that cosmic
 truth is so unimportant that it cannot matter what any one says. The
 former freed inquiry as men loose a noble hound; the latter frees
 inquiry as men fling back into the sea a fish unfit for eating. Never
 has there been so little discussion about the nature of men as now,
 when, for the first time, any one can discuss it.  The old restriction
 meant that only the orthodox were allowed to discuss religion. Modern
 liberty means that nobody is allowed to discuss it. Good taste, the
 last and vilest of human superstitions, has succeeded in silencing us
 where all the rest have failed. Sixty years ago it was bad taste to be
 an avowed atheist. Then came the Bradlaughites, the last religious men,
 the last men who cared about God; but they could not alter it.  It is
 still bad taste to be an avowed atheist.  But their agony has achieved
 just his--that now it is equally bad taste to be an avowed Christian.
 Emancipation has only locked the saint in the same tower of silence as
 the heresiarch.  Then we talk about Lord Anglesey and the weather, and
 call it the complete liberty of all the creeds.
--**--**--
 of small men in politics, so it has brought forth a race of small men
 in the arts.  Our modern politicians claim the colossal license of
 Caesar and the Superman, claim that they are too practical to be pure
 and too patriotic to be moral; but the upshot of it all is that a
 mediocrity is Chancellor of the Exchequer. Our new artistic
 philosophers call for the same moral license, for a freedom to wreck
 heaven and earth with their energy; but the upshot of it all is that a
 mediocrity is Poet Laureate. I do not say that there are no stronger
 men than these; but will any one say that there are any men stronger
 than those men of old who were dominated by their philosophy and
 steeped in their religion? Whether bondage be better than freedom may
 be discussed. But that their bondage came to more than our freedom it
 will be difficult for any one to deny.
 
 The theory of the unmorality of art has established itself firmly in
 the strictly artistic classes.  They are free to produce anything they
 like.  They are free to write a "Paradise Lost" in which Satan shall
 conquer God.  They are free to write a "Divine Comedy" in which heaven
 shall be under the floor of hell. And what have they done?  Have they
 produced in their universality anything grander or more beautiful than
 the things uttered by the fierce Ghibbeline Catholic, by the rigid
 Puritan schoolmaster? We know that they have produced only a few
 roundels. Milton does not merely beat them at his piety, he beats them
 at their own irreverence.  In all their little books of verse you will
 not find a finer defiance of God than Satan's. Nor will you find the
 grandeur of paganism felt as that fiery Christian felt it who described
--**--**--
 the old priests forced a statement on mankind, at least they previously
 took some trouble to make it lucid. It has been left for the modern
 mobs of Anglicans and Nonconformists to persecute for a doctrine
 without even stating it.
 
 For these reasons, and for many more, I for one have come to believe in
 going back to fundamentals.  Such is the general idea of this book.  I
 wish to deal with my most distinguished contemporaries, not personally
 or in a merely literary manner, but in relation to the real body of
 doctrine which they teach. I am not concerned with Mr. Rudyard Kipling
 as a vivid artist or a vigorous personality; I am concerned with him as
 a Heretic--that is to say, a man whose view of things has the hardihood
 to differ from mine.  I am not concerned with Mr. Bernard Shaw as one
 of the most brilliant and one of the most honest men alive; I am
 concerned with him as a Heretic--that is to say, a man whose philosophy
 is quite solid, quite coherent, and quite wrong. I revert to the
 doctrinal methods of the thirteenth century, inspired by the general
 hope of getting something done.
 
 Suppose that a great commotion arises in the street about something,
 let us say a lamp-post, which many influential persons desire to pull
 down.  A grey-clad monk, who is the spirit of the Middle Ages, is
 approached upon the matter, and begins to say, in the arid manner of
 the Schoolmen, "Let us first of all consider, my brethren, the value of
 Light.  If Light be in itself good--" At this point he is somewhat
 excusably knocked down.  All the people make a rush for the lamp-post,
 the lamp-post is down in ten minutes, and they go about congratulating
--**--**--
 body and substance of the perfect man; it is still flesh, but it is
 diseased. It is the drunkard's liver of the New Testament that is
 marred for us, which we take in remembrance of him.
 
 Now, it is this great gap in modern ethics, the absence of vivid
 pictures of purity and spiritual triumph, which lies at the back of the
 real objection felt by so many sane men to the realistic literature of
 the nineteenth century.  If any ordinary man ever said that he was
 horrified by the subjects discussed in Ibsen or Maupassant, or by the
 plain language in which they are spoken of, that ordinary man was
 lying.  The average conversation of average men throughout the whole of
 modern civilization in every class or trade is such as Zola would never
 dream of printing. Nor is the habit of writing thus of these things a
 new habit. On the contrary, it is the Victorian prudery and silence
 which is new still, though it is already dying.  The tradition of
 calling a spade a spade starts very early in our literature and comes
 down very late.  But the truth is that the ordinary honest man,
 whatever vague account he may have given of his feelings, was not
 either disgusted or even annoyed at the candour of the moderns. What
 disgusted him, and very justly, was not the presence of a clear
 realism, but the absence of a clear idealism. Strong and genuine
 religious sentiment has never had any objection to realism; on the
 contrary, religion was the realistic thing, the brutal thing, the thing
 that called names.  This is the great difference between some recent
 developments of Nonconformity and the great Puritanism of the
 seventeenth century.  It was the whole point of the Puritans that they
--**--**--
 plenty of wholesome people in Ibsen, plenty of good people, plenty of
 happy people, plenty of examples of men acting wisely and things ending
 well.  That is not my meaning. My meaning is that Ibsen has throughout,
 and does not disguise, a certain vagueness and a changing attitude as
 well as a doubting attitude towards what is really wisdom and virtue in
 this life--a vagueness which contrasts very remarkably with the
 decisiveness with which he pounces on something which he perceives to
 be a root of evil, some convention, some deception, some ignorance. We
 know that the hero of GHOSTS is mad, and we know why he is mad. We do
 also know that Dr. Stockman is sane; but we do not know why he is sane.
 Ibsen does not profess to know how virtue and happiness are brought
 about, in the sense that he professes to know how our modern sexual
 tragedies are brought about. Falsehood works ruin in THE PILLARS OF
 SOCIETY, but truth works equal ruin in THE WILD DUCK.  There are no
 cardinal virtues of Ibsenism. There is no ideal man of Ibsen.  All this
 is not only admitted, but vaunted in the most valuable and thoughtful
 of all the eulogies upon Ibsen, Mr. Bernard Shaw's QUINTESSENCE OF
 IBSENISM. Mr. Shaw sums up Ibsen's teaching in the phrase, "The golden
 rule is that there is no golden rule."  In his eyes this absence of an
 enduring and positive ideal, this absence of a permanent key to virtue,
 is the one great Ibsen merit. I am not discussing now with any fullness
 whether this is so or not. All I venture to point out, with an
 increased firmness, is that this omission, good or bad, does leave us
 face to face with the problem of a human consciousness filled with very
--**--**--
 And they cover this incapacity with a general claim to be, in specific
 cases, regarded as "experts", a claim "proper enough in a hairdresser
 or a fashionable physician, but indecent in a philosopher or a man of
 science." But in spite of the refreshing rationality with which Mr.
 Wells has indicated this, it must also be said that he himself has
 fallen into the same enormous modern error.  In the opening pages of
 that excellent book MANKIND IN THE MAKING, he dismisses the ideals of
 art, religion, abstract morality, and the rest, and says that he is
 going to consider men in their chief function, the function of
 parenthood. He is going to discuss life as a "tissue of births."  He is
 not going to ask what will produce satisfactory saints or satisfactory
 heroes, but what will produce satisfactory fathers and mothers.  The
 whole is set forward so sensibly that it is a few moments at least
 before the reader realises that it is another example of unconscious
 shirking.  What is the good of begetting a man until we have settled
 what is the good of being a man? You are merely handing on to him a
 problem you dare not settle yourself. It is as if a man were asked,
 "What is the use of a hammer?" and answered, "To make hammers"; and
 when asked, "And of those hammers, what is the use?" answered, "To make
 hammers again". Just as such a man would be perpetually putting off the
 question of the ultimate use of carpentry, so Mr. Wells and all the
 rest of us are by these phrases successfully putting off the question
 of the ultimate value of the human life.
 
 The case of the general talk of "progress" is, indeed, an extreme one.
 As enunciated today, "progress" is simply a comparative of which we
--**--**--
 has certainly proved himself prosaic.
 
 We might, no doubt, find it a nuisance to count all the blades of grass
 or all the leaves of the trees; but this would not be because of our
 boldness or gaiety, but because of our lack of boldness and gaiety. The
 bore would go onward, bold and gay, and find the blades of grass as
 splendid as the swords of an army.  The bore is stronger and more
 joyous than we are; he is a demigod--nay, he is a god. For it is the
 gods who do not tire of the iteration of things; to them the nightfall
 is always new, and the last rose as red as the first.
 
 The sense that everything is poetical is a thing solid and absolute; it
 is not a mere matter of phraseology or persuasion.  It is not merely
 true, it is ascertainable.  Men may be challenged to deny it; men may
 be challenged to mention anything that is not a matter of poetry. I
 remember a long time ago a sensible sub-editor coming up to me with a
 book in his hand, called "Mr. Smith," or "The Smith Family," or some
 such thing.  He said, "Well, you won't get any of your damned mysticism
 out of this," or words to that effect.  I am happy to say that I
 undeceived him; but the victory was too obvious and easy. In most cases
 the name is unpoetical, although the fact is poetical. In the case of
 Smith, the name is so poetical that it must be an arduous and heroic
 matter for the man to live up to it. The name of Smith is the name of
 the one trade that even kings respected, it could claim half the glory
 of that arma virumque which all epics acclaimed.  The spirit of the
--**--**--
 by-product of language. But at least he has been among the few who saw
 the divine parentage of these things, and knew that where there is
 smoke there is fire--that is, that wherever there is the foulest of
 things, there also is the purest. Above all, he has had something to
 say, a definite view of things to utter, and that always means that a
 man is fearless and faces everything. For the moment we have a view of
 the universe, we possess it.
 
 Now, the message of Rudyard Kipling, that upon which he has really
 concentrated, is the only thing worth worrying about in him or in any
 other man.  He has often written bad poetry, like Wordsworth.  He has
 often said silly things, like Plato. He has often given way to mere
 political hysteria, like Gladstone. But no one can reasonably doubt
 that he means steadily and sincerely to say something, and the only
 serious question is, What is that which he has tried to say?  Perhaps
 the best way of stating this fairly will be to begin with that element
 which has been most insisted by himself and by his opponents--I mean
 his interest in militarism. But when we are seeking for the real merits
 of a man it is unwise to go to his enemies, and much more foolish to go
 to himself.
 
 Now, Mr. Kipling is certainly wrong in his worship of militarism, but
 his opponents are, generally speaking, quite as wrong as he. The evil
 of militarism is not that it shows certain men to be fierce and haughty
 and excessively warlike.  The evil of militarism is that it shows most
 men to be tame and timid and excessively peaceable. The professional
 soldier gains more and more power as the general courage of a community
--**--**--
 attaching himself to any cause or community finally and tragically; for
 all finality must be tragic.  He admires England, but he does not love
 her; for we admire things with reasons, but love them without reasons.
 He admires England because she is strong, not because she is English.
 There is no harshness in saying this, for, to do him justice, he avows
 it with his usual picturesque candour.  In a very interesting poem, he
 says that--
 
   "If England was what England seems"
 
 --that is, weak and inefficient; if England were not what (as he
 believes) she is--that is, powerful and practical--
 
   "How quick we'd chuck 'er! But she ain't!"
 
 He admits, that is, that his devotion is the result of a criticism, and
 this is quite enough to put it in another category altogether from the
 patriotism of the Boers, whom he hounded down in South Africa. In
 speaking of the really patriotic peoples, such as the Irish, he has
 some difficulty in keeping a shrill irritation out of his language. The
 frame of mind which he really describes with beauty and nobility is the
 frame of mind of the cosmopolitan man who has seen men and cities.
 
   "For to admire and for to see,
    For to be'old this world so wide."
 
 He is a perfect master of that light melancholy with which a man looks
 back on having been the citizen of many communities, of that light
 melancholy with which a man looks back on having been the lover of many
 women.  He is the philanderer of the nations. But a man may have learnt
 much about women in flirtations, and still be ignorant of first love; a
 man may have known as many lands as Ulysses, and still be ignorant of
 patriotism.
 
 Mr. Rudyard Kipling has asked in a celebrated epigram what they can
--**--**--
 makes the world smaller; it is only the microscope that makes it
 larger.  Before long the world will be cloven with a war between the
 telescopists and the microscopists. The first study large things and
 live in a small world; the second study small things and live in a
 large world.  It is inspiriting without doubt to whizz in a motor-car
 round the earth, to feel Arabia as a whirl of sand or China as a flash
 of rice-fields. But Arabia is not a whirl of sand and China is not a
 flash of rice-fields. They are ancient civilizations with strange
 virtues buried like treasures. If we wish to understand them it must
 not be as tourists or inquirers, it must be with the loyalty of
 children and the great patience of poets. To conquer these places is to
 lose them.  The man standing in his own kitchen-garden, with fairyland
 opening at the gate, is the man with large ideas.  His mind creates
 distance; the motor-car stupidly destroys it.  Moderns think of the
 earth as a globe, as something one can easily get round, the spirit of
 a schoolmistress. This is shown in the odd mistake perpetually made
 about Cecil Rhodes. His enemies say that he may have had large ideas,
 but he was a bad man. His friends say that he may have been a bad man,
 but he certainly had large ideas.  The truth is that he was not a man
 essentially bad, he was a man of much geniality and many good
 intentions, but a man with singularly small views.  There is nothing
 large about painting the map red; it is an innocent game for children.
 It is just as easy to think in continents as to think in cobble-stones.
 The difficulty comes in when we seek to know the substance of either of
--**--**--
 plain men say great things on great occasions. He has only to drift in
 the large loose notions common to all artists of the second rank, and
 people will say that business men have the biggest ideals after all.
 All his schemes have ended in smoke; he has touched nothing that he did
 not confuse. About his figure there is a Celtic pathos; like the Gaels
 in Matthew Arnold's quotation, "he went forth to battle, but he always
 fell." He is a mountain of proposals, a mountain of failures; but still
 a mountain.  And a mountain is always romantic.
 
 There is another man in the modern world who might be called the
 antithesis of Mr. Chamberlain in every point, who is also a standing
 monument of the advantage of being misunderstood. Mr. Bernard Shaw is
 always represented by those who disagree with him, and, I fear, also
 (if such exist) by those who agree with him, as a capering humorist, a
 dazzling acrobat, a quick-change artist. It is said that he cannot be
 taken seriously, that he will defend anything or attack anything, that
 he will do anything to startle and amuse. All this is not only untrue,
 but it is, glaringly, the opposite of the truth; it is as wild as to
 say that Dickens had not the boisterous masculinity of Jane Austen.
 The whole force and triumph of Mr. Bernard Shaw lie in the fact that he
 is a thoroughly consistent man. So far from his power consisting in
 jumping through hoops or standing on his head, his power consists in
 holding his own fortress night and day. He puts the Shaw test rapidly
 and rigorously to everything that happens in heaven or earth.  His
 standard never varies. The thing which weak-minded revolutionists and
 weak-minded Conservatives really hate (and fear) in him, is exactly
--**--**--
 sometimes calls black white, it certainly calls yellow white and green
 white and reddish-brown white. We call wine "white wine" which is as
 yellow as a Blue-coat boy's legs. We call grapes "white grapes" which
 are manifestly pale green. We give to the European, whose complexion is
 a sort of pink drab, the horrible title of a "white man"--a picture
 more blood-curdling than any spectre in Poe.
 
 Now, it is undoubtedly true that if a man asked a waiter in a
 restaurant for a bottle of yellow wine and some greenish-yellow grapes,
 the waiter would think him mad.  It is undoubtedly true that if a
 Government official, reporting on the Europeans in Burmah, said, "There
 are only two thousand pinkish men here" he would be accused of cracking
 jokes, and kicked out of his post.  But it is equally obvious that both
 men would have come to grief through telling the strict truth. That too
 truthful man in the restaurant; that too truthful man in Burmah, is Mr.
 Bernard Shaw.  He appears eccentric and grotesque because he will not
 accept the general belief that white is yellow. He has based all his
 brilliancy and solidity upon the hackneyed, but yet forgotten, fact
 that truth is stranger than fiction. Truth, of course, must of
 necessity be stranger than fiction, for we have made fiction to suit
 ourselves.
 
 So much then a reasonable appreciation will find in Mr. Shaw to be
 bracing and excellent.  He claims to see things as they are; and some
 things, at any rate, he does see as they are, which the whole of our
 civilization does not see at all. But in Mr. Shaw's realism there is
 something lacking, and that thing which is lacking is serious.
 
 Mr. Shaw's old and recognized philosophy was that powerfully presented
--**--**--
 that every face in the street has the incredible unexpectedness of a
 fairy-tale. The thing which prevents a man from realizing this is not
 any clear-sightedness or experience, it is simply a habit of pedantic
 and fastidious comparisons between one thing and another.  Mr. Shaw, on
 the practical side perhaps the most humane man alive, is in this sense
 inhumane. He has even been infected to some extent with the primary
 intellectual weakness of his new master, Nietzsche, the strange notion
 that the greater and stronger a man was the more he would despise other
 things.  The greater and stronger a man is the more he would be
 inclined to prostrate himself before a periwinkle. That Mr. Shaw keeps
 a lifted head and a contemptuous face before the colossal panorama of
 empires and civilizations, this does not in itself convince one that he
 sees things as they are. I should be most effectively convinced that he
 did if I found him staring with religious astonishment at his own feet.
 "What are those two beautiful and industrious beings," I can imagine
 him murmuring to himself, "whom I see everywhere, serving me I know not
 why? What fairy godmother bade them come trotting out of elfland when I
 was born?  What god of the borderland, what barbaric god of legs, must
 I propitiate with fire and wine, lest they run away with me?"
 
 The truth is, that all genuine appreciation rests on a certain mystery
 of humility and almost of darkness.  The man who said, "Blessed is he
 that expecteth nothing, for he shall not be disappointed," put the
 eulogy quite inadequately and even falsely.  The truth "Blessed is he
 that expecteth nothing, for he shall be gloriously surprised." The man
 who expects nothing sees redder roses than common men can see, and
--**--**--
 never was a man in love who did not declare also that he ought not to
 have it.  The whole secret of the practical success of Christendom lies
 in the Christian humility, however imperfectly fulfilled. For with the
 removal of all question of merit or payment, the soul is suddenly
 released for incredible voyages.  If we ask a sane man how much he
 merits, his mind shrinks instinctively and instantaneously. It is
 doubtful whether he merits six feet of earth. But if you ask him what
 he can conquer--he can conquer the stars. Thus comes the thing called
 Romance, a purely Christian product. A man cannot deserve adventures;
 he cannot earn dragons and hippogriffs. The mediaeval Europe which
 asserted humility gained Romance; the civilization which gained Romance
 has gained the habitable globe. How different the Pagan and Stoical
 feeling was from this has been admirably expressed in a famous
 quotation.  Addison makes the great Stoic say--
 
   "'Tis not in mortals to command success;
    But we'll do more, Sempronius, we'll deserve it."
 
 But the spirit of Romance and Christendom, the spirit which is in every
 lover, the spirit which has bestridden the earth with European
 adventure, is quite opposite.  'Tis not in mortals to deserve success.
 But we'll do more, Sempronius; we'll obtain it.
 
 And this gay humility, this holding of ourselves lightly and yet ready
 for an infinity of unmerited triumphs, this secret is so simple that
 every one has supposed that it must be something quite sinister and
 mysterious. Humility is so practical a virtue that men think it must be
 a vice. Humility is so successful that it is mistaken for pride. It is
 mistaken for it all the more easily because it generally goes with a
 certain simple love of splendour which amounts to vanity. Humility will
--**--**--
 great many other things that are vital and vivid, difficult to
 illustrate by examples, but if I were asked for an example of it, I
 should have no difficulty about which example to begin with. The most
 interesting thing about Mr. H. G. Wells is that he is the only one of
 his many brilliant contemporaries who has not stopped growing.  One can
 lie awake at night and hear him grow. Of this growth the most evident
 manifestation is indeed a gradual change of opinions; but it is no mere
 change of opinions. It is not a perpetual leaping from one position to
 another like that of Mr. George Moore.  It is a quite continuous
 advance along a quite solid road in a quite definable direction.  But
 the chief proof that it is not a piece of fickleness and vanity is the
 fact that it has been upon the whole in advance from more startling
 opinions to more humdrum opinions.  It has been even in some sense an
 advance from unconventional opinions to conventional opinions. This
 fact fixes Mr. Wells's honesty and proves him to be no poseur. Mr.
 Wells once held that the upper classes and the lower classes would be
 so much differentiated in the future that one class would eat the
 other.  Certainly no paradoxical charlatan who had once found arguments
 for so startling a view would ever have deserted it except for
 something yet more startling.  Mr. Wells has deserted it in favour of
 the blameless belief that both classes will be ultimately subordinated
 or assimilated to a sort of scientific middle class, a class of
 engineers.  He has abandoned the sensational theory with the same
 honourable gravity and simplicity with which he adopted it. Then he
 thought it was true; now he thinks it is not true. He has come to the
--**--**--
 first law of health that our necessities should not be accepted as
 necessities; they should be accepted as luxuries. Let us, then, be
 careful about the small things, such as a scratch or a slight illness,
 or anything that can be managed with care. But in the name of all
 sanity, let us be careless about the important things, such as
 marriage, or the fountain of our very life will fail.
 
 Mr. Wells, however, is not quite clear enough of the narrower
 scientific outlook to see that there are some things which actually
 ought not to be scientific.  He is still slightly affected with the
 great scientific fallacy; I mean the habit of beginning not with the
 human soul, which is the first thing a man learns about, but with some
 such thing as protoplasm, which is about the last. The one defect in
 his splendid mental equipment is that he does not sufficiently allow
 for the stuff or material of men. In his new Utopia he says, for
 instance, that a chief point of the Utopia will be a disbelief in
 original sin.  If he had begun with the human soul--that is, if he had
 begun on himself--he would have found original sin almost the first
 thing to be believed in. He would have found, to put the matter
 shortly, that a permanent possibility of selfishness arises from the
 mere fact of having a self, and not from any accidents of education or
 ill-treatment. And the weakness of all Utopias is this, that they take
 the greatest difficulty of man and assume it to be overcome, and then
 give an elaborate account of the overcoming of the smaller ones. They
 first assume that no man will want more than his share, and then are
 very ingenious in explaining whether his share will be delivered by
--**--**--
 it moves, we say, without need of other words, that there are things
 that do not move. And even in the act of saying that things change, we
 say that there is something unchangeable.
 
 But certainly the best example of Mr. Wells's fallacy can be found in
 the example which he himself chooses.  It is quite true that we see a
 dim light which, compared with a darker thing, is light, but which,
 compared with a stronger light, is darkness. But the quality of light
 remains the same thing, or else we should not call it a stronger light
 or recognize it as such. If the character of light were not fixed in
 the mind, we should be quite as likely to call a denser shadow a
 stronger light, or vice versa If the character of light became even for
 an instant unfixed, if it became even by a hair's-breadth doubtful, if,
 for example, there crept into our idea of light some vague idea of
 blueness, then in that flash we have become doubtful whether the new
 light has more light or less.  In brief, the progress may be as varying
 as a cloud, but the direction must be as rigid as a French road. North
 and South are relative in the sense that I am North of Bournemouth and
 South of Spitzbergen.  But if there be any doubt of the position of the
 North Pole, there is in equal degree a doubt of whether I am South of
 Spitzbergen at all.  The absolute idea of light may be practically
 unattainable.  We may not be able to procure pure light. We may not be
 able to get to the North Pole.  But because the North Pole is
 unattainable, it does not follow that it is indefinable. And it is only
--**--**--
 before in literature; but I have little doubt that the psychological
 substance of it existed in fact.  I have little doubt that the giant
 whom Jack killed did regard himself as the Superman. It is likely
 enough that he considered Jack a narrow and parochial person who wished
 to frustrate a great forward movement of the life-force. If (as not
 unfrequently was the case) he happened to have two heads, he would
 point out the elementary maxim which declares them to be better than
 one.  He would enlarge on the subtle modernity of such an equipment,
 enabling a giant to look at a subject from two points of view, or to
 correct himself with promptitude. But Jack was the champion of the
 enduring human standards, of the principle of one man one head and one
 man one conscience, of the single head and the single heart and the
 single eye. Jack was quite unimpressed by the question of whether the
 giant was a particularly gigantic giant.  All he wished to know was
 whether he was a good giant--that is, a giant who was any good to us.
 What were the giant's religious views; what his views on politics and
 the duties of the citizen?  Was he fond of children--or fond of them
 only in a dark and sinister sense?  To use a fine phrase for emotional
 sanity, was his heart in the right place? Jack had sometimes to cut him
 up with a sword in order to find out. The old and correct story of Jack
 the Giant-Killer is simply the whole story of man; if it were
 understood we should need no Bibles or histories. But the modern world
 in particular does not seem to understand it at all. The modern world,
 like Mr. Wells is on the side of the giants; the safest place, and
--**--**--
 appear to many to have collected all that is dull in them. All the
 colours mixed together in purity ought to make a perfect white. Mixed
 together on any human paint-box, they make a thing like mud, and a
 thing very like many new religions.  Such a blend is often something
 much worse than any one creed taken separately, even the creed of the
 Thugs. The error arises from the difficulty of detecting what is really
 the good part and what is really the bad part of any given religion.
 And this pathos falls rather heavily on those persons who have the
 misfortune to think of some religion or other, that the parts commonly
 counted good are bad, and the parts commonly counted bad are good.
 
 It is tragic to admire and honestly admire a human group, but to admire
 it in a photographic negative.  It is difficult to congratulate all
 their whites on being black and all their blacks on their whiteness.
 This will often happen to us in connection with human religions. Take
 two institutions which bear witness to the religious energy of the
 nineteenth century.  Take the Salvation Army and the philosophy of
 Auguste Comte.
 
 The usual verdict of educated people on the Salvation Army is expressed
 in some such words as these:  "I have no doubt they do a great deal of
 good, but they do it in a vulgar and profane style; their aims are
 excellent, but their methods are wrong." To me, unfortunately, the
 precise reverse of this appears to be the truth.  I do not know whether
 the aims of the Salvation Army are excellent, but I am quite sure their
 methods are admirable. Their methods are the methods of all intense and
 hearty religions; they are popular like all religion, military like all
--**--**--
 would have been converted, not by the Comtist philosophy, but by the
 Comtist calendar.  By discouraging what they conceive to be the
 weakness of their master, the English Positivists have broken the
 strength of their religion.  A man who has faith must be prepared not
 only to be a martyr, but to be a fool. It is absurd to say that a man
 is ready to toil and die for his convictions when he is not even ready
 to wear a wreath round his head for them. I myself, to take a corpus
 vile, am very certain that I would not read the works of Comte through
 for any consideration whatever. But I can easily imagine myself with
 the greatest enthusiasm lighting a bonfire on Darwin Day.
 
 That splendid effort failed, and nothing in the style of it has
 succeeded. There has been no rationalist festival, no rationalist
 ecstasy. Men are still in black for the death of God.  When
 Christianity was heavily bombarded in the last century upon no point
 was it more persistently and brilliantly attacked than upon that of its
 alleged enmity to human joy. Shelley and Swinburne and all their armies
 have passed again and again over the ground, but they have not altered
 it.  They have not set up a single new trophy or ensign for the world's
 merriment to rally to. They have not given a name or a new occasion of
 gaiety. Mr. Swinburne does not hang up his stocking on the eve of the
 birthday of Victor Hugo.  Mr. William Archer does not sing carols
 descriptive of the infancy of Ibsen outside people's doors in the snow.
 In the round of our rational and mournful year one festival remains out
 of all those ancient gaieties that once covered the whole earth.
--**--**--
 something natural; something, that is, that he ought not to be without;
 something that he may find it difficult to reconcile himself to being
 without.  The man may not be seduced who has seen the ecstasy of being
 ecstatic; it is more dazzling to catch a glimpse of the ecstasy of
 being ordinary. If there were a magic ointment, and we took it to a
 strong man, and said, "This will enable you to jump off the Monument,"
 doubtless he would jump off the Monument, but he would not jump off the
 Monument all day long to the delight of the City. But if we took it to
 a blind man, saying, "This will enable you to see," he would be under a
 heavier temptation.  It would be hard for him not to rub it on his eyes
 whenever he heard the hoof of a noble horse or the birds singing at
 daybreak.  It is easy to deny one's self festivity; it is difficult to
 deny one's self normality. Hence comes the fact which every doctor
 knows, that it is often perilous to give alcohol to the sick even when
 they need it. I need hardly say that I do not mean that I think the
 giving of alcohol to the sick for stimulus is necessarily
 unjustifiable. But I do mean that giving it to the healthy for fun is
 the proper use of it, and a great deal more consistent with health.
 
 The sound rule in the matter would appear to be like many other sound
 rules--a paradox.  Drink because you are happy, but never because you
 are miserable.  Never drink when you are wretched without it, or you
 will be like the grey-faced gin-drinker in the slum; but drink when you
 would be happy without it, and you will be like the laughing peasant of
--**--**--
    He knows about it all--he knows--he knows."
 
 A Christian thinker such as Augustine or Dante would object to this
 because it ignores free-will, which is the valour and dignity of the
 soul. The quarrel of the highest Christianity with this scepticism is
 not in the least that the scepticism denies the existence of God; it is
 that it denies the existence of man.
 
 In this cult of the pessimistic pleasure-seeker the Rubaiyat stands
 first in our time; but it does not stand alone. Many of the most
 brilliant intellects of our time have urged us to the same
 self-conscious snatching at a rare delight. Walter Pater said that we
 were all under sentence of death, and the only course was to enjoy
 exquisite moments simply for those moments' sake.  The same lesson was
 taught by the very powerful and very desolate philosophy of Oscar
 Wilde. It is the carpe diem religion; but the carpe diem religion is
 not the religion of happy people, but of very unhappy people. Great joy
 does, not gather the rosebuds while it may; its eyes are fixed on the
 immortal rose which Dante saw. Great joy has in it the sense of
 immortality; the very splendour of youth is the sense that it has all
 space to stretch its legs in. In all great comic literature, in
 "Tristram Shandy" or "Pickwick", there is this sense of space and
 incorruptibility; we feel the characters are deathless people in an
 endless tale.
 
 It is true enough, of course, that a pungent happiness comes chiefly in
 certain passing moments; but it is not true that we should think of
 them as passing, or enjoy them simply "for those moments' sake." To do
 this is to rationalize the happiness, and therefore to destroy it.
 Happiness is a mystery like religion, and should never be rationalized.
--**--**--
 or Tolstoy are much livelier company; for, though the surrender of
 strong drink and such luxuries may strike us as an idle negation, it
 may leave a man with innumerable natural pleasures, and, above all,
 with man's natural power of happiness. Thoreau could enjoy the sunrise
 without a cup of coffee.  If Tolstoy cannot admire marriage, at least
 he is healthy enough to admire mud. Nature can be enjoyed without even
 the most natural luxuries. A good bush needs no wine.  But neither
 nature nor wine nor anything else can be enjoyed if we have the wrong
 attitude towards happiness, and Omar (or Fitzgerald) did have the wrong
 attitude towards happiness. He and those he has influenced do not see
 that if we are to be truly gay, we must believe that there is some
 eternal gaiety in the nature of things. We cannot enjoy thoroughly even
 a pas-de-quatre at a subscription dance unless we believe that the
 stars are dancing to the same tune.  No one can be really hilarious but
 the serious man.  "Wine," says the Scripture, "maketh glad the heart of
 man," but only of the man who has a heart. The thing called high
 spirits is possible only to the spiritual. Ultimately a man cannot
 rejoice in anything except the nature of things. Ultimately a man can
 enjoy nothing except religion.  Once in the world's history men did
 believe that the stars were dancing to the tune of their temples, and
 they danced as men have never danced since. With this old pagan
 eudaemonism the sage of the Rubaiyat has quite as little to do as he
 has with any Christian variety. He is no more a Bacchanal than he is a
 saint.  Dionysus and his church was grounded on a serious joie-de-vivre
 like that of Walt Whitman. Dionysus made wine, not a medicine, but a
--**--**--
 funny.  This journalism does not merely fail to exaggerate life--it
 positively underrates it; and it has to do so because it is intended
 for the faint and languid recreation of men whom the fierceness of
 modern life has fatigued. This press is not the yellow press at all; it
 is the drab press. Sir Alfred Harmsworth must not address to the tired
 clerk any observation more witty than the tired clerk might be able to
 address to Sir Alfred Harmsworth.  It must not expose anybody (anybody
 who is powerful, that is), it must not offend anybody, it must not even
 please anybody, too much.  A general vague idea that in spite of all
 this, our yellow press is sensational, arises from such external
 accidents as large type or lurid headlines. It is quite true that these
 editors print everything they possibly can in large capital letters.
 But they do this, not because it is startling, but because it is
 soothing.  To people wholly weary or partly drunk in a dimly lighted
 train, it is a simplification and a comfort to have things presented in
 this vast and obvious manner. The editors use this gigantic alphabet in
 dealing with their readers, for exactly the same reason that parents
 and governesses use a similar gigantic alphabet in teaching children to
 spell. The nursery authorities do not use an A as big as a horseshoe in
 order to make the child jump; on the contrary, they use it to put the
 child at his ease, to make things smoother and more evident. Of the
 same character is the dim and quiet dame school which Sir Alfred
 Harmsworth and Mr. Pearson keep.  All their sentiments are
 spelling-book sentiments--that is to say, they are sentiments with
 which the pupil is already respectfully familiar. All their wildest
--**--**--
 alone in this, nor does he come by this fate merely because he happens
 personally to be stupid.  Every man, however brave, who begins by
 worshipping violence, must end in mere timidity. Every man, however
 wise, who begins by worshipping success, must end in mere mediocrity.
 This strange and paradoxical fate is involved, not in the individual,
 but in the philosophy, in the point of view. It is not the folly of the
 man which brings about this necessary fall; it is his wisdom.  The
 worship of success is the only one out of all possible worships of
 which this is true, that its followers are foredoomed to become slaves
 and cowards. A man may be a hero for the sake of Mrs. Gallup's ciphers
 or for the sake of human sacrifice, but not for the sake of success.
 For obviously a man may choose to fail because he loves Mrs. Gallup or
 human sacrifice; but he cannot choose to fail because he loves success.
 When the test of triumph is men's test of everything, they never endure
 long enough to triumph at all. As long as matters are really hopeful,
 hope is a mere flattery or platitude; it is only when everything is
 hopeless that hope begins to be a strength at all.  Like all the
 Christian virtues, it is as unreasonable as it is indispensable.
 
 It was through this fatal paradox in the nature of things that all
 these modern adventurers come at last to a sort of tedium and
 acquiescence. They desired strength; and to them to desire strength was
 to admire strength; to admire strength was simply to admire the statu
 quo. They thought that he who wished to be strong ought to respect the
 strong. They did not realize the obvious verity that he who wishes to
--**--**--
 "Sound common sense tells better in America than high-flown argument.
 Thus Senator Budge, who threw his false teeth in the air every time he
 made an epigram, won the solid approval of American working-men." Or
 again, "The sound common sense of a gentleman from Earlswood, who stuck
 straws in his hair during the progress of his speech, assured the
 victory of Mr. Roosevelt."
 
 There are many other elements in this article on which I should love to
 linger.  But the matter which I wish to point out is that in that
 sentence is perfectly revealed the whole truth of what our
 Chamberlainites, hustlers, bustlers, Empire-builders, and strong,
 silent men, really mean by "commonsense."  They mean knocking, with
 deafening noise and dramatic effect, meaningless bits of iron into a
 useless bit of wood.  A man goes on to an American platform and behaves
 like a mountebank fool with a board and a hammer; well, I do not blame
 him; I might even admire him. He may be a dashing and quite decent
 strategist.  He may be a fine romantic actor, like Burke flinging the
 dagger on the floor. He may even (for all I know) be a sublime mystic,
 profoundly impressed with the ancient meaning of the divine trade of
 the Carpenter, and offering to the people a parable in the form of a
 ceremony. All I wish to indicate is the abyss of mental confusion in
 which such wild ritualism can be called "sound common sense." And it is
 in that abyss of mental confusion, and in that alone, that the new
 Imperialism lives and moves and has its being. The whole glory and
 greatness of Mr. Chamberlain consists in this: that if a man hits the
 right nail on the head nobody cares where he hits it to or what it
--**--**--
 justified in life. One of them, for instance, is the paradox of hope or
 faith--that the more hopeless is the situation the more hopeful must be
 the man. Stevenson understood this, and consequently Mr. Moore cannot
 understand Stevenson.  Another is the paradox of charity or chivalry
 that the weaker a thing is the more it should be respected, that the
 more indefensible a thing is the more it should appeal to us for a
 certain kind of defence.  Thackeray understood this, and therefore Mr.
 Moore does not understand Thackeray.  Now, one of these very practical
 and working mysteries in the Christian tradition, and one which the
 Roman Catholic Church, as I say, has done her best work in singling
 out, is the conception of the sinfulness of pride. Pride is a weakness
 in the character; it dries up laughter, it dries up wonder, it dries up
 chivalry and energy. The Christian tradition understands this;
 therefore Mr. Moore does not understand the Christian tradition.
 
 For the truth is much stranger even than it appears in the formal
 doctrine of the sin of pride.  It is not only true that humility is a
 much wiser and more vigorous thing than pride. It is also true that
 vanity is a much wiser and more vigorous thing than pride.  Vanity is
 social--it is almost a kind of comradeship; pride is solitary and
 uncivilized.  Vanity is active; it desires the applause of infinite
 multitudes; pride is passive, desiring only the applause of one person,
 which it already has. Vanity is humorous, and can enjoy the joke even
 of itself; pride is dull, and cannot even smile.  And the whole of this
 difference is the difference between Stevenson and Mr. George Moore,
 who, as he informs us, has "brushed Stevenson aside."  I do not know
--**--**--
 try to be an encyclopaedia of culture, and his own real personality
 will be lost in that false universalism. Thinking about himself will
 lead to trying to be the universe; trying to be the universe will lead
 to ceasing to be anything. If, on the other hand, a man is sensible
 enough to think only about the universe; he will think about it in his
 own individual way. He will keep virgin the secret of God; he will see
 the grass as no other man can see it, and look at a sun that no man has
 ever known. This fact is very practically brought out in Mr. Moore's
 "Confessions." In reading them we do not feel the presence of a
 clean-cut personality like that of Thackeray and Matthew Arnold. We
 only read a number of quite clever and largely conflicting opinions
 which might be uttered by any clever person, but which we are called
 upon to admire specifically, because they are uttered by Mr. Moore. He
 is the only thread that connects Catholicism and Protestantism, realism
 and mysticism--he or rather his name.  He is profoundly absorbed even
 in views he no longer holds, and he expects us to be. And he intrudes
 the capital "I" even where it need not be intruded--even where it
 weakens the force of a plain statement. Where another man would say,
 "It is a fine day," Mr. Moore says, "Seen through my temperament, the
 day appeared fine." Where another man would say "Milton has obviously a
 fine style," Mr. Moore would say, "As a stylist Milton had always
 impressed me." The Nemesis of this self-centred spirit is that of being
 totally ineffectual.  Mr. Moore has started many interesting crusades,
 but he has abandoned them before his disciples could begin. Even when
 he is on the side of the truth he is as fickle as the children of
--**--**--
 matter whether a man eats a grilled tomato or a plain tomato; it does
 very much matter whether he eats a plain tomato with a grilled mind.
 The only kind of simplicity worth preserving is the simplicity of the
 heart, the simplicity which accepts and enjoys. There may be a
 reasonable doubt as to what system preserves this; there can surely be
 no doubt that a system of simplicity destroys it. There is more
 simplicity in the man who eats caviar on impulse than in the man who
 eats grape-nuts on principle. The chief error of these people is to be
 found in the very phrase to which they are most attached--"plain living
 and high thinking." These people do not stand in need of, will not be
 improved by, plain living and high thinking.  They stand in need of the
 contrary. They would be improved by high living and plain thinking. A
 little high living (I say, having a full sense of responsibility, a
 little high living) would teach them the force and meaning of the human
 festivities, of the banquet that has gone on from the beginning of the
 world.  It would teach them the historic fact that the artificial is,
 if anything, older than the natural. It would teach them that the
 loving-cup is as old as any hunger. It would teach them that ritualism
 is older than any religion. And a little plain thinking would teach
 them how harsh and fanciful are the mass of their own ethics, how very
 civilized and very complicated must be the brain of the Tolstoyan who
 really believes it to be evil to love one's country and wicked to
 strike a blow.
 
 A man approaches, wearing sandals and simple raiment, a raw tomato held
 firmly in his right hand, and says, "The affections of family and
--**--**--
 is that the man of science can hardly be in the nature of things very
 frequently a man of the world.  He is a student of nature; he is
 scarcely ever a student of human nature. And even where this difficulty
 is overcome, and he is in some sense a student of human nature, this is
 only a very faint beginning of the painful progress towards being
 human.  For the study of primitive race and religion stands apart in
 one important respect from all, or nearly all, the ordinary scientific
 studies. A man can understand astronomy only by being an astronomer; he
 can understand entomology only by being an entomologist (or, perhaps,
 an insect); but he can understand a great deal of anthropology merely
 by being a man.  He is himself the animal which he studies. Hence
 arises the fact which strikes the eye everywhere in the records of
 ethnology and folk-lore--the fact that the same frigid and detached
 spirit which leads to success in the study of astronomy or botany leads
 to disaster in the study of mythology or human origins. It is necessary
 to cease to be a man in order to do justice to a microbe; it is not
 necessary to cease to be a man in order to do justice to men.  That
 same suppression of sympathies, that same waving away of intuitions or
 guess-work which make a man preternaturally clever in dealing with the
 stomach of a spider, will make him preternaturally stupid in dealing
 with the heart of man. He is making himself inhuman in order to
 understand humanity. An ignorance of the other world is boasted by many
 men of science; but in this matter their defect arises, not from
 ignorance of the other world, but from ignorance of this world.  For
--**--**--
 savage for the same reason that the savage does not understand himself.
 And the savage does not understand himself for the same reason that we
 do not understand ourselves either.
 
 The obvious truth is that the moment any matter has passed through the
 human mind it is finally and for ever spoilt for all purposes of
 science.  It has become a thing incurably mysterious and infinite; this
 mortal has put on immortality.  Even what we call our material desires
 are spiritual, because they are human. Science can analyse a pork-chop,
 and say how much of it is phosphorus and how much is protein; but
 science cannot analyse any man's wish for a pork-chop, and say how much
 of it is hunger, how much custom, how much nervous fancy, how much a
 haunting love of the beautiful.  The man's desire for the pork-chop
 remains literally as mystical and ethereal as his desire for heaven.
 All attempts, therefore, at a science of any human things, at a science
 of history, a science of folk-lore, a science of sociology, are by
 their nature not merely hopeless, but crazy. You can no more be certain
 in economic history that a man's desire for money was merely a desire
 for money than you can be certain in hagiology that a saint's desire
 for God was merely a desire for God. And this kind of vagueness in the
 primary phenomena of the study is an absolutely final blow to anything
 in the nature of a science. Men can construct a science with very few
 instruments, or with very plain instruments; but no one on earth could
 construct a science with unreliable instruments.  A man might work out
 the whole of mathematics with a handful of pebbles, but not with a
 handful of clay which was always falling apart into new fragments, and
--**--**--
 any inventive poet. But it is also an idea that might easily occur to
 any boastful archer. It might be one of the fantastic caprices of some
 story-teller. It might equally well be one of the fantastic caprices of
 some tyrant. It might occur first in real life and afterwards occur in
 legends. Or it might just as well occur first in legends and afterwards
 occur in real life.  If no apple has ever been shot off a boy's head
 from the beginning of the world, it may be done tomorrow morning, and
 by somebody who has never heard of William Tell.
 
 This type of tale, indeed, may be pretty fairly paralleled with the
 ordinary anecdote terminating in a repartee or an Irish bull. Such a
 retort as the famous "je ne vois pas la necessite" we have all seen
 attributed to Talleyrand, to Voltaire, to Henri Quatre, to an anonymous
 judge, and so on.  But this variety does not in any way make it more
 likely that the thing was never said at all. It is highly likely that
 it was really said by somebody unknown. It is highly likely that it was
 really said by Talleyrand. In any case, it is not any more difficult to
 believe that the mot might have occurred to a man in conversation than
 to a man writing memoirs. It might have occurred to any of the men I
 have mentioned. But there is this point of distinction about it, that
 it is not likely to have occurred to all of them.  And this is where
 the first class of so-called myth differs from the second to which I
 have previously referred.  For there is a second class of incident
 found to be common to the stories of five or six heroes, say to Sigurd,
--**--**--
 the eyes of a man, because by this explanation they were made more
 reasonable and comfortable. The final cure for all this kind of
 philosophy is to walk down a lane at night.  Any one who does so will
 discover very quickly that men pictured something semi-human at the
 back of all things, not because such a thought was natural, but because
 it was supernatural; not because it made things more comprehensible,
 but because it made them a hundred times more incomprehensible and
 mysterious. For a man walking down a lane at night can see the
 conspicuous fact that as long as nature keeps to her own course, she
 has no power with us at all.  As long as a tree is a tree, it is a
 top-heavy monster with a hundred arms, a thousand tongues, and only one
 leg. But so long as a tree is a tree, it does not frighten us at all.
 It begins to be something alien, to be something strange, only when it
 looks like ourselves.  When a tree really looks like a man our knees
 knock under us.  And when the whole universe looks like a man we fall
 on our faces.
 
 
 
 XII Paganism and Mr. Lowes Dickinson
 
 Of the New Paganism (or neo-Paganism), as it was preached flamboyantly
 by Mr. Swinburne or delicately by Walter Pater, there is no necessity
 to take any very grave account, except as a thing which left behind it
 incomparable exercises in the English language.  The New Paganism is no
 longer new, and it never at any time bore the smallest resemblance to
 Paganism. The ideas about the ancient civilization which it has left
 loose in the public mind are certainly extraordinary enough. The term
 "pagan" is continually used in fiction and light literature as meaning
--**--**--
 be more accurately put by saying that each one of these Christian or
 mystical virtues involves a paradox in its own nature, and that this is
 not true of any of the typically pagan or rationalist virtues. Justice
 consists in finding out a certain thing due to a certain man and giving
 it to him.  Temperance consists in finding out the proper limit of a
 particular indulgence and adhering to that.  But charity means
 pardoning what is unpardonable, or it is no virtue at all. Hope means
 hoping when things are hopeless, or it is no virtue at all. And faith
 means believing the incredible, or it is no virtue at all.
 
 It is somewhat amusing, indeed, to notice the difference between the
 fate of these three paradoxes in the fashion of the modern mind.
 Charity is a fashionable virtue in our time; it is lit up by the
 gigantic firelight of Dickens.  Hope is a fashionable virtue to-day;
 our attention has been arrested for it by the sudden and silver trumpet
 of Stevenson.  But faith is unfashionable, and it is customary on every
 side to cast against it the fact that it is a paradox. Everybody
 mockingly repeats the famous childish definition that faith is "the
 power of believing that which we know to be untrue." Yet it is not one
 atom more paradoxical than hope or charity. Charity is the power of
 defending that which we know to be indefensible. Hope is the power of
 being cheerful in circumstances which we know to be desperate.  It is
 true that there is a state of hope which belongs to bright prospects
 and the morning; but that is not the virtue of hope. The virtue of hope
 exists only in earthquake and, eclipse. It is true that there is a
--**--**--
 Christian idea.  In a word, we cannot reconstruct or even imagine the
 beautiful and astonishing pagan world. It was a world in which common
 sense was really common.
 
 My general meaning touching the three virtues of which I have spoken
 will now, I hope, be sufficiently clear. They are all three
 paradoxical, they are all three practical, and they are all three
 paradoxical because they are practical. it is the stress of ultimate
 need, and a terrible knowledge of things as they are, which led men to
 set up these riddles, and to die for them. Whatever may be the meaning
 of the contradiction, it is the fact that the only kind of hope that is
 of any use in a battle is a hope that denies arithmetic.  Whatever may
 be the meaning of the contradiction, it is the fact that the only kind
 of charity which any weak spirit wants, or which any generous spirit
 feels, is the charity which forgives the sins that are like scarlet.
 Whatever may be the meaning of faith, it must always mean a certainty
 about something we cannot prove.  Thus, for instance, we believe by
 faith in the existence of other people.
 
 But there is another Christian virtue, a virtue far more obviously and
 historically connected with Christianity, which will illustrate even
 better the connection between paradox and practical necessity. This
 virtue cannot be questioned in its capacity as a historical symbol;
 certainly Mr. Lowes Dickinson will not question it. It has been the
 boast of hundreds of the champions of Christianity. It has been the
 taunt of hundreds of the opponents of Christianity. It is, in essence,
 the basis of Mr. Lowes Dickinson's whole distinction between
 Christianity and Paganism.  I mean, of course, the virtue of humility.
 I admit, of course, most readily, that a great deal of false Eastern
--**--**--
 be extended towards him in the matter if he merely or mainly meant that
 the phrase was a disparagement of hero-worship. Hero-worship is
 certainly a generous and human impulse; the hero may be faulty, but the
 worship can hardly be.  It may be that no man would be a hero to his
 valet.  But any man would be a valet to his hero. But in truth both the
 proverb itself and Carlyle's stricture upon it ignore the most
 essential matter at issue.  The ultimate psychological truth is not
 that no man is a hero to his valet. The ultimate psychological truth,
 the foundation of Christianity, is that no man is a hero to himself.
 Cromwell, according to Carlyle, was a strong man.  According to
 Cromwell, he was a weak one.
 
 The weak point in the whole of Carlyle's case for aristocracy lies,
 indeed, in his most celebrated phrase. Carlyle said that men were
 mostly fools.  Christianity, with a surer and more reverent realism,
 says that they are all fools. This doctrine is sometimes called the
 doctrine of original sin. It may also be described as the doctrine of
 the equality of men. But the essential point of it is merely this, that
 whatever primary and far-reaching moral dangers affect any man, affect
 all men. All men can be criminals, if tempted; all men can be heroes,
 if inspired. And this doctrine does away altogether with Carlyle's
 pathetic belief (or any one else's pathetic belief) in "the wise few."
 There are no wise few.  Every aristocracy that has ever existed has
 behaved, in all essential points, exactly like a small mob. Every
 oligarchy is merely a knot of men in the street--that is to say, it is
 very jolly, but not infallible.  And no oligarchies in the world's
 history have ever come off so badly in practical affairs as the very
--**--**--
 That sort of thing must be left to people who talk about the
 Anglo-Saxon race, and extend the expression to America. How much of the
 blood of the Angles and Saxons (whoever they were) there remains in our
 mixed British, Roman, German, Dane, Norman, and Picard stock is a
 matter only interesting to wild antiquaries. And how much of that
 diluted blood can possibly remain in that roaring whirlpool of America
 into which a cataract of Swedes, Jews, Germans, Irishmen, and Italians
 is perpetually pouring, is a matter only interesting to lunatics.  It
 would have been wiser for the English governing class to have called
 upon some other god. All other gods, however weak and warring, at least
 boast of being constant.  But science boasts of being in a flux for
 ever; boasts of being unstable as water.
 
 And England and the English governing class never did call on this
 absurd deity of race until it seemed, for an instant, that they had no
 other god to call on.  All the most genuine Englishmen in history would
 have yawned or laughed in your face if you had begun to talk about
 Anglo-Saxons. If you had attempted to substitute the ideal of race for
 the ideal of nationality, I really do not like to think what they would
 have said.  I certainly should not like to have been the officer of
 Nelson who suddenly discovered his French blood on the eve of
 Trafalgar.  I should not like to have been the Norfolk or Suffolk
 gentleman who had to expound to Admiral Blake by what demonstrable ties
 of genealogy he was irrevocably bound to the Dutch.  The truth of the
 whole matter is very simple. Nationality exists, and has nothing in the
 world to do with race. Nationality is a thing like a church or a secret
--**--**--
 passionate Scotch patriot, has not been so attractive as a nation
 without a flag.  Ireland, unrecognized and oppressed, has easily
 absorbed races, as such trifles are easily absorbed. She has easily
 disposed of physical science, as such superstitions are easily disposed
 of.  Nationality in its weakness has been stronger than ethnology in
 its strength.  Five triumphant races have been absorbed, have been
 defeated by a defeated nationality.
 
 This being the true and strange glory of Ireland, it is impossible to
 hear without impatience of the attempt so constantly made among her
 modern sympathizers to talk about Celts and Celticism. Who were the
 Celts?  I defy anybody to say.  Who are the Irish? I defy any one to be
 indifferent, or to pretend not to know. Mr. W. B. Yeats, the great
 Irish genius who has appeared in our time, shows his own admirable
 penetration in discarding altogether the argument from a Celtic race.
 But he does not wholly escape, and his followers hardly ever escape,
 the general objection to the Celtic argument. The tendency of that
 argument is to represent the Irish or the Celts as a strange and
 separate race, as a tribe of eccentrics in the modern world immersed in
 dim legends and fruitless dreams. Its tendency is to exhibit the Irish
 as odd, because they see the fairies.  Its trend is to make the Irish
 seem weird and wild because they sing old songs and join in strange
 dances. But this is quite an error; indeed, it is the opposite of the
 truth. It is the English who are odd because they do not see the
 fairies. It is the inhabitants of Kensington who are weird and wild
 because they do not sing old songs and join in strange dances. In all
 this the Irish are not in the least strange and separate, are not in
--**--**--
 savage sanctity; it merely reversed it. It did not deny the trinity of
 father, mother, and child. It merely read it backwards, making it run
 child, mother, father. This it called, not the family, but the Holy
 Family, for many things are made holy by being turned upside down. But
 some sages of our own decadence have made a serious attack on the
 family.  They have impugned it, as I think wrongly; and its defenders
 have defended it, and defended it wrongly. The common defence of the
 family is that, amid the stress and fickleness of life, it is peaceful,
 pleasant, and at one. But there is another defence of the family which
 is possible, and to me evident; this defence is that the family is not
 peaceful and not pleasant and not at one.
 
 It is not fashionable to say much nowadays of the advantages of the
 small community.  We are told that we must go in for large empires and
 large ideas.  There is one advantage, however, in the small state, the
 city, or the village, which only the wilfully blind can overlook. The
 man who lives in a small community lives in a much larger world. He
 knows much more of the fierce varieties and uncompromising divergences
 of men.  The reason is obvious.  In a large community we can choose our
 companions.  In a small community our companions are chosen for us.
 Thus in all extensive and highly civilized societies groups come into
 existence founded upon what is called sympathy, and shut out the real
 world more sharply than the gates of a monastery. There is nothing
 really narrow about the clan; the thing which is really narrow is the
 clique.  The men of the clan live together because they all wear the
 same tartan or are all descended from the same sacred cow; but in their
--**--**--
 us as well. What we dread about our neighbours, in short, is not the
 narrowness of their horizon, but their superb tendency to broaden it.
 And all aversions to ordinary humanity have this general character.
 They are not aversions to its feebleness (as is pretended), but to its
 energy. The misanthropes pretend that they despise humanity for its
 weakness. As a matter of fact, they hate it for its strength.
 
 Of course, this shrinking from the brutal vivacity and brutal variety
 of common men is a perfectly reasonable and excusable thing as long as
 it does not pretend to any point of superiority. It is when it calls
 itself aristocracy or aestheticism or a superiority to the bourgeoisie
 that its inherent weakness has in justice to be pointed out.
 Fastidiousness is the most pardonable of vices; but it is the most
 unpardonable of virtues.  Nietzsche, who represents most prominently
 this pretentious claim of the fastidious, has a description
 somewhere--a very powerful description in the purely literary sense--of
 the disgust and disdain which consume him at the sight of the common
 people with their common faces, their common voices, and their common
 minds.  As I have said, this attitude is almost beautiful if we may
 regard it as pathetic. Nietzsche's aristocracy has about it all the
 sacredness that belongs to the weak.  When he makes us feel that he
 cannot endure the innumerable faces, the incessant voices, the
 overpowering omnipresence which belongs to the mob, he will have the
 sympathy of anybody who has ever been sick on a steamer or tired in a
 crowded omnibus. Every man has hated mankind when he was less than a
 man. Every man has had humanity in his eyes like a blinding fog,
 humanity in his nostrils like a suffocating smell.  But when Nietzsche
--**--**--
 terrified by the largeness and variety of the family. Sarah wishes to
 find a world wholly consisting of private theatricals; George wishes to
 think the Trocadero a cosmos.  I do not say, for a moment, that the
 flight to this narrower life may not be the right thing for the
 individual, any more than I say the same thing about flight into a
 monastery.  But I do say that anything is bad and artificial which
 tends to make these people succumb to the strange delusion that they
 are stepping into a world which is actually larger and more varied than
 their own. The best way that a man could test his readiness to
 encounter the common variety of mankind would be to climb down a
 chimney into any house at random, and get on as well as possible with
 the people inside. And that is essentially what each one of us did on
 the day that he was born.
 
 This is, indeed, the sublime and special romance of the family.  It is
 romantic because it is a toss-up. It is romantic because it is
 everything that its enemies call it.  It is romantic because it is
 arbitrary. It is romantic because it is there.  So long as you have
 groups of men chosen rationally, you have some special or sectarian
 atmosphere. It is when you have groups of men chosen irrationally that
 you have men. The element of adventure begins to exist; for an
 adventure is, by its nature, a thing that comes to us.  It is a thing
 that chooses us, not a thing that we choose.  Falling in love has been
 often regarded as the supreme adventure, the supreme romantic accident.
 In so much as there is in it something outside ourselves, something of
 a sort of merry fatalism, this is very true. Love does take us and
--**--**--
 even to be a beautiful lament. Our existence may not be an intelligible
 justice, or even a recognizable wrong.  But our existence is still a
 story.  In the fiery alphabet of every sunset is written, "to be
 continued in our next." If we have sufficient intellect, we can finish
 a philosophical and exact deduction, and be certain that we are
 finishing it right. With the adequate brain-power we could finish any
 scientific discovery, and be certain that we were finishing it right.
 But not with the most gigantic intellect could we finish the simplest
 or silliest story, and be certain that we were finishing it right. That
 is because a story has behind it, not merely intellect which is partly
 mechanical, but will, which is in its essence divine. The narrative
 writer can send his hero to the gallows if he likes in the last chapter
 but one.  He can do it by the same divine caprice whereby he, the
 author, can go to the gallows himself, and to hell afterwards if he
 chooses.  And the same civilization, the chivalric European
 civilization which asserted freewill in the thirteenth century,
 produced the thing called "fiction" in the eighteenth. When Thomas
 Aquinas asserted the spiritual liberty of man, he created all the bad
 novels in the circulating libraries.
 
 But in order that life should be a story or romance to us, it is
 necessary that a great part of it, at any rate, should be settled for
 us without our permission.  If we wish life to be a system, this may be
 a nuisance; but if we wish it to be a drama, it is an essential.  It
 may often happen, no doubt, that a drama may be written by somebody
 else which we like very little. But we should like it still less if the
--**--**--
 
 
 
 XV On Smart Novelists and the Smart Set
 
 In one sense, at any rate, it is more valuable to read bad literature
 than good literature.  Good literature may tell us the mind of one man;
 but bad literature may tell us the mind of many men. A good novel tells
 us the truth about its hero; but a bad novel tells us the truth about
 its author.  It does much more than that, it tells us the truth about
 its readers; and, oddly enough, it tells us this all the more the more
 cynical and immoral be the motive of its manufacture.  The more
 dishonest a book is as a book the more honest it is as a public
 document. A sincere novel exhibits the simplicity of one particular
 man; an insincere novel exhibits the simplicity of mankind. The
 pedantic decisions and definable readjustments of man may be found in
 scrolls and statute books and scriptures; but men's basic assumptions
 and everlasting energies are to be found in penny dreadfuls and
 halfpenny novelettes.  Thus a man, like many men of real culture in our
 day, might learn from good literature nothing except the power to
 appreciate good literature. But from bad literature he might learn to
 govern empires and look over the map of mankind.
 
 There is one rather interesting example of this state of things in
 which the weaker literature is really the stronger and the stronger the
 weaker.  It is the case of what may be called, for the sake of an
 approximate description, the literature of aristocracy; or, if you
 prefer the description, the literature of snobbishness. Now if any one
 wishes to find a really effective and comprehensible and permanent case
 for aristocracy well and sincerely stated, let him read, not the modern
 philosophical conservatives, not even Nietzsche, let him read the Bow
--**--**--
 good baronet, this school has added a conception undreamed of in the
 former years--the conception of an amusing baronet. The aristocrat is
 not merely to be taller than mortal men and stronger and handsomer, he
 is also to be more witty. He is the long man with the short epigram.
 Many eminent, and deservedly eminent, modern novelists must accept some
 responsibility for having supported this worst form of snobbishness--an
 intellectual snobbishness.  The talented author of "Dodo" is
 responsible for having in some sense created the fashion as a fashion.
 Mr. Hichens, in the "Green Carnation," reaffirmed the strange idea that
 young noblemen talk well; though his case had some vague biographical
 foundation, and in consequence an excuse.  Mrs. Craigie is considerably
 guilty in the matter, although, or rather because, she has combined the
 aristocratic note with a note of some moral and even religious
 sincerity.  When you are saving a man's soul, even in a novel, it is
 indecent to mention that he is a gentleman. Nor can blame in this
 matter be altogether removed from a man of much greater ability, and a
 man who has proved his possession of the highest of human instinct, the
 romantic instinct--I mean Mr. Anthony Hope. In a galloping, impossible
 melodrama like "The Prisoner of Zenda," the blood of kings fanned an
 excellent fantastic thread or theme. But the blood of kings is not a
 thing that can be taken seriously. And when, for example, Mr. Hope
 devotes so much serious and sympathetic study to the man called
 Tristram of Blent, a man who throughout burning boyhood thought of
 nothing but a silly old estate, we feel even in Mr. Hope the hint of
 this excessive concern about the oligarchic idea. It is hard for any
 ordinary person to feel so much interest in a young man whose whole aim
--**--**--
 kindness of the poor to the rich.
 
 The snobbishness of bad literature, then, is not servile; but the
 snobbishness of good literature is servile.  The old-fashioned
 halfpenny romance where the duchesses sparkled with diamonds was not
 servile; but the new romance where they sparkle with epigrams is
 servile. For in thus attributing a special and startling degree of
 intellect and conversational or controversial power to the upper
 classes, we are attributing something which is not especially their
 virtue or even especially their aim.  We are, in the words of Disraeli
 (who, being a genius and not a gentleman, has perhaps primarily to
 answer for the introduction of this method of flattering the gentry),
 we are performing the essential function of flattery which is
 flattering the people for the qualities they have not got. Praise may
 be gigantic and insane without having any quality of flattery so long
 as it is praise of something that is noticeably in existence.  A man
 may say that a giraffe's head strikes the stars, or that a whale fills
 the German Ocean, and still be only in a rather excited state about a
 favourite animal. But when he begins to congratulate the giraffe on his
 feathers, and the whale on the elegance of his legs, we find ourselves
 confronted with that social element which we call flattery. The middle
 and lower orders of London can sincerely, though not perhaps safely,
 admire the health and grace of the English aristocracy. And this for
 the very simple reason that the aristocrats are, upon the whole, more
 healthy and graceful than the poor. But they cannot honestly admire the
 wit of the aristocrats. And this for the simple reason that the
 aristocrats are not more witty than the poor, but a very great deal
 less so.  A man does not hear, as in the smart novels, these gems of
--**--**--
 sentimentalism, but a very silly sentimentalism.  There has been no
 humour so robust or uproarious as that of the sentimentalist Steele or
 the sentimentalist Sterne or the sentimentalist Dickens. These
 creatures who wept like women were the creatures who laughed like men.
 It is true that the humour of Micawber is good literature and that the
 pathos of little Nell is bad.  But the kind of man who had the courage
 to write so badly in the one case is the kind of man who would have the
 courage to write so well in the other. The same unconsciousness, the
 same violent innocence, the same gigantesque scale of action which
 brought the Napoleon of Comedy his Jena brought him also his Moscow.
 And herein is especially shown the frigid and feeble limitations of our
 modern wits. They make violent efforts, they make heroic and almost
 pathetic efforts, but they cannot really write badly.  There are
 moments when we almost think that they are achieving the effect, but
 our hope shrivels to nothing the moment we compare their little
 failures with the enormous imbecilities of Byron or Shakespeare.
 
 For a hearty laugh it is necessary to have touched the heart. I do not
 know why touching the heart should always be connected only with the
 idea of touching it to compassion or a sense of distress. The heart can
 be touched to joy and triumph; the heart can be touched to amusement.
 But all our comedians are tragic comedians. These later fashionable
 writers are so pessimistic in bone and marrow that they never seem able
 to imagine the heart having any concern with mirth.  When they speak of
 the heart, they always mean the pangs and disappointments of the
 emotional life. When they say that a man's heart is in the right place,
--**--**--
 Whatever may have been the moral beauty of the passions of Etheridge
 and Dorset, Sedley and Buckingham, they cannot be accused of the fault
 of fastidiously concealing them. Charles the Second was very popular
 with the English because, like all the jolly English kings, he
 displayed his passions. William the Dutchman was very unpopular with
 the English because, not being an Englishman, he did hide his emotions.
 He was, in fact, precisely the ideal Englishman of our modern theory;
 and precisely for that reason all the real Englishmen loathed him like
 leprosy. With the rise of the great England of the eighteenth century,
 we find this open and emotional tone still maintained in letters and
 politics, in arts and in arms.  Perhaps the only quality which was
 possessed in common by the great Fielding, and the great Richardson was
 that neither of them hid their feelings. Swift, indeed, was hard and
 logical, because Swift was Irish. And when we pass to the soldiers and
 the rulers, the patriots and the empire-builders of the eighteenth
 century, we find, as I have said, that they were, If possible, more
 romantic than the romancers, more poetical than the poets.  Chatham,
 who showed the world all his strength, showed the House of Commons all
 his weakness. Wolfe walked about the room with a drawn sword calling
 himself Caesar and Hannibal, and went to death with poetry in his
 mouth. Clive was a man of the same type as Cromwell or Bunyan, or, for
 the matter of that, Johnson--that is, he was a strong, sensible man
 with a kind of running spring of hysteria and melancholy in him. Like
 Johnson, he was all the more healthy because he was morbid. The tales
 of all the admirals and adventurers of that England are full of
--**--**--
 has the smallest knowledge of the world, it is that men are always
 speaking gravely and earnestly and with the utmost possible care about
 the things that are not important, but always talking frivolously about
 the things that are. Men talk for hours with the faces of a college of
 cardinals about things like golf, or tobacco, or waistcoats, or party
 politics. But all the most grave and dreadful things in the world are
 the oldest jokes in the world--being married; being hanged.
 
 One gentleman, however, Mr. McCabe, has in this matter made to me
 something that almost amounts to a personal appeal; and as he happens
 to be a man for whose sincerity and intellectual virtue I have a high
 respect, I do not feel inclined to let it pass without some attempt to
 satisfy my critic in the matter. Mr. McCabe devotes a considerable part
 of the last essay in the collection called "Christianity and
 Rationalism on Trial" to an objection, not to my thesis, but to my
 method, and a very friendly and dignified appeal to me to alter it.  I
 am much inclined to defend myself in this matter out of mere respect
 for Mr. McCabe, and still more so out of mere respect for the truth
 which is, I think, in danger by his error, not only in this question,
 but in others. In order that there may be no injustice done in the
 matter, I will quote Mr. McCabe himself.  "But before I follow Mr.
 Chesterton in some detail I would make a general observation on his
 method. He is as serious as I am in his ultimate purpose, and I respect
 him for that.  He knows, as I do, that humanity stands at a solemn
 parting of the ways.  Towards some unknown goal it presses through the
--**--**--
 to know what sort of guarantee of reality and solidity is afforded by
 the mere act of what is called talking seriously, let him spend a happy
 Sunday in going the round of the pulpits.  Or, better still, let him
 drop in at the House of Commons or the House of Lords.  Even Mr. McCabe
 would admit that these men are solemn--more solemn than I am. And even
 Mr. McCabe, I think, would admit that these men are frivolous--more
 frivolous than I am.  Why should Mr. McCabe be so eloquent about the
 danger arising from fantastic and paradoxical writers? Why should he be
 so ardent in desiring grave and verbose writers? There are not so very
 many fantastic and paradoxical writers. But there are a gigantic number
 of grave and verbose writers; and it is by the efforts of the grave and
 verbose writers that everything that Mr. McCabe detests (and everything
 that I detest, for that matter) is kept in existence and energy. How
 can it have come about that a man as intelligent as Mr. McCabe can
 think that paradox and jesting stop the way?  It is solemnity that is
 stopping the way in every department of modern effort. It is his own
 favourite "serious methods;" it is his own favourite "momentousness;"
 it is his own favourite "judgment" which stops the way everywhere.
 Every man who has ever headed a deputation to a minister knows this.
 Every man who has ever written a letter to the Times knows it.  Every
 rich man who wishes to stop the mouths of the poor talks about
 "momentousness."  Every Cabinet minister who has not got an answer
 suddenly develops a "judgment." Every sweater who uses vile methods
 recommends "serious methods." I said a moment ago that sincerity had
 nothing to do with solemnity, but I confess that I am not so certain
--**--**--
 I may start with saying that Mr. McCabe is in error in supposing that
 the danger which I anticipate from the disappearance of religion is the
 increase of sensuality.  On the contrary, I should be inclined to
 anticipate a decrease in sensuality, because I anticipate a decrease in
 life.  I do not think that under modern Western materialism we should
 have anarchy.  I doubt whether we should have enough individual valour
 and spirit even to have liberty. It is quite an old-fashioned fallacy
 to suppose that our objection to scepticism is that it removes the
 discipline from life. Our objection to scepticism is that it removes
 the motive power. Materialism is not a thing which destroys mere
 restraint. Materialism itself is the great restraint.  The McCabe
 school advocates a political liberty, but it denies spiritual liberty.
 That is, it abolishes the laws which could be broken, and substitutes
 laws that cannot.  And that is the real slavery.
 
 The truth is that the scientific civilization in which Mr. McCabe
 believes has one rather particular defect; it is perpetually tending to
 destroy that democracy or power of the ordinary man in which Mr. McCabe
 also believes.  Science means specialism, and specialism means
 oligarchy.  If you once establish the habit of trusting particular men
 to produce particular results in physics or astronomy, you leave the
 door open for the equally natural demand that you should trust
 particular men to do particular things in government and the coercing
 of men.  If, you feel it to be reasonable that one beetle should be the
 only study of one man, and that one man the only student of that one
 beetle, it is surely a very harmless consequence to go on to say that
 politics should be the only study of one man, and that one man the only
--**--**--
 money. Now it follows, therefore, that when Mr. McCabe says that the
 ballets of the Alhambra and my articles "have their place in life," it
 ought to be pointed out to him that he is doing his best to create a
 world in which dancing, properly speaking, will have no place in life
 at all.  He is, indeed, trying to create a world in which there will be
 no life for dancing to have a place in. The very fact that Mr. McCabe
 thinks of dancing as a thing belonging to some hired women at the
 Alhambra is an illustration of the same principle by which he is able
 to think of religion as a thing belonging to some hired men in white
 neckties. Both these things are things which should not be done for us,
 but by us.  If Mr. McCabe were really religious he would be happy. If
 he were really happy he would dance.
 
 Briefly, we may put the matter in this way.  The main point of modern
 life is not that the Alhambra ballet has its place in life. The main
 point, the main enormous tragedy of modern life, is that Mr. McCabe has
 not his place in the Alhambra ballet. The joy of changing and graceful
 posture, the joy of suiting the swing of music to the swing of limbs,
 the joy of whirling drapery, the joy of standing on one leg,--all these
 should belong by rights to Mr. McCabe and to me; in short, to the
 ordinary healthy citizen. Probably we should not consent to go through
 these evolutions. But that is because we are miserable moderns and
 rationalists. We do not merely love ourselves more than we love duty;
 we actually love ourselves more than we love joy.
 
 When, therefore, Mr. McCabe says that he gives the Alhambra dances (and
--**--**--
 could see nothing but barbarism in the ethereal energy of Gothic.
 
 This bias against morality among the modern aesthetes is nothing very
 much paraded.  And yet it is not really a bias against morality; it is
 a bias against other people's morality.  It is generally founded on a
 very definite moral preference for a certain sort of life, pagan,
 plausible, humane.  The modern aesthete, wishing us to believe that he
 values beauty more than conduct, reads Mallarme, and drinks absinthe in
 a tavern.  But this is not only his favourite kind of beauty; it is
 also his favourite kind of conduct. If he really wished us to believe
 that he cared for beauty only, he ought to go to nothing but Wesleyan
 school treats, and paint the sunlight in the hair of the Wesleyan
 babies.  He ought to read nothing but very eloquent theological sermons
 by old-fashioned Presbyterian divines.  Here the lack of all possible
 moral sympathy would prove that his interest was purely verbal or
 pictorial, as it is; in all the books he reads and writes he clings to
 the skirts of his own morality and his own immorality.  The champion of
 l'art pour l'art is always denouncing Ruskin for his moralizing. If he
 were really a champion of l'art pour l'art, he would be always
 insisting on Ruskin for his style.
 
 The doctrine of the distinction between art and morality owes a great
 part of its success to art and morality being hopelessly mixed up in
 the persons and performances of its greatest exponents. Of this lucky
 contradiction the very incarnation was Whistler. No man ever preached
 the impersonality of art so well; no man ever preached the
 impersonality of art so personally. For him pictures had nothing to do
 with the problems of character; but for all his fiercest admirers his
--**--**--
 sense he loves his enemy, and by a kind of exaggeration of Christianity
 he loves his enemy the more the more he becomes an enemy. He has a sort
 of overwhelming and aggressive happiness in his assertion of anger; his
 curse is as human as a benediction. Of this type of satire the great
 example is Rabelais.  This is the first typical example of satire, the
 satire which is voluble, which is violent, which is indecent, but which
 is not malicious. The satire of Whistler was not this.  He was never in
 any of his controversies simply happy; the proof of it is that he never
 talked absolute nonsense.  There is a second type of mind which
 produces satire with the quality of greatness.  That is embodied in the
 satirist whose passions are released and let go by some intolerable
 sense of wrong. He is maddened by the sense of men being maddened; his
 tongue becomes an unruly member, and testifies against all mankind.
 Such a man was Swift, in whom the saeva indignatio was a bitterness to
 others, because it was a bitterness to himself.  Such a satirist
 Whistler was not.  He did not laugh because he was happy, like
 Rabelais. But neither did he laugh because he was unhappy, like Swift.
 
 The third type of great satire is that in which he satirist is enabled
 to rise superior to his victim in the only serious sense which
 superiority can bear, in that of pitying the sinner and respecting the
 man even while he satirises both.  Such an achievement can be found in
 a thing like Pope's "Atticus" a poem in which the satirist feels that
 he is satirising the weaknesses which belong specially to literary
 genius.  Consequently he takes a pleasure in pointing out his enemy's
 strength before he points out his weakness. That is, perhaps, the
--**--**--
 happened to stand about Him. "What man of you having a hundred sheep,
 and losing one, would not leave the ninety and nine in the wilderness,
 and go after that which was lost?" Or, again, "What man of you if his
 son ask for bread will he give him a stone, or if he ask for a fish
 will he give him a serpent?" This plainness, this almost prosaic
 camaraderie, is the note of all very great minds.
 
 To very great minds the things on which men agree are so immeasurably
 more important than the things on which they differ, that the latter,
 for all practical purposes, disappear.  They have too much in them of
 an ancient laughter even to endure to discuss the difference between
 the hats of two men who were both born of a woman, or between the
 subtly varied cultures of two men who have both to die. The first-rate
 great man is equal with other men, like Shakespeare. The second-rate
 great man is on his knees to other men, like Whitman. The third-rate
 great man is superior to other men, like Whistler.
 
 
 
 XVIII The Fallacy of the Young Nation
 
 To say that a man is an idealist is merely to say that he is a man;
 but, nevertheless, it might be possible to effect some valid
 distinction between one kind of idealist and another. One possible
 distinction, for instance, could be effected by saying that humanity is
 divided into conscious idealists and unconscious idealists. In a
 similar way, humanity is divided into conscious ritualists and
 unconscious ritualists.  The curious thing is, in that example as in
 others, that it is the conscious ritualism which is comparatively
 simple, the unconscious ritual which is really heavy and complicated.
 The ritual which is comparatively rude and straightforward is the
--**--**--
 conscious ritualists are generally satisfied with a few very simple and
 elementary signs; the unconscious ritualists are not satisfied with
 anything short of the whole of human life, being almost insanely
 ritualistic. The first is called a ritualist because he invents and
 remembers one rite; the other is called an anti-ritualist because he
 obeys and forgets a thousand.  And a somewhat similar distinction to
 this which I have drawn with some unavoidable length, between the
 conscious ritualist and the unconscious ritualist, exists between the
 conscious idealist and the unconscious idealist. It is idle to inveigh
 against cynics and materialists--there are no cynics, there are no
 materialists.  Every man is idealistic; only it so often happens that
 he has the wrong ideal. Every man is incurably sentimental; but,
 unfortunately, it is so often a false sentiment.  When we talk, for
 instance, of some unscrupulous commercial figure, and say that he would
 do anything for money, we use quite an inaccurate expression, and we
 slander him very much. He would not do anything for money.  He would do
 some things for money; he would sell his soul for money, for instance;
 and, as Mirabeau humorously said, he would be quite wise "to take money
 for muck." He would oppress humanity for money; but then it happens
 that humanity and the soul are not things that he believes in; they are
 not his ideals. But he has his own dim and delicate ideals; and he
 would not violate these for money.  He would not drink out of the
 soup-tureen, for money. He would not wear his coat-tails in front, for
 money.  He would not spread a report that he had softening of the
 brain, for money. In the actual practice of life we find, in the matter
 of ideals, exactly what we have already found in the matter of ritual.
--**--**--
 politicians seem to think that a man becomes practical merely by making
 assertions entirely about practical things. Apparently, a delusion does
 not matter as long as it is a materialistic delusion.  Instinctively
 most of us feel that, as a practical matter, even the contrary is true.
 I certainly would much rather share my apartments with a gentleman who
 thought he was God than with a gentleman who thought he was a
 grasshopper. To be continually haunted by practical images and
 practical problems, to be constantly thinking of things as actual, as
 urgent, as in process of completion--these things do not prove a man to
 be practical; these things, indeed, are among the most ordinary signs
 of a lunatic. That our modern statesmen are materialistic is nothing
 against their being also morbid.  Seeing angels in a vision may make a
 man a supernaturalist to excess.  But merely seeing snakes in delirium
 tremens does not make him a naturalist.
 
 And when we come actually to examine the main stock notions of our
 modern practical politicians, we find that those main stock notions are
 mainly delusions.  A great many instances might be given of the fact.
 We might take, for example, the case of that strange class of notions
 which underlie the word "union," and all the eulogies heaped upon it.
 Of course, union is no more a good thing in itself than separation is a
 good thing in itself.  To have a party in favour of union and a party
 in favour of separation is as absurd as to have a party in favour of
 going upstairs and a party in favour of going downstairs. The question
 is not whether we go up or down stairs, but where we are going to, and
 what we are going, for?  Union is strength; union is also weakness.  It
--**--**--
 minds and speeches of all the practical men of all parties; and it is a
 childish blunder built upon a single false metaphor. I refer to the
 universal modern talk about young nations and new nations; about
 America being young, about New Zealand being new.  The whole thing is a
 trick of words.  America is not young, New Zealand is not new. It is a
 very discussable question whether they are not both much older than
 England or Ireland.
 
 Of course we may use the metaphor of youth about America or the
 colonies, if we use it strictly as implying only a recent origin. But
 if we use it (as we do use it) as implying vigour, or vivacity, or
 crudity, or inexperience, or hope, or a long life before them or any of
 the romantic attributes of youth, then it is surely as clear as
 daylight that we are duped by a stale figure of speech. We can easily
 see the matter clearly by applying it to any other institution parallel
 to the institution of an independent nationality. If a club called "The
 Milk and Soda League" (let us say) was set up yesterday, as I have no
 doubt it was, then, of course, "The Milk and Soda League" is a young
 club in the sense that it was set up yesterday, but in no other sense.
 It may consist entirely of moribund old gentlemen.  It may be moribund
 itself. We may call it a young club, in the light of the fact that it
 was founded yesterday.  We may also call it a very old club in the
 light of the fact that it will most probably go bankrupt to-morrow. All
 this appears very obvious when we put it in this form. Any one who
 adopted the young-community delusion with regard to a bank or a
--**--**--
 will freely admit that the stories of these geniuses smell of nothing
 but printer's ink, and that not of first-rate quality. By a great
 effort of Imperial imagination the generous English people reads into
 these works a force and a novelty. But the force and the novelty are
 not in the new writers; the force and the novelty are in the ancient
 heart of the English. Anybody who studies them impartially will know
 that the first-rate writers of the colonies are not even particularly
 novel in their note and atmosphere, are not only not producing a new
 kind of good literature, but are not even in any particular sense
 producing a new kind of bad literature.  The first-rate writers of the
 new countries are really almost exactly like the second-rate writers of
 the old countries.  Of course they do feel the mystery of the
 wilderness, the mystery of the bush, for all simple and honest men feel
 this in Melbourne, or Margate, or South St. Pancras. But when they
 write most sincerely and most successfully, it is not with a background
 of the mystery of the bush, but with a background, expressed or
 assumed, of our own romantic cockney civilization. What really moves
 their souls with a kindly terror is not the mystery of the wilderness,
 but the Mystery of a Hansom Cab.
 
 Of course there are some exceptions to this generalization. The one
 really arresting exception is Olive Schreiner, and she is quite as
 certainly an exception that proves the rule. Olive Schreiner is a
 fierce, brilliant, and realistic novelist; but she is all this
 precisely because she is not English at all. Her tribal kinship is with
 the country of Teniers and Maarten Maartens--that is, with a country of
 realists.  Her literary kinship is with the pessimistic fiction of the
--**--**--
 are three stages in the life of a strong people. First, it is a small
 power, and fights small powers.  Then it is a great power, and fights
 great powers.  Then it is a great power, and fights small powers, but
 pretends that they are great powers, in order to rekindle the ashes of
 its ancient emotion and vanity. After that, the next step is to become
 a small power itself. England exhibited this symptom of decadence very
 badly in the war with the Transvaal; but America exhibited it worse in
 the war with Spain. There was exhibited more sharply and absurdly than
 anywhere else the ironic contrast between the very careless choice of a
 strong line and the very careful choice of a weak enemy. America added
 to all her other late Roman or Byzantine elements the element of the
 Caracallan triumph, the triumph over nobody.
 
 But when we come to the last test of nationality, the test of art and
 letters, the case is almost terrible.  The English colonies have
 produced no great artists; and that fact may prove that they are still
 full of silent possibilities and reserve force. But America has
 produced great artists.  And that fact most certainly proves that she
 is full of a fine futility and the end of all things. Whatever the
 American men of genius are, they are not young gods making a young
 world.  Is the art of Whistler a brave, barbaric art, happy and
 headlong?  Does Mr. Henry James infect us with the spirit of a
 schoolboy?  No; the colonies have not spoken, and they are safe. Their
 silence may be the silence of the unborn.  But out of America has come
 a sweet and startling cry, as unmistakable as the cry of a dying man.
 
 
 
 XIX Slum Novelists and the Slums
--**--**--
 Hereditary despotism is, then, in essence and sentiment democratic
 because it chooses from mankind at random. If it does not declare that
 every man may rule, it declares the next most democratic thing; it
 declares that any man may rule. Hereditary aristocracy is a far worse
 and more dangerous thing, because the numbers and multiplicity of an
 aristocracy make it sometimes possible for it to figure as an
 aristocracy of intellect. Some of its members will presumably have
 brains, and thus they, at any rate, will be an intellectual aristocracy
 within the social one. They will rule the aristocracy by virtue of
 their intellect, and they will rule the country by virtue of their
 aristocracy. Thus a double falsity will be set up, and millions of the
 images of God, who, fortunately for their wives and families, are
 neither gentlemen nor clever men, will be represented by a man like Mr.
 Balfour or Mr. Wyndham, because he is too gentlemanly to be called
 merely clever, and just too clever to be called merely a gentleman. But
 even an hereditary aristocracy may exhibit, by a sort of accident, from
 time to time some of the basically democratic quality which belongs to
 a hereditary despotism.  It is amusing to think how much conservative
 ingenuity has been wasted in the defence of the House of Lords by men
 who were desperately endeavouring to prove that the House of Lords
 consisted of clever men.  There is one really good defence of the House
 of Lords, though admirers of the peerage are strangely coy about using
 it; and that is, that the House of Lords, in its full and proper
 strength, consists of stupid men. It really would be a plausible
 defence of that otherwise indefensible body to point out that the
 clever men in the Commons, who owed their power to cleverness, ought in
--**--**--
 educated are sins at all. We are always talking about the sin of
 intemperate drinking, because it is quite obvious that the poor have it
 more than the rich. But we are always denying that there is any such
 thing as the sin of pride, because it would be quite obvious that the
 rich have it more than the poor. We are always ready to make a saint or
 prophet of the educated man who goes into cottages to give a little
 kindly advice to the uneducated. But the medieval idea of a saint or
 prophet was something quite different. The mediaeval saint or prophet
 was an uneducated man who walked into grand houses to give a little
 kindly advice to the educated. The old tyrants had enough insolence to
 despoil the poor, but they had not enough insolence to preach to them.
 It was the gentleman who oppressed the slums; but it was the slums that
 admonished the gentleman.  And just as we are undemocratic in faith and
 morals, so we are, by the very nature of our attitude in such matters,
 undemocratic in the tone of our practical politics. It is a sufficient
 proof that we are not an essentially democratic state that we are
 always wondering what we shall do with the poor. If we were democrats,
 we should be wondering what the poor will do with us. With us the
 governing class is always saying to itself, "What laws shall we make?"
 In a purely democratic state it would be always saying, "What laws can
 we obey?"  A purely democratic state perhaps there has never been.  But
 even the feudal ages were in practice thus far democratic, that every
 feudal potentate knew that any laws which he made would in all
 probability return upon himself. His feathers might be cut off for
--**--**--
 act. But it is not permissible to present men as regarding themselves
 as monsters, or as making themselves jump.  To summarize, our slum
 fiction is quite defensible as aesthetic fiction; it is not defensible
 as spiritual fact.
 
 One enormous obstacle stands in the way of its actuality. The men who
 write it, and the men who read it, are men of the middle classes or the
 upper classes; at least, of those who are loosely termed the educated
 classes.  Hence, the fact that it is the life as the refined man sees
 it proves that it cannot be the life as the unrefined man lives it.
 Rich men write stories about poor men, and describe them as speaking
 with a coarse, or heavy, or husky enunciation. But if poor men wrote
 novels about you or me they would describe us as speaking with some
 absurd shrill and affected voice, such as we only hear from a duchess
 in a three-act farce.  The slum novelist gains his whole effect by the
 fact that some detail is strange to the reader; but that detail by the
 nature of the case cannot be strange in itself. It cannot be strange to
 the soul which he is professing to study. The slum novelist gains his
 effects by describing the same grey mist as draping the dingy factory
 and the dingy tavern.  But to the man he is supposed to be studying
 there must be exactly the same difference between the factory and the
 tavern that there is to a middle-class man between a late night at the
 office and a supper at Pagani's. The slum novelist is content with
 pointing out that to the eye of his particular class a pickaxe looks
 dirty and a pewter pot looks dirty. But the man he is supposed to be
--**--**--
 Dean Farrar's "Eric; or, Little by Little."  But "Eric" is immeasurably
 more like real school-life. For real school-life, real boyhood, is full
 of the things of which Eric is full--priggishness, a crude piety, a
 silly sin, a weak but continual attempt at the heroic, in a word,
 melodrama. And if we wish to lay a firm basis for any efforts to help
 the poor, we must not become realistic and see them from the outside.
 We must become melodramatic, and see them from the inside. The novelist
 must not take out his notebook and say, "I am an expert."  No; he must
 imitate the workman in the Adelphi play. He must slap himself on the
 chest and say, "I am a man."
 
 
 
 XX.  Concluding Remarks on the Importance of Orthodoxy
 
 Whether the human mind can advance or not, is a question too little
 discussed, for nothing can be more dangerous than to found our social
 philosophy on any theory which is debatable but has not been debated.
 But if we assume, for the sake of argument, that there has been in the
 past, or will be in the future, such a thing as a growth or improvement
 of the human mind itself, there still remains a very sharp objection to
 be raised against the modern version of that improvement.  The vice of
 the modern notion of mental progress is that it is always something
 concerned with the breaking of bonds, the effacing of boundaries, the
 casting away of dogmas.  But if there be such a thing as mental growth,
 it must mean the growth into more and more definite convictions, into
 more and more dogmas.  The human brain is a machine for coming to
 conclusions; if it cannot come to conclusions it is rusty. When we hear
 of a man too clever to believe, we are hearing of something having
--**--**--
 stories. And when they got them, they got them from a couple of
 moralists. The best short stories were written by a man trying to
 preach Imperialism. The best plays were written by a man trying to
 preach Socialism. All the art of all the artists looked tiny and
 tedious beside the art which was a byproduct of propaganda.
 
 The reason, indeed, is very simple.  A man cannot be wise enough to be
 a great artist without being wise enough to wish to be a philosopher. A
 man cannot have the energy to produce good art without having the
 energy to wish to pass beyond it.  A small artist is content with art;
 a great artist is content with nothing except everything. So we find
 that when real forces, good or bad, like Kipling and G. B. S., enter
 our arena, they bring with them not only startling and arresting art,
 but very startling and arresting dogmas.  And they care even more, and
 desire us to care even more, about their startling and arresting dogmas
 than about their startling and arresting art. Mr. Shaw is a good
 dramatist, but what he desires more than anything else to be is a good
 politician.  Mr. Rudyard Kipling is by divine caprice and natural
 genius an unconventional poet; but what he desires more than anything
 else to be is a conventional poet. He desires to be the poet of his
 people, bone of their bone, and flesh of their flesh, understanding
 their origins, celebrating their destiny. He desires to be Poet
 Laureate, a most sensible and honourable and public-spirited desire.
 Having been given by the gods originality--that is, disagreement with
 others--he desires divinely to agree with them. But the most striking
 instance of all, more striking, I think, even than either of these, is
--**--**--
 that stood first were "Soldiers Three," by a Mr. Rudyard Kipling; "Arms
 and the Man," by a Mr. Bernard Shaw; and "The Time Machine," by a man
 called Wells. And all these men have shown themselves ingrainedly
 didactic. You may express the matter if you will by saying that if we
 want doctrines we go to the great artists.  But it is clear from the
 psychology of the matter that this is not the true statement; the true
 statement is that when we want any art tolerably brisk and bold we have
 to go to the doctrinaires.
 
 In concluding this book, therefore, I would ask, first and foremost,
 that men such as these of whom I have spoken should not be insulted by
 being taken for artists.  No man has any right whatever merely to enjoy
 the work of Mr. Bernard Shaw; he might as well enjoy the invasion of
 his country by the French.  Mr. Shaw writes either to convince or to
 enrage us.  No man has any business to be a Kiplingite without being a
 politician, and an Imperialist politician. If a man is first with us,
 it should be because of what is first with him. If a man convinces us
 at all, it should be by his convictions. If we hate a poem of Kipling's
 from political passion, we are hating it for the same reason that the
 poet loved it; if we dislike him because of his opinions, we are
 disliking him for the best of all possible reasons. If a man comes into
 Hyde Park to preach it is permissible to hoot him; but it is
 discourteous to applaud him as a performing bear. And an artist is only
 a performing bear compared with the meanest man who fancies he has
 anything to say.
--**--**--
 faggots; it was the hands of the indifferent that turned the rack.
 There have come some persecutions out of the pain of a passionate
 certainty; but these produced, not bigotry, but fanaticism--a very
 different and a somewhat admirable thing.  Bigotry in the main has
 always been the pervading omnipotence of those who do not care crushing
 out those who care in darkness and blood.
 
 There are people, however, who dig somewhat deeper than this into the
 possible evils of dogma.  It is felt by many that strong philosophical
 conviction, while it does not (as they perceive) produce that sluggish
 and fundamentally frivolous condition which we call bigotry, does
 produce a certain concentration, exaggeration, and moral impatience,
 which we may agree to call fanaticism. They say, in brief, that ideas
 are dangerous things. In politics, for example, it is commonly urged
 against a man like Mr. Balfour, or against a man like Mr. John Morley,
 that a wealth of ideas is dangerous.  The true doctrine on this point,
 again, is surely not very difficult to state.  Ideas are dangerous, but
 the man to whom they are least dangerous is the man of ideas. He is
 acquainted with ideas, and moves among them like a lion-tamer. Ideas
 are dangerous, but the man to whom they are most dangerous is the man
 of no ideas.  The man of no ideas will find the first idea fly to his
 head like wine to the head of a teetotaller. It is a common error, I
 think, among the Radical idealists of my own party and period to
 suggest that financiers and business men are a danger to the empire
 because they are so sordid or so materialistic. The truth is that
 financiers and business men are a danger to the empire because they can
--**--**--
 Cosmos as a dream, we regard the Fiscal Question as a dream. If we
 regard the Cosmos as a joke, we regard St. Paul's Cathedral as a joke.
 If everything is bad, then we must believe (if it be possible) that
 beer is bad; if everything be good, we are forced to the rather
 fantastic conclusion that scientific philanthropy is good.  Every man
 in the street must hold a metaphysical system, and hold it firmly. The
 possibility is that he may have held it so firmly and so long as to
 have forgotten all about its existence.
 
 This latter situation is certainly possible; in fact, it is the
 situation of the whole modern world.  The modern world is filled with
 men who hold dogmas so strongly that they do not even know that they
 are dogmas. It may be said even that the modern world, as a corporate
 body, holds certain dogmas so strongly that it does not know that they
 are dogmas.  It may be thought "dogmatic," for instance, in some
 circles accounted progressive, to assume the perfection or improvement
 of man in another world.  But it is not thought "dogmatic" to assume
 the perfection or improvement of man in this world; though that idea of
 progress is quite as unproved as the idea of immortality, and from a
 rationalistic point of view quite as improbable. Progress happens to be
 one of our dogmas, and a dogma means a thing which is not thought
 dogmatic.  Or, again, we see nothing "dogmatic" in the inspiring, but
 certainly most startling, theory of physical science, that we should
 collect facts for the sake of facts, even though they seem as useless
 as sticks and straws. This is a great and suggestive idea, and its
 utility may, if you will, be proving itself, but its utility is, in the
--**--**--
 being in this a perfect foil to his brilliant compatriot and
 contemporary, Wilde. He cast his theories in dramatic forms merely
 because no other course except silence or physical revolt was open to
 him. For a long time it seemed as if this resource too was doomed to
 fail him. But finally he has attained a hearing and now attempts at
 suppression merely serve to advertise their victim.
 
 It will repay those who seek analogies in literature to compare Shaw
 with Cervantes. After a life of heroic endeavor, disappointment,
 slavery, and poverty, the author of "Don Quixote" gave the world a
 serious work which caused to be laughed off the world's stage forever
 the final vestiges of decadent chivalry.
 
 The institution had long been outgrown, but its vernacular continued to
 be the speech and to express the thought "of the world and among the
 vulgar," as the quaint, old novelist puts it, just as to-day the novel
 intended for the consumption of the unenlightened must deal with peers
 and millionaires and be dressed in stilted language. Marvellously he
 succeeded, but in a way he least intended. We have not yet, after so
 many years, determined whether it is a work to laugh or cry over. "It is
 our joyfullest modern book," says Carlyle, while Landor thinks that
 "readers who see nothing more than a burlesque in 'Don Quixote' have but
 shallow appreciation of the work."
 
 Shaw in like manner comes upon the scene when many of our social usages
 are outworn. He sees the fact, announces it, and we burst into guffaws.
 The continuous laughter which greets Shaw's plays arises from a real
 contrast in the point of view of the dramatist and his audiences. When
 Pinero or Jones describes a whimsical situation we never doubt for a
 moment that the author's point of view is our own and that the abnormal
--**--**--
 the hopelessly de-moralized manufacturer, the conventional and hence
 emotional typist make up a group which the drama of any language may be
 challenged to rival.
 
 In "The Man of Destiny" the object of the dramatist is not so much the
 destruction as the explanation of the Napoleonic tradition, which has so
 powerfully influenced generation after generation for a century. However
 the man may be regarded, he was a miracle. Shaw shows that he achieved
 his extraordinary career by suspending, for himself, the pressure of the
 moral and conventional atmosphere, while leaving it operative for
 others. Those who study this play--extravaganza, that it is--will attain
 a clearer comprehension of Napoleon than they can get from all the
 biographies.
 
 "You Never Can Tell" offers an amusing study of the play of social
 conventions. The "twins" illustrate the disconcerting effects of that
 perfect frankness which would make life intolerable. Gloria demonstrates
 the powerlessness of reason to overcome natural instincts. The idea that
 parental duties and functions can be fulfilled by the light of such
 knowledge as man and woman attain by intuition is brilliantly lampooned.
 Crampton, the father, typifies the common superstition that among the
 privileges of parenthood are inflexibility, tyranny, and respect, the
 last entirely regardless of whether it has been deserved.
 
 The waiter, William, is the best illustration of the man "who knows his
 place" that the stage has seen. He is the most pathetic figure of the
 play. One touch of verisimilitude is lacking; none of the guests gives
 him a tip, yet he maintains his urbanity. As Mr. Shaw has not yet
 visited America he may be unaware of the improbability of this
 situation.
 
 To those who regard literary men merely as purveyors of amusement for
 people who have not wit enough to entertain themselves, Ibsen and Shaw,
--**--**--
     beautiful in the starlit snow. The interior of the
     room is not like anything to be seen in the east
     of Europe. It is half rich Bulgarian, half cheap
     Viennese. The counterpane and hangings of the bed,
     the window curtains, the little carpet, and all
     the ornamental textile fabrics in the room are
     oriental and gorgeous: the paper on the walls is
     occidental and paltry. Above the head of the bed,
     which stands against a little wall cutting off the
     right hand corner of the room diagonally, is a
     painted wooden shrine, blue and gold, with an
     ivory image of Christ, and a light hanging before
     it in a pierced metal ball suspended by three
     chains. On the left, further forward, is an
     ottoman. The washstand, against the wall on the
     left, consists of an enamelled iron basin with a
     pail beneath it in a painted metal frame, and a
     single towel on the rail at the side. A chair near
     it is Austrian bent wood, with cane seat. The
     dressing table, between the bed and the window, is
     an ordinary pine table, covered with a cloth of
     many colors, but with an expensive toilet mirror
     on it. The door is on the right; and there is a
     chest of drawers between the door and the bed.
     This chest of drawers is also covered by a
     variegated native cloth, and on it there is a pile
     of paper backed novels, a box of chocolate creams,
     and a miniature easel, on which is a large
     photograph of an extremely handsome officer, whose
     lofty bearing and magnetic glance can be felt even
     from the portrait. The room is lighted by a candle
     on the chest of drawers, and another on the
     dressing table, with a box of matches beside it.
 
     The window is hinged doorwise and stands wide
--**--**--
 
 RAINA (her eyes dilating). Ah! (She throws the cloak on the
 ottoman, and comes eagerly to Catherine in her nightgown, a
 pretty garment, but evidently the only one she has on.)
 
 CATHERINE. A great battle at Slivnitza! A victory! And it was
 won by Sergius.
 
 RAINA (with a cry of delight). Ah! (Rapturously.) Oh, mother!
 (Then, with sudden anxiety) Is father safe?
 
 CATHERINE. Of course: he sent me the news. Sergius is the hero
 of the hour, the idol of the regiment.
 
 RAINA. Tell me, tell me. How was it! (Ecstatically) Oh, mother,
 mother, mother! (Raina pulls her mother down on the ottoman; and
 they kiss one another frantically.)
 
 CATHERINE (with surging enthusiasm). You can't guess how
 splendid it is. A cavalry charge--think of that! He defied our
 Russian commanders--acted without orders--led a charge on his
 own responsibility--headed it himself--was the first man to
 sweep through their guns. Can't you see it, Raina; our gallant
 splendid Bulgarians with their swords and eyes flashing,
 thundering down like an avalanche and scattering the wretched
 Servian dandies like chaff. And you--you kept Sergius waiting a
 year before you would be betrothed to him. Oh, if you have a
 drop of Bulgarian blood in your veins, you will worship him when
 he comes back.
 
 RAINA. What will he care for my poor little worship after the
 acclamations of a whole army of heroes? But no matter: I am so
 happy--so proud! (She rises and walks about excitedly.) It
 proves that all our ideas were real after all.
 
 CATHERINE (indignantly). Our ideas real! What do you mean?
 
 RAINA. Our ideas of what Sergius would do--our patriotism--our
 heroic ideals. Oh, what faithless little creatures girls are!--I
 sometimes used to doubt whether they were anything but dreams.
 When I buckled on Sergius's sword he looked so noble: it was
--**--**--
 
 RAINA. I wish our people were not so cruel. What glory is there
 in killing wretched fugitives?
 
 CATHERINE (business-like, her housekeeping instincts aroused).
 I must see that everything is made safe downstairs.
 
 RAINA (to Louka). Leave the shutters so that I can just close
 them if I hear any noise.
 
 CATHERINE (authoritatively, turning on her way to the door).
 Oh, no, dear, you must keep them fastened. You would be sure to
 drop off to sleep and leave them open. Make them fast, Louka.
 
 LOUKA. Yes, madam. (She fastens them.)
 
 RAINA. Don't be anxious about me. The moment I hear a shot, I
 shall blow out the candles and roll myself up in bed with my
 ears well covered.
 
 CATHERINE. Quite the wisest thing you can do, my love.
 Good-night.
 
 RAINA. Good-night. (They kiss one another, and Raina's emotion
 comes back for a moment.) Wish me joy of the happiest night of
 my life--if only there are no fugitives.
 
 CATHERINE. Go to bed, dear; and don't think of them. (She goes
 out.)
 
 LOUKA (secretly, to Raina). If you would like the shutters
 open, just give them a push like this. (She pushes them: they
 open: she pulls them to again.) One of them ought to be bolted
 at the bottom; but the bolt's gone.
 
 RAINA (with dignity, reproving her). Thanks, Louka; but we must
 do what we are told. (Louka makes a grimace.) Good-night.
 
 LOUKA (carelessly). Good-night. (She goes out, swaggering.)
 
    (Raina, left alone, goes to the chest of drawers,
     and adores the portrait there with feelings that
     are beyond all expression. She does not kiss it or
     press it to her breast, or shew it any mark of
     bodily affection; but she takes it in her hands
     and elevates it like a priestess.)
 
 RAINA (looking up at the picture with worship.) Oh, I shall
--**--**--
 and his unwashed, unkempt condition make it possible to judge,
 he is a man of middling stature and undistinguished appearance,
 with strong neck and shoulders, a roundish, obstinate looking
 head covered with short crisp bronze curls, clear quick blue
 eyes and good brows and mouth, a hopelessly prosaic nose like
 that of a strong-minded baby, trim soldierlike carriage and
 energetic manner, and with all his wits about him in spite of
 his desperate predicament--even with a sense of humor of it,
 without, however, the least intention of trifling with it or
 throwing away a chance. He reckons up what he can guess about
 Raina--her age, her social position, her character, the extent
 to which she is frightened--at a glance, and continues, more
 politely but still most determinedly) Excuse my disturbing you;
 but you recognise my uniform--Servian. If I'm caught I shall be
 killed. (Determinedly.) Do you understand that?
 
 RAINA. Yes.
 
 MAN. Well, I don't intend to get killed if I can help it. (Still
 more determinedly.) Do you understand that? (He locks the door
 with a snap.)
 
 RAINA (disdainfully). I suppose not. (She draws herself up
 superbly, and looks him straight in the face, saying with
 emphasis) Some soldiers, I know, are afraid of death.
 
 MAN (with grim goodhumor). All of them, dear lady, all of them,
 believe me. It is our duty to live as long as we can, and kill
 as many of the enemy as we can. Now if you raise an alarm--
 
 RAINA (cutting him short). You will shoot me. How do you know
 that I am afraid to die?
 
 MAN (cunningly). Ah; but suppose I don't shoot you, what will
 happen then? Why, a lot of your cavalry--the greatest
 blackguards in your army--will burst into this pretty room of
 yours and slaughter me here like a pig; for I'll fight like a
--**--**--
 RAINA (impulsively). I'll help you. Hide yourself, oh, hide
 yourself, quick, behind the curtain. (She seizes him by a torn
 strip of his sleeve, and pulls him towards the window.)
 
 MAN (yielding to her). There is just half a chance, if you keep
 your head. Remember: nine soldiers out of ten are born fools.
 (He hides behind the curtain, looking out for a moment to say,
 finally) If they find me, I promise you a fight--a devil of a
 fight! (He disappears. Raina takes of the cloak and throws it
 across the foot of the bed. Then with a sleepy, disturbed air,
 she opens the door. Louka enters excitedly.)
 
 LOUKA. A man has been seen climbing up the water-pipe to your
 balcony--a Servian. The soldiers want to search for him; and
 they are so wild and drunk and furious. My lady says you are to
 dress at once.
 
 RAINA (as if annoyed at being disturbed). They shall not search
 here. Why have they been let in?
 
 CATHERINE (coming in hastily). Raina, darling, are you safe?
 Have you seen anyone or heard anything?
 
 RAINA. I heard the shooting. Surely the soldiers will not dare
 come in here?
 
 CATHERINE. I have found a Russian officer, thank Heaven: he
 knows Sergius. (Speaking through the door to someone outside.)
 Sir, will you come in now! My daughter is ready.
 
     (A young Russian officer, in Bulgarian uniform,
      enters, sword in hand.)
 
 THE OFFICER. (with soft, feline politeness and stiff military
 carriage). Good evening, gracious lady; I am sorry to intrude,
 but there is a fugitive hiding on the balcony. Will you and the
 gracious lady your mother please to withdraw whilst we search?
 
 RAINA (petulantly). Nonsense, sir, you can see that there is no
 one on the balcony. (She throws the shutters wide open and
--**--**--
 their army for them. We hate them!
 
 MAN. Austrian! not I. Don't hate me, dear young lady. I am only
 a Swiss, fighting merely as a professional soldier. I joined
 Servia because it was nearest to me. Be generous: you've beaten
 us hollow.
 
 RAINA. Have I not been generous?
 
 MAN. Noble!--heroic! But I'm not saved yet. This particular rush
 will soon pass through; but the pursuit will go on all night by
 fits and starts. I must take my chance to get off during a quiet
 interval. You don't mind my waiting just a minute or two, do
 you?
 
 RAINA. Oh, no: I am sorry you will have to go into danger again.
 (Motioning towards ottoman.) Won't you sit--(She breaks off
 with an irrepressible cry of alarm as she catches sight of the
 pistol. The man, all nerves, shies like a frightened horse.)
 
 MAN (irritably). Don't frighten me like that. What is it?
 
 RAINA. Your pistol! It was staring that officer in the face all
 the time. What an escape!
 
 MAN (vexed at being unnecessarily terrified). Oh, is that all?
 
 RAINA (staring at him rather superciliously, conceiving a
 poorer and poorer opinion of him, and feeling proportionately
 more and more at her ease with him). I am sorry I frightened
 you. (She takes up the pistol and hands it to him.) Pray take it
 to protect yourself against me.
 
 MAN (grinning wearily at the sarcasm as he takes the pistol).
 No use, dear young lady: there's nothing in it. It's not loaded.
 (He makes a grimace at it, and drops it disparagingly into his
 revolver case.)
 
 RAINA. Load it by all means.
 
 MAN. I've no ammunition. What use are cartridges in battle? I
 always carry chocolate instead; and I finished the last cake of
 that yesterday.
 
 RAINA (outraged in her most cherished ideals of manhood).
--**--**--
 
 MAN. Oh, yes, they are. There are only two sorts of soldiers:
 old ones and young ones. I've served fourteen years: half of
 your fellows never smelt powder before. Why, how is it that
 you've just beaten us? Sheer ignorance of the art of war,
 nothing else. (Indignantly.) I never saw anything so
 unprofessional.
 
 RAINA (ironically). Oh, was it unprofessional to beat you?
 
 MAN. Well, come, is it professional to throw a regiment of
 cavalry on a battery of machine guns, with the dead certainty
 that if the guns go off not a horse or man will ever get within
 fifty yards of the fire? I couldn't believe my eyes when I saw
 it.
 
 RAINA (eagerly turning to him, as all her enthusiasm and her
 dream of glory rush back on her). Did you see the great cavalry
 charge? Oh, tell me about it. Describe it to me.
 
 MAN. You never saw a cavalry charge, did you?
 
 RAINA. How could I?
 
 MAN. Ah, perhaps not--of course. Well, it's a funny sight. It's
 like slinging a handful of peas against a window pane: first one
 comes; then two or three close behind him; and then all the rest
 in a lump.
 
 RAINA (her eyes dilating as she raises her clasped hands
 ecstatically). Yes, first One!--the bravest of the brave!
 
 MAN (prosaically). Hm! you should see the poor devil pulling at
 his horse.
 
 RAINA. Why should he pull at his horse?
 
 MAN (impatient of so stupid a question). It's running away with
 him, of course: do you suppose the fellow wants to get there
 before the others and be killed? Then they all come. You can
 tell the young ones by their wildness and their slashing. The
 old ones come bunched up under the number one guard: they know
 that they are mere projectiles, and that it's no use trying to
--**--**--
 pistol missed fire, that's all.
 
 RAINA (deeply wounded, but steadfastly loyal to her ideals).
 Indeed! Would you know him again if you saw him?
 
 MAN. Shall I ever forget him. (She again goes to the chest of
 drawers. He watches her with a vague hope that she may have
 something else for him to eat. She takes the portrait from its
 stand and brings it to him.)
 
 RAINA. That is a photograph of the gentleman--the patriot and
 hero--to whom I am betrothed.
 
 MAN (looking at it). I'm really very sorry. (Looking at her.)
 Was it fair to lead me on? (He looks at the portrait again.)
 Yes: that's him: not a doubt of it. (He stifles a laugh.)
 
 RAINA (quickly). Why do you laugh?
 
 MAN (shamefacedly, but still greatly tickled). I didn't laugh,
 I assure you. At least I didn't mean to. But when I think of him
 charging the windmills and thinking he was doing the finest
 thing--(chokes with suppressed laughter).
 
 RAINA (sternly). Give me back the portrait, sir.
 
 MAN (with sincere remorse). Of course. Certainly. I'm really
 very sorry. (She deliberately kisses it, and looks him straight
 in the face, before returning to the chest of drawers to replace
 it. He follows her, apologizing.) Perhaps I'm quite wrong, you
 know: no doubt I am. Most likely he had got wind of the
 cartridge business somehow, and knew it was a safe job.
 
 RAINA. That is to say, he was a pretender and a coward! You did
 not dare say that before.
 
 MAN (with a comic gesture of despair). It's no use, dear lady:
 I can't make you see it from the professional point of view. (As
 he turns away to get back to the ottoman, the firing begins
 again in the distance.)
 
 RAINA (sternly, as she sees him listening to the shots). So
--**--**--
 on the chest, and adds)--Do you hear that, you chocolate cream
 soldier? (He turns to the window.)
 
 RAINA (anxiously). But if you fall?
 
 MAN. I shall sleep as if the stones were a feather bed.
 Good-bye. (He makes boldly for the window, and his hand is on
 the shutter when there is a terrible burst of firing in the
 street beneath.)
 
 RAINA (rushing to him). Stop! (She catches him by the shoulder,
 and turns him quite round.) They'll kill you.
 
 MAN (coolly, but attentively). Never mind: this sort of thing
 is all in my day's work. I'm bound to take my chance.
 (Decisively.) Now do what I tell you. Put out the candles, so
 that they shan't see the light when I open the shutters. And
 keep away from the window, whatever you do. If they see me,
 they're sure to have a shot at me.
 
 RAINA (clinging to him). They're sure to see you: it's bright
 moonlight. I'll save you--oh, how can you be so indifferent? You
 want me to save you, don't you?
 
 MAN. I really don't want to be troublesome. (She shakes him in
 her impatience.) I am not indifferent, dear young lady, I assure
 you. But how is it to be done?
 
 RAINA. Come away from the window--please. (She coaxes him back
 to the middle of the room. He submits humbly. She releases him,
 and addresses him patronizingly.) Now listen. You must trust to
 our hospitality. You do not yet know in whose house you are. I
 am a Petkoff.
 
 MAN. What's that?
 
 RAINA (rather indignantly). I mean that I belong to the family
 of the Petkoffs, the richest and best known in our country.
 
 MAN. Oh, yes, of course. I beg your pardon. The Petkoffs, to be
 sure. How stupid of me!
 
 RAINA. You know you never heard of them until this minute. How
--**--**--
 you the moment they saw your Servian uniform, but among
 civilized people. We go to Bucharest every year for the opera
 season; and I have spent a whole month in Vienna.
 
 MAN. I saw that, dear young lady. I saw at once that you knew
 the world.
 
 RAINA. Have you ever seen the opera of Ernani?
 
 MAN. Is that the one with the devil in it in red velvet, and a
 soldier's chorus?
 
 RAINA (contemptuously). No!
 
 MAN (stifling a heavy sigh of weariness). Then I don't know it.
 
 RAINA. I thought you might have remembered the great scene where
 Ernani, flying from his foes just as you are tonight, takes
 refuge in the castle of his bitterest enemy, an old Castilian
 noble. The noble refuses to give him up. His guest is sacred to
 him.
 
 MAN (quickly waking up a little). Have your people got that
 notion?
 
 RAINA (with dignity). My mother and I can understand that
 notion, as you call it. And if instead of threatening me with
 your pistol as you did, you had simply thrown yourself as a
 fugitive on our hospitality, you would have been as safe as in
 your father's house.
 
 MAN. Quite sure?
 
 RAINA (turning her back on him in disgust.) Oh, it is useless
 to try and make you understand.
 
 MAN. Don't be angry: you see how awkward it would be for me if
 there was any mistake. My father is a very hospitable man: he
 keeps six hotels; but I couldn't trust him as far as that. What
 about YOUR father?
 
 RAINA. He is away at Slivnitza fighting for his country. I
 answer for your safety. There is my hand in pledge of it. Will
 that reassure you? (She offers him her hand.)
 
 MAN (looking dubiously at his own hand). Better not touch my
--**--**--
 MAN (drowsily). Sleep, sleep, sleep, sleep, slee--(The
 words trail off into a murmur. He wakes again with a
 shock on the point of falling.) Where am I? That's what
 I want to know: where am I? Must keep awake. Nothing
 keeps me awake except danger--remember that--(intently)
 danger, danger, danger, dan-- Where's danger? Must
 find it. (He starts of vaguely around the room in search of
 it.) What am I looking for? Sleep--danger--don't know.
 (He stumbles against the bed.) Ah, yes: now I know. All
 right now. I'm to go to bed, but not to sleep--be sure
 not to sleep--because of danger. Not to lie down, either,
 only sit down. (He sits on the bed. A blissful expression
 comes into his face.) Ah! (With a happy sigh he sinks back
 at full length; lifts his boots into the bed with a final
 effort; and falls fast asleep instantly.)
 
     (Catherine comes in, followed by Raina.)
 
 RAINA (looking at the ottoman). He's gone! I left him
 here.
 
 CATHERINE, Here! Then he must have climbed down from the--
 
 RAINA (seeing him). Oh! (She points.)
 
 CATHERINE (scandalized). Well! (She strides to the left
 side of the bed, Raina following and standing opposite her on
 the right.) He's fast asleep. The brute!
 
 RAINA (anxiously). Sh!
 
 CATHERINE (shaking him). Sir! (Shaking him again,
 harder.) Sir!! (Vehemently shaking very bard.) Sir!!!
 
 RAINA (catching her arm). Don't, mamma: the poor dear
 is worn out. Let him sleep.
 
 CATHERINE (letting him go and turning amazed to Raina).
 The poor dear! Raina!!! (She looks sternly at her
 daughter. The man sleeps profoundly.)
 
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
     The sixth of March, 1886. In the garden of major
     Petkoff's house. It is a fine spring morning; and
     the garden looks fresh and pretty. Beyond the
     paling the tops of a couple of minarets can be
--**--**--
 of the family. When I leave their service and start a shop in
 Sofia, their custom will be half my capital: their bad word
 would ruin me.
 
 LOUKA. You have no spirit. I should like to see them dare say a
 word against me!
 
 NICOLA (pityingly). I should have expected more sense from you,
 Louka. But you're young, you're young!
 
 LOUKA. Yes; and you like me the better for it, don't you? But I
 know some family secrets they wouldn't care to have told, young
 as I am. Let them quarrel with me if they dare!
 
 NICOLA (with compassionate superiority). Do you know what they
 would do if they heard you talk like that?
 
 LOUKA. What could they do?
 
 NICOLA. Discharge you for untruthfulness. Who would believe any
 stories you told after that? Who would give you another
 situation? Who in this house would dare be seen speaking to you
 ever again? How long would your father be left on his little
 farm? (She impatiently throws away the end of her cigaret, and
 stamps on it.) Child, you don't know the power such high people
 have over the like of you and me when we try to rise out of our
 poverty against them. (He goes close to her and lowers his
 voice.) Look at me, ten years in their service. Do you think I
 know no secrets? I know things about the mistress that she
 wouldn't have the master know for a thousand levas. I know
 things about him that she wouldn't let him hear the last of for
 six months if I blabbed them to her. I know things about Raina
 that would break off her match with Sergius if--
 
 LOUKA (turning on him quickly). How do you know? I never told
 you!
 
 NICOLA (opening his eyes cunningly). So that's your little
--**--**--
     glad to be home again.)
 
 PETKOFF (pointing to the table with his whip). Breakfast out
 here, eh?
 
 NICOLA. Yes, sir. The mistress and Miss Raina have just gone in.
 
 PETKOFF (fitting down and taking a roll). Go in and say I've
 come; and get me some fresh coffee.
 
 NICOLA. It's coming, sir. (He goes to the house door. Louka,
 with fresh coffee, a clean cup, and a brandy bottle on her tray
 meets him.) Have you told the mistress?
 
 LOUKA. Yes: she's coming.
 
     (Nicola goes into the house. Louka brings the
      coffee to the table.)
 
 PETKOFF. Well, the Servians haven't run away with you, have
 they?
 
 LOUKA. No, sir.
 
 PETKOFF. That's right. Have you brought me some cognac?
 
 LOUKA (putting the bottle on the table). Here, sir.
 
 PETKOFF. That's right. (He pours some into his coffee.)
 
    (Catherine who has at this early hour made only a
     very perfunctory toilet, and wears a Bulgarian
     apron over a once brilliant, but now half worn out
     red dressing gown, and a colored handkerchief tied
     over her thick black hair, with Turkish slippers
     on her bare feet, comes from the house, looking
     astonishingly handsome and stately under all the
     circumstances. Louka goes into the house.)
 
 CATHERINE. My dear Paul, what a surprise for us. (She stoops
 over the back of his chair to kiss him.) Have they brought you
 fresh coffee?
 
 PETKOFF. Yes, Louka's been looking after me. The war's over. The
 treaty was signed three days ago at Bucharest; and the decree
 for our army to demobilize was issued yesterday.
 
 CATHERINE (springing erect, with flashing eyes). The war over!
 Paul: have you let the Austrians force you to make peace?
 
 PETKOFF (submissively). My dear: they didn't consult me. What
 could _I_ do? (She sits down and turns away from him.) But of
--**--**--
 
 CATHERINE. Civilized people never shout for their servants. I've
 learnt that while you were away.
 
 PETKOFF. Well, I'll tell you something I've learnt, too.
 Civilized people don't hang out their washing to dry where
 visitors can see it; so you'd better have all that (indicating
 the clothes on the bushes) put somewhere else.
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, that's absurd, Paul: I don't believe really
 refined people notice such things.
 
     (Someone is heard knocking at the stable gates.)
 
 PETKOFF. There's Sergius. (Shouting.) Hollo, Nicola!
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, don't shout, Paul: it really isn't nice.
 
 PETKOFF. Bosh! (He shouts louder than before.) Nicola!
 
 NICOLA (appearing at the house door). Yes, sir.
 
 PETKOFF. If that is Major Saranoff, bring him round this way.
 (He pronounces the name with the stress on the second
 syllable--Sarah-noff.)
 
 NICOLA. Yes, sir. (He goes into the stable yard.)
 
 PETKOFF. You must talk to him, my dear, until Raina takes him
 off our hands. He bores my life out about our not promoting
 him--over my head, mind you.
 
 CATHERINE. He certainly ought to be promoted when he marries
 Raina. Besides, the country should insist on having at least one
 native general.
 
 PETKOFF. Yes, so that he could throw away whole brigades instead
 of regiments. It's no use, my dear: he has not the slightest
 chance of promotion until we are quite sure that the peace will
 be a lasting one.
 
 NICOLA (at the gate, announcing). Major Sergius Saranoff! (He
 goes into the house and returns presently with a third chair,
 which he places at the table. He then withdraws.)
 
    (Major Sergius Saranoff, the original of the
     portrait in Raina's room, is a tall, romantically
     handsome man, with the physical hardihood, the
     high spirit, and the susceptible imagination of an
     untamed mountaineer chieftain. But his remarkable
     personal distinction is of a characteristically
--**--**--
 himself with conscious grace against the rail of the steps
 leading to the house.)
 
 CATHERINE. You look superb--splendid. The campaign has improved
 you. Everybody here is mad about you. We were all wild with
 enthusiasm about that magnificent cavalry charge.
 
 SERGIUS (with grave irony). Madam: it was the cradle and the
 grave of my military reputation.
 
 CATHERINE. How so?
 
 SERGIUS. I won the battle the wrong way when our worthy Russian
 generals were losing it the right way. That upset their plans,
 and wounded their self-esteem. Two of their colonels got their
 regiments driven back on the correct principles of scientific
 warfare. Two major-generals got killed strictly according to
 military etiquette. Those two colonels are now major-generals;
 and I am still a simple major.
 
 CATHERINE. You shall not remain so, Sergius. The women are on
 your side; and they will see that justice is done you.
 
 SERGIUS. It is too late. I have only waited for the peace to
 send in my resignation.
 
 PETKOFF (dropping his cup in his amazement). Your resignation!
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, you must withdraw it!
 
 SERGIUS (with resolute, measured emphasis, folding his arms). I
 never withdraw!
 
 PETKOFF (vexed). Now who could have supposed you were going to
 do such a thing?
 
 SERGIUS (with fire). Everyone that knew me. But enough of
 myself and my affairs. How is Raina; and where is Raina?
 
 RAINA (suddenly coming round the corner of the house and
 standing at the top of the steps in the path). Raina is here.
 (She makes a charming picture as they all turn to look at her.
 She wears an underdress of pale green silk, draped with an
 overdress of thin ecru canvas embroidered with gold. On her head
 she wears a pretty Phrygian cap of gold tinsel. Sergius, with an
 exclamation of pleasure, goes impulsively to meet her. She
--**--**--
 and keeping out of harm's way when you are weak. That is the
 whole secret of successful fighting. Get your enemy at a
 disadvantage; and never, on any account, fight him on equal
 terms. Eh, Major!
 
 PETKOFF. They wouldn't let us make a fair stand-up fight of it.
 However, I suppose soldiering has to be a trade like any other
 trade.
 
 SERGIUS. Precisely. But I have no ambition to succeed as a
 tradesman; so I have taken the advice of that bagman of a
 captain that settled the exchange of prisoners with us at
 Peerot, and given it up.
 
 PETKOFF. What, that Swiss fellow? Sergius: I've often thought of
 that exchange since. He over-reached us about those horses.
 
 SERGIUS. Of course he over-reached us. His father was a hotel
 and livery stable keeper; and he owed his first step to his
 knowledge of horse-dealing. (With mock enthusiasm.) Ah, he was a
 soldier--every inch a soldier! If only I had bought the horses
 for my regiment instead of foolishly leading it into danger, I
 should have been a field-marshal now!
 
 CATHERINE. A Swiss? What was he doing in the Servian army?
 
 PETKOFF. A volunteer of course--keen on picking up his
 profession. (Chuckling.) We shouldn't have been able to begin
 fighting if these foreigners hadn't shewn us how to do it: we
 knew nothing about it; and neither did the Servians. Egad,
 there'd have been no war without them.
 
 RAINA. Are there many Swiss officers in the Servian Army?
 
 PETKOFF. No--all Austrians, just as our officers were all
 Russians. This was the only Swiss I came across. I'll never
 trust a Swiss again. He cheated us--humbugged us into giving
 him fifty able bodied men for two hundred confounded worn out
 chargers. They weren't even eatable!
 
 SERGIUS. We were two children in the hands of that consummate
--**--**--
 SERGIUS (ashamed). No, Petkoff: I was wrong. (To Raina, with
 earnest humility.) I beg your pardon. I have behaved abominably.
 Forgive me, Raina. (She bows reservedly.) And you, too, madam.
 (Catherine bows graciously and sits down. He proceeds solemnly,
 again addressing Raina.) The glimpses I have had of the seamy
 side of life during the last few months have made me cynical;
 but I should not have brought my cynicism here--least of all
 into your presence, Raina. I--(Here, turning to the others, he
 is evidently about to begin a long speech when the Major
 interrupts him.)
 
 PETKOFF. Stuff and nonsense, Sergius. That's quite enough fuss
 about nothing: a soldier's daughter should be able to stand up
 without flinching to a little strong conversation. (He rises.)
 Come: it's time for us to get to business. We have to make up
 our minds how those three regiments are to get back to
 Phillipopolis:--there's no forage for them on the Sofia route.
 (He goes towards the house.) Come along. (Sergius is about to
 follow him when Catherine rises and intervenes.)
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, Paul, can't you spare Sergius for a few moments?
 Raina has hardly seen him yet. Perhaps I can help you to settle
 about the regiments.
 
 SERGIUS (protesting). My dear madam, impossible: you--
 
 CATHERINE (stopping him playfully). You stay here, my dear
 Sergius: there's no hurry. I have a word or two to say to Paul.
 (Sergius instantly bows and steps back.) Now, dear (taking
 Petkoff's arm), come and see the electric bell.
 
 PETKOFF. Oh, very well, very well. (They go into the house
 together affectionately. Sergius, left alone with Raina, looks
 anxiously at her, fearing that she may be still offended. She
 smiles, and stretches out her arms to him.)
 
     (Exit R. into house, followed by Catherine.)
 
 SERGIUS (hastening to her, but refraining from touching her
--**--**--
 the higher love is?
 
 LOUKA (astonished). No, sir.
 
 SERGIUS. Very fatiguing thing to keep up for any length of time,
 Louka. One feels the need of some relief after it.
 
 LOUKA (innocently). Perhaps you would like some coffee, sir?
 (She stretches her hand across the table for the coffee pot.)
 
 SERGIUS (taking her hand). Thank you, Louka.
 
 LOUKA (pretending to pull). Oh, sir, you know I didn't mean
 that. I'm surprised at you!
 
 SERGIUS (coming clear of the table and drawing her with him). I
 am surprised at myself, Louka. What would Sergius, the hero of
 Slivnitza, say if he saw me now? What would Sergius, the apostle
 of the higher love, say if he saw me now? What would the half
 dozen Sergiuses who keep popping in and out of this handsome
 figure of mine say if they caught us here? (Letting go her hand
 and slipping his arm dexterously round her waist.) Do you
 consider my figure handsome, Louka?
 
 LOUKA. Let me go, sir. I shall be disgraced. (She struggles: he
 holds her inexorably.) Oh, will you let go?
 
 SERGIUS (looking straight into her eyes). No.
 
 LOUKA. Then stand back where we can't be seen. Have you no
 common sense?
 
 SERGIUS. Ah, that's reasonable. (He takes her into the
 stableyard gateway, where they are hidden from the house.)
 
 LOUKA (complaining). I may have been seen from the windows:
 Miss Raina is sure to be spying about after you.
 
 SERGIUS (stung--letting her go). Take care, Louka. I may be
 worthless enough to betray the higher love; but do not you
 insult it.
 
 LOUKA (demurely). Not for the world, sir, I'm sure. May I go on
 with my work please, now?
 
 SERGIUS (again putting his arm round her). You are a provoking
 little witch, Louka. If you were in love with me, would you spy
--**--**--
 back into the garden from the gateway). Devil! devil!
 
 LOUKA. Ha! ha! I expect one of the six of you is very like me,
 sir, though I am only Miss Raina's maid. (She goes back to her
 work at the table, taking no further notice of him.)
 
 SERGIUS (speaking to himself). Which of the six is the real
 man?--that's the question that torments me. One of them is a
 hero, another a buffoon, another a humbug, another perhaps a
 bit of a blackguard. (He pauses and looks furtively at Louka, as
 he adds with deep bitterness) And one, at least, is a
 coward--jealous, like all cowards. (He goes to the table.)
 Louka.
 
 LOUKA. Yes?
 
 SERGIUS. Who is my rival?
 
 LOUKA. You shall never get that out of me, for love or money.
 
 SERGIUS. Why?
 
 LOUKA. Never mind why. Besides, you would tell that I told you;
 and I should lose my place.
 
 SERGIUS (holding out his right hand in affirmation). No; on the
 honor of a--(He checks himself, and his hand drops nerveless as
 he concludes, sardonically)--of a man capable of behaving as I
 have been behaving for the last five minutes. Who is he?
 
 LOUKA. I don't know. I never saw him. I only heard his voice
 through the door of her room.
 
 SERGIUS. Damnation! How dare you?
 
 LOUKA (retreating). Oh, I mean no harm: you've no right to take
 up my words like that. The mistress knows all about it. And I
 tell you that if that gentleman ever comes here again, Miss
 Raina will marry him, whether he likes it or not. I know the
 difference between the sort of manner you and she put on before
 one another and the real manner. (Sergius shivers as if she had
 stabbed him. Then, setting his face like iron, he strides grimly
--**--**--
 
 SERGIUS. Never! (and gets away as far as possible from her.)
 
    (Her arm drops. Without a word, and with unaffected
     dignity, she takes her tray, and is approaching
     the house when Raina returns wearing a hat and
     jacket in the height of the Vienna fashion of the
     previous year, 1885. Louka makes way proudly for
     her, and then goes into the house.)
 
 RAINA. I'm ready! What's the matter? (Gaily.) Have you been
 flirting with Louka?
 
 SERGIUS (hastily). No, no. How can you think such a thing?
 
 RAINA (ashamed of herself). Forgive me, dear: it was only a
 jest. I am so happy to-day.
 
     (He goes quickly to her, and kisses her hand
      remorsefully. Catherine comes out and calls
      to them from the top of the steps.)
 
 CATHERINE (coming down to them). I am sorry to disturb you,
 children; but Paul is distracted over those three regiments. He
 does not know how to get them to Phillipopolis; and he objects
 to every suggestion of mine. You must go and help him, Sergius.
 He is in the library.
 
 RAINA (disappointed). But we are just going out for a walk.
 
 SERGIUS. I shall not be long. Wait for me just five minutes. (He
 runs up the steps to the door.)
 
 RAINA (following him to the foot of the steps and looking up at
 him with timid coquetry). I shall go round and wait in full view
 of the library windows. Be sure you draw father's attention to
 me. If you are a moment longer than five minutes, I shall go in
 and fetch you, regiments or no regiments.
 
 SERGIUS (laughing). Very well. (He goes in. Raina watches him
 until he is out of her sight. Then, with a perceptible
 relaxation of manner, she begins to pace up and down about the
 garden in a brown study.)
--**--**--
 LOUKA. There's a gentleman just called, madam--a Servian
 officer--
 
 CATHERINE (flaming). A Servian! How dare he--(Checking herself
 bitterly.) Oh, I forgot. We are at peace now. I suppose we shall
 have them calling every day to pay their compliments. Well, if
 he is an officer why don't you tell your master? He is in the
 library with Major Saranoff. Why do you come to me?
 
 LOUKA. But he asks for you, madam. And I don't think he knows
 who you are: he said the lady of the house. He gave me this
 little ticket for you. (She takes a card out of her bosom; puts
 it on the salver and offers it to Catherine.)
 
 CATHERINE (reading). "Captain Bluntschli!" That's a German
 name.
 
 LOUKA. Swiss, madam, I think.
 
 CATHERINE (with a bound that makes Louka jump back). Swiss!
 What is he like?
 
 LOUKA (timidly). He has a big carpet bag, madam.
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, Heavens, he's come to return the coat! Send him
 away--say we're not at home--ask him to leave his address and
 I'll write to him--Oh, stop: that will never do. Wait! (She
 throws herself into a chair to think it out. Louka waits.) The
 master and Major Saranoff are busy in the library, aren't they?
 
 LOUKA. Yes, madam.
 
 CATHERINE (decisively). Bring the gentleman out here at once.
 (Imperatively.) And be very polite to him. Don't delay. Here
 (impatiently snatching the salver from her): leave that here;
 and go straight back to him.
 
 LOUKA. Yes, madam. (Going.)
 
 CATHERINE. Louka!
 
 LOUKA (stopping). Yes, madam.
 
 CATHERINE. Is the library door shut?
 
 LOUKA. I think so, madam.
 
 CATHERINE. If not, shut it as you pass through.
 
 LOUKA. Yes, madam. (Going.)
 
 CATHERINE. Stop! (Louka stops.) He will have to go out that way
 (indicating the gate of the stable yard). Tell Nicola to bring
--**--**--
 of going back that way. (Coaxing him across to the stable
 gates.) This is the shortest way out. Many thanks. So glad to
 have been of service to you. Good-bye.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. But my bag?
 
 CATHERINE. It will be sent on. You will leave me your address.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. True. Allow me. (He takes out his card-case, and
 stops to write his address, keeping Catherine in an agony of
 impatience. As he hands her the card, Petkoff, hatless, rushes
 from the house in a fluster of hospitality, followed by
 Sergius.)
 
 PETKOFF (as he hurries down the steps). My dear Captain
 Bluntschli--
 
 CATHERINE. Oh Heavens! (She sinks on the seat against the wall.)
 
 PETKOFF (too preoccupied to notice her as he shakes
 Bluntschli's hand heartily). Those stupid people of mine thought
 I was out here, instead of in the--haw!--library. (He cannot
 mention the library without betraying how proud he is of it.) I
 saw you through the window. I was wondering why you didn't come
 in. Saranoff is with me: you remember him, don't you?
 
 SERGIUS (saluting humorously, and then offering his hand with
 great charm of manner). Welcome, our friend the enemy!
 
 PETKOFF. No longer the enemy, happily. (Rather anxiously.) I
 hope you've come as a friend, and not on business.
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, quite as a friend, Paul. I was just asking
 Captain Bluntschli to stay to lunch; but he declares he must go
 at once.
 
 SERGIUS (sardonically). Impossible, Bluntschli. We want you
 here badly. We have to send on three cavalry regiments to
 Phillipopolis; and we don't in the least know how to do it.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (suddenly attentive and business-like).
 Phillipopolis! The forage is the trouble, eh?
 
 PETKOFF (eagerly). Yes, that's it. (To Sergius.) He sees the
 whole thing at once.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. I think I can shew you how to manage that.
--**--**--
 PETKOFF (suspiciously, to Raina). And since when, pray, have
 you taken to cooking?
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, whilst you were away. It is her latest fancy.
 
 PETKOFF (testily). And has Nicola taken to drinking? He used to
 be careful enough. First he shews Captain Bluntschli out here
 when he knew quite well I was in the--hum!--library; and then
 he goes downstairs and breaks Raina's chocolate soldier. He
 must--(At this moment Nicola appears at the top of the steps R.,
 with a carpet bag. He descends; places it respectfully before
 Bluntschli; and waits for further orders. General amazement.
 Nicola, unconscious of the effect he is producing, looks
 perfectly satisfied with himself. When Petkoff recovers his
 power of speech, he breaks out at him with) Are you mad, Nicola?
 
 NICOLA (taken aback). Sir?
 
 PETKOFF. What have you brought that for?
 
 NICOLA. My lady's orders, sir. Louka told me that--
 
 CATHERINE (interrupting him). My orders! Why should I order you
 to bring Captain Bluntschli's luggage out here? What are you
 thinking of, Nicola?
 
 NICOLA (after a moment's bewilderment, picking up the bag as he
 addresses Bluntschli with the very perfection of servile
 discretion). I beg your pardon, sir, I am sure. (To Catherine.)
 My fault, madam! I hope you'll overlook it! (He bows, and is
 going to the steps with the bag, when Petkoff addresses him
 angrily.)
 
 PETKOFF. You'd better go and slam that bag, too, down on Miss
 Raina's ice pudding! (This is too much for Nicola. The bag drops
 from his hands on Petkoff's corns, eliciting a roar of anguish
 from him.) Begone, you butter-fingered donkey.
 
 NICOLA (snatching up the bag, and escaping into the house).
 Yes, sir.
 
 CATHERINE. Oh, never mind, Paul, don't be angry!
 
 PETKOFF (muttering). Scoundrel. He's got out of hand while I
 was away. I'll teach him. (Recollecting his guest.) Oh, well,
--**--**--
     novels, broken backed, coffee stained, torn and
     thumbed, and a couple of little hanging shelves
     with a few gift books on them, the rest of the
     wall space being occupied by trophies of war and
     the chase. But it is a most comfortable
     sitting-room. A row of three large windows in the
     front of the house shew a mountain panorama, which
     is just now seen in one of its softest aspects in
     the mellowing afternoon light. In the left hand
     corner, a square earthenware stove, a perfect
     tower of colored pottery, rises nearly to the
     ceiling and guarantees plenty of warmth. The
     ottoman in the middle is a circular bank of
     decorated cushions, and the window seats are well
     upholstered divans. Little Turkish tables, one of
     them with an elaborate hookah on it, and a screen
     to match them, complete the handsome effect of the
     furnishing. There is one object, however, which is
     hopelessly out of keeping with its surroundings.
     This is a small kitchen table, much the worse for
     wear, fitted as a writing table with an old
     canister full of pens, an eggcup filled with ink,
     and a deplorable scrap of severely used pink
     blotting paper.
 
     At the side of this table, which stands on the
     right, Bluntschli is hard at work, with a couple
     of maps before him, writing orders. At the head of
     it sits Sergius, who is also supposed to be at
     work, but who is actually gnawing the feather of a
     pen, and contemplating Bluntschli's quick, sure,
     businesslike progress with a mixture of envious
     irritation at his own incapacity, and awestruck
     wonder at an ability which seems to him almost
     miraculous, though its prosaic character forbids
     him to esteem it. The major is comfortably
     established on the ottoman, with a newspaper in
     his hand and the tube of the hookah within his
--**--**--
 PETKOFF. My old coat. I'm not at home in this one: I feel as if
 I were on parade.
 
 CATHERINE. My dear Paul, how absurd you are about that old coat!
 It must be hanging in the blue closet where you left it.
 
 PETKOFF. My dear Catherine, I tell you I've looked there. Am I
 to believe my own eyes or not? (Catherine quietly rises and
 presses the button of the electric bell by the fireplace.) What
 are you shewing off that bell for? (She looks at him majestically,
 and silently resumes her chair and her needlework.) My dear: if
 you think the obstinacy of your sex can make a coat out of two
 old dressing gowns of Raina's, your waterproof, and my
 mackintosh, you're mistaken. That's exactly what the blue closet
 contains at present. (Nicola presents himself.)
 
 CATHERINE (unmoved by Petkoff's sally). Nicola: go to the blue
 closet and bring your master's old coat here--the braided one he
 usually wears in the house.
 
 NICOLA. Yes, madam. (Nicola goes out.)
 
 PETKOFF. Catherine.
 
 CATHERINE. Yes, Paul?
 
 PETKOFF. I bet you any piece of jewellery you like to order from
 Sofia against a week's housekeeping money, that the coat isn't
 there.
 
 CATHERINE. Done, Paul.
 
 PETKOFF (excited by the prospect of a gamble). Come: here's an
 opportunity for some sport. Who'll bet on it? Bluntschli: I'll
 give you six to one.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (imperturbably). It would be robbing you, Major.
 Madame is sure to be right. (Without looking up, he passes
 another batch of papers to Sergius.)
 
 SERGIUS (also excited). Bravo, Switzerland! Major: I bet my
 best charger against an Arab mare for Raina that Nicola finds
 the coat in the blue closet.
 
 PETKOFF (eagerly). Your best char--
 
 CATHERINE (hastily interrupting him). Don't be foolish, Paul.
 An Arabian mare will cost you 50,000 levas.
--**--**--
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (to Sergius, handing a paper). That's the last
 order.
 
 PETKOFF (jumping up). What! finished?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Finished. (Petkoff goes beside Sergius; looks
 curiously over his left shoulder as he signs; and says with
 childlike envy) Haven't you anything for me to sign?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Not necessary. His signature will do.
 
 PETKOFF. Ah, well, I think we've done a thundering good day's
 work. (He goes away from the table.) Can I do anything more?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. You had better both see the fellows that are to take
 these. (To Sergius.) Pack them off at once; and shew them that
 I've marked on the orders the time they should hand them in by.
 Tell them that if they stop to drink or tell stories--if they're
 five minutes late, they'll have the skin taken off their backs.
 
 SERGIUS (rising indignantly). I'll say so. And if one of them
 is man enough to spit in my face for insulting him, I'll buy his
 discharge and give him a pension. (He strides out, his humanity
 deeply outraged.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (confidentially). Just see that he talks to them
 properly, Major, will you?
 
 PETKOFF (officiously). Quite right, Bluntschli, quite right.
 I'll see to it. (He goes to the door importantly, but hesitates
 on the threshold.) By the bye, Catherine, you may as well come,
 too. They'll be far more frightened of you than of me.
 
 CATHERINE (putting down her embroidery). I daresay I had
 better. You will only splutter at them. (She goes out, Petkoff
 holding the door for her and following her.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. What a country! They make cannons out of cherry
 trees; and the officers send for their wives to keep discipline!
 (He begins to fold and docket the papers. Raina, who has risen
 from the divan, strolls down the room with her hands clasped
 behind her, and looks mischievously at him.)
--**--**--
 lied: I know it. But I did it to save your life. He would have
 killed you. That was the second time I ever uttered a falsehood.
 (Bluntschli rises quickly and looks doubtfully and somewhat
 severely at her.) Do you remember the first time?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. I! No. Was I present?
 
 RAINA. Yes; and I told the officer who was searching for you
 that you were not present.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. True. I should have remembered it.
 
 RAINA (greatly encouraged). Ah, it is natural that you should
 forget it first. It cost you nothing: it cost me a lie!--a lie!!
 (She sits down on the ottoman, looking straight before her with
 her hands clasped on her knee. Bluntschli, quite touched, goes
 to the ottoman with a particularly reassuring and considerate
 air, and sits down beside her.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. My dear young lady, don't let this worry you.
 Remember: I'm a soldier. Now what are the two things that happen
 to a soldier so often that he comes to think nothing of them?
 One is hearing people tell lies (Raina recoils): the other is
 getting his life saved in all sorts of ways by all sorts of
 people.
 
 RAINA (rising in indignant protest). And so he becomes a
 creature incapable of faith and of gratitude.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (making a wry face). Do you like gratitude? I don't.
 If pity is akin to love, gratitude is akin to the other thing.
 
 RAINA. Gratitude! (Turning on him.) If you are incapable of
 gratitude you are incapable of any noble sentiment. Even animals
 are grateful. Oh, I see now exactly what you think of me! You
 were not surprised to hear me lie. To you it was something I
 probably did every day--every hour. That is how men think of
 women. (She walks up the room melodramatically.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (dubiously). There's reason in everything. You said
--**--**--
 BLUNTSCHLI. You mean, don't you, that I am the first man that
 has ever taken you quite seriously?
 
 RAINA. Yes, I suppose I do mean that. (Cosily, quite at her ease
 with him.) How strange it is to be talked to in such a way! You
 know, I've always gone on like that--I mean the noble attitude
 and the thrilling voice. I did it when I was a tiny child to my
 nurse. She believed in it. I do it before my parents. They
 believe in it. I do it before Sergius. He believes in it.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Yes: he's a little in that line himself, isn't he?
 
 RAINA (startled). Do you think so?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. You know him better than I do.
 
 RAINA. I wonder--I wonder is he? If I thought that--!
 (Discouraged.) Ah, well, what does it matter? I suppose, now
 that you've found me out, you despise me.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (warmly, rising). No, my dear young lady, no, no, no
 a thousand times. It's part of your youth--part of your charm.
 I'm like all the rest of them--the nurse--your
 parents--Sergius: I'm your infatuated admirer.
 
 RAINA (pleased). Really?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (slapping his breast smartly with his hand, German
 fashion). Hand aufs Herz! Really and truly.
 
 RAINA (very happy). But what did you think of me for giving you
 my portrait?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (astonished). Your portrait! You never gave me your
 portrait.
 
 RAINA (quickly). Do you mean to say you never got it?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. No. (He sits down beside her, with renewed interest,
 and says, with some complacency.) When did you send it to me?
 
 RAINA (indignantly). I did not send it to you. (She turns her
 head away, and adds, reluctantly.) It was in the pocket of that
 coat.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (pursing his lips and rounding his eyes). Oh-o-oh! I
 never found it. It must be there still.
--**--**--
 the surest place to get looted in modern warfare. So I pawned
 it.
 
 RAINA. Pawned it!!!
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. I know it doesn't sound nice; but it was much the
 safest plan. I redeemed it the day before yesterday. Heaven only
 knows whether the pawnbroker cleared out the pockets or not.
 
 RAINA (furious--throwing the words right into his face). You
 have a low, shopkeeping mind. You think of things that would
 never come into a gentleman's head.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (phlegmatically). That's the Swiss national
 character, dear lady.
 
 RAINA. Oh, I wish I had never met you. (She flounces away and
 sits at the window fuming.)
 
    (Louka comes in with a heap of letters and
     telegrams on her salver, and crosses, with her
     bold, free gait, to the table. Her left sleeve is
     looped up to the shoulder with a brooch, shewing
     her naked arm, with a broad gilt bracelet covering
     the bruise.)
 
 LOUKA (to Bluntschli). For you. (She empties the salver
 recklessly on the table.) The messenger is waiting. (She is
 determined not to be civil to a Servian, even if she must bring
 him his letters.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (to Raina). Will you excuse me: the last postal
 delivery that reached me was three weeks ago. These are the
 subsequent accumulations. Four telegrams--a week old. (He opens
 one.) Oho! Bad news!
 
 RAINA (rising and advancing a little remorsefully). Bad news?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. My father's dead. (He looks at the telegram with his
 lips pursed, musing on the unexpected change in his
 arrangements.)
 
 RAINA. Oh, how very sad!
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Yes: I shall have to start for home in an hour. He
 has left a lot of big hotels behind him to be looked after.
 (Takes up a heavy letter in a long blue envelope.) Here's a
 whacking letter from the family solicitor. (He pulls out the
--**--**--
 that of wearing your sleeve, child?
 
 LOUKA (proudly). My own fashion.
 
 NICOLA. Indeed! If the mistress catches you, she'll talk to you.
 (He throws the logs down on the ottoman, and sits comfortably
 beside them.)
 
 LOUKA. Is that any reason why you should take it on yourself to
 talk to me?
 
 NICOLA. Come: don't be so contrary with me. I've some good news
 for you. (He takes out some paper money. Louka, with an eager
 gleam in her eyes, comes close to look at it.) See, a twenty
 leva bill! Sergius gave me that out of pure swagger. A fool and
 his money are soon parted. There's ten levas more. The Swiss
 gave me that for backing up the mistress's and Raina's lies
 about him. He's no fool, he isn't. You should have heard old
 Catherine downstairs as polite as you please to me, telling me
 not to mind the Major being a little impatient; for they knew
 what a good servant I was--after making a fool and a liar of me
 before them all! The twenty will go to our savings; and you
 shall have the ten to spend if you'll only talk to me so as to
 remind me I'm a human being. I get tired of being a servant
 occasionally.
 
 LOUKA (scornfully). Yes: sell your manhood for thirty levas,
 and buy me for ten! Keep your money. You were born to be a
 servant. I was not. When you set up your shop you will only be
 everybody's servant instead of somebody's servant.
 
 NICOLA (picking up his logs, and going to the stove). Ah, wait
 till you see. We shall have our evenings to ourselves; and I
 shall be master in my own house, I promise you. (He throws the
 logs down and kneels at the stove.)
--**--**--
 ordered about. The way to get on as a lady is the same as the
 way to get on as a servant: you've got to know your place;
 that's the secret of it. And you may depend on me to know my
 place if you get promoted. Think over it, my girl. I'll stand by
 you: one servant should always stand by another.
 
 LOUKA (rising impatiently). Oh, I must behave in my own way.
 You take all the courage out of me with your cold-blooded
 wisdom. Go and put those logs on the fire: that's the sort of
 thing you understand. (Before Nicola can retort, Sergius comes
 in. He checks himself a moment on seeing Louka; then goes to the
 stove.)
 
 SERGIUS (to Nicola). I am not in the way of your work, I hope.
 
 NICOLA (in a smooth, elderly manner). Oh, no, sir, thank you
 kindly. I was only speaking to this foolish girl about her habit
 of running up here to the library whenever she gets a chance, to
 look at the books. That's the worst of her education, sir: it
 gives her habits above her station. (To Louka.) Make that table
 tidy, Louka, for the Major. (He goes out sedately.)
 
     (Louka, without looking at Sergius, begins to
      arrange the papers on the table. He crosses slowly
      to her, and studies the arrangement of her sleeve
      reflectively.)
 
 SERGIUS. Let me see: is there a mark there? (He turns up the
 bracelet and sees the bruise made by his grasp. She stands
 motionless, not looking at him: fascinated, but on her guard.)
 Ffff! Does it hurt?
 
 LOUKA. Yes.
 
 SERGIUS. Shall I cure it?
 
 LOUKA (instantly withdrawing herself proudly, but still not
 looking at him). No. You cannot cure it now.
 
 SERGIUS (masterfully). Quite sure? (He makes a movement as if
--**--**--
 
 LOUKA. Look at me! how much am I allowed to have my own will? I
 have to get your room ready for you--to sweep and dust, to fetch
 and carry. How could that degrade me if it did not degrade you
 to have it done for you? But (with subdued passion) if I were
 Empress of Russia, above everyone in the world, then--ah, then,
 though according to you I could shew no courage at all; you
 should see, you should see.
 
 SERGIUS. What would you do, most noble Empress?
 
 LOUKA. I would marry the man I loved, which no other queen in
 Europe has the courage to do. If I loved you, though you would
 be as far beneath me as I am beneath you, I would dare to be the
 equal of my inferior. Would you dare as much if you loved me?
 No: if you felt the beginnings of love for me you would not let
 it grow. You dare not: you would marry a rich man's daughter
 because you would be afraid of what other people would say of
 you.
 
 SERGIUS (carried away). You lie: it is not so, by all the
 stars! If I loved you, and I were the Czar himself, I would set
 you on the throne by my side. You know that I love another
 woman, a woman as high above you as heaven is above earth. And
 you are jealous of her.
 
 LOUKA. I have no reason to be. She will never marry you now. The
 man I told you of has come back. She will marry the Swiss.
 
 SERGIUS (recoiling). The Swiss!
 
 LOUKA. A man worth ten of you. Then you can come to me; and I
 will refuse you. You are not good enough for me. (She turns to
--**--**--
 trifler. If I choose to love you, I dare marry you, in spite of
 all Bulgaria. If these hands ever touch you again, they shall
 touch my affianced bride.
 
 LOUKA. We shall see whether you dare keep your word. But take
 care. I will not wait long.
 
 SERGIUS (again folding his arms and standing motionless in the
 middle of the room). Yes, we shall see. And you shall wait my
 pleasure.
 
    (Bluntschli, much preoccupied, with his papers
     still in his hand, enters, leaving the door open
     for Louka to go out. He goes across to the table,
     glancing at her as he passes. Sergius, without
     altering his resolute attitude, watches him
     steadily. Louka goes out, leaving the door open.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (absently, sitting at the table as before, and
 putting down his papers). That's a remarkable looking young
 woman.
 
 SERGIUS (gravely, without moving). Captain Bluntschli.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Eh?
 
 SERGIUS. You have deceived me. You are my rival. I brook no
 rivals. At six o'clock I shall be in the drilling-ground on the
 Klissoura road, alone, on horseback, with my sabre. Do you
 understand?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (staring, but sitting quite at his ease). Oh, thank
 you: that's a cavalry man's proposal. I'm in the artillery; and
 I have the choice of weapons. If I go, I shall take a machine
 gun. And there shall be no mistake about the cartridges this
 time.
 
 SERGIUS (flushing, but with deadly coldness). Take care, sir.
 It is not our custom in Bulgaria to allow invitations of that
 kind to be trifled with.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (warmly). Pooh! don't talk to me about Bulgaria. You
 don't know what fighting is. But have it your own way. Bring
 your sabre along. I'll meet you.
 
 SERGIUS (fiercely delighted to find his opponent a man of
 spirit). Well said, Switzer. Shall I lend you my best horse?
--**--**--
 Denial is useless. You have enjoyed the privilege of being
 received in her own room, late at night--
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (interrupting him pepperily). Yes; you blockhead!
 She received me with a pistol at her head. Your cavalry were at
 my heels. I'd have blown out her brains if she'd uttered a cry.
 
 SERGIUS (taken aback). Bluntschli! Raina: is this true?
 
 RAINA (rising in wrathful majesty). Oh, how dare you, how dare
 you?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Apologize, man, apologize! (He resumes his seat at
 the table.)
 
 SERGIUS (with the old measured emphasis, folding his arms). I
 never apologize.
 
 RAINA (passionately). This is the doing of that friend of
 yours, Captain Bluntschli. It is he who is spreading this
 horrible story about me. (She walks about excitedly.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. No: he's dead--burnt alive.
 
 RAINA (stopping, shocked). Burnt alive!
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Shot in the hip in a wood yard. Couldn't drag
 himself out. Your fellows' shells set the timber on fire and
 burnt him, with half a dozen other poor devils in the same
 predicament.
 
 RAINA. How horrible!
 
 SERGIUS. And how ridiculous! Oh, war! war! the dream of patriots
 and heroes! A fraud, Bluntschli, a hollow sham, like love.
 
 RAINA (outraged). Like love! You say that before me.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Come, Saranoff: that matter is explained.
 
 SERGIUS. A hollow sham, I say. Would you have come back here if
 nothing had passed between you, except at the muzzle of your
 pistol? Raina is mistaken about our friend who was burnt. He was
 not my informant.
 
 RAINA. Who then? (Suddenly guessing the truth.) Ah, Louka! my
 maid, my servant! You were with her this morning all that time
 after---after---Oh, what sort of god is this I have been
 worshipping! (He meets her gaze with sardonic enjoyment of her
 disenchantment. Angered all the more, she goes closer to him,
 and says, in a lower, intenser tone) Do you know that I looked
--**--**--
 
 RAINA (sarcastically). A shocking sacrifice, isn't it? Such
 beauty, such intellect, such modesty, wasted on a middle-aged
 servant man! Really, Sergius, you cannot stand by and allow such
 a thing. It would be unworthy of your chivalry.
 
 SERGIUS (losing all self-control). Viper! Viper! (He rushes to
 and fro, raging.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Look here, Saranoff; you're getting the worst of
 this.
 
 RAINA (getting angrier). Do you realize what he has done,
 Captain Bluntschli? He has set this girl as a spy on us; and her
 reward is that he makes love to her.
 
 SERGIUS. False! Monstrous!
 
 RAINA. Monstrous! (Confronting him.) Do you deny that she told
 you about Captain Bluntschli being in my room?
 
 SERGIUS. No; but--
 
 RAINA (interrupting). Do you deny that you were making love to
 her when she told you?
 
 SERGIUS. No; but I tell you--
 
 RAINA (cutting him short contemptuously). It is unnecessary to
 tell us anything more. That is quite enough for us. (She turns
 her back on him and sweeps majestically back to the window.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (quietly, as Sergius, in an agony of mortification,
 rinks on the ottoman, clutching his averted head between his
 fists). I told you you were getting the worst of it, Saranoff.
 
 SERGIUS. Tiger cat!
 
 RAINA (running excitedly to Bluntschli). You hear this man
 calling me names, Captain Bluntschli?
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. What else can he do, dear lady? He must defend
 himself somehow. Come (very persuasively), don't quarrel. What
 good does it do? (Raina, with a gasp, sits down on the ottoman,
 and after a vain effort to look vexedly at Bluntschli, she falls
 a victim to her sense of humor, and is attacked with a
 disposition to laugh.)
 
 SERGIUS. Engaged to Nicola! (He rises.) Ha! ha! (Going to the
 stove and standing with his back to it.) Ah, well, Bluntschli,
 you are right to take this huge imposture of a world coolly.
--**--**--
 It's all a question of the degree of provocation. My life was at
 stake.
 
 LOUKA. My love was at stake. (Sergius flinches, ashamed of her
 in spite of himself.) I am not ashamed.
 
 RAINA (contemptuously). Your love! Your curiosity, you mean.
 
 LOUKA (facing her and retorting her contempt with interest). My
 love, stronger than anything you can feel, even for your
 chocolate cream soldier.
 
 SERGIUS (with quick suspicion--to Louka). What does that mean?
 
 LOUKA (fiercely). It means--
 
 SERGIUS (interrupting her slightingly). Oh, I remember, the ice
 pudding. A paltry taunt, girl.
 
     (Major Petkoff enters, in his shirtsleeves.)
 
 PETKOFF. Excuse my shirtsleeves, gentlemen. Raina: somebody has
 been wearing that coat of mine: I'll swear it--somebody with
 bigger shoulders than mine. It's all burst open at the back.
 Your mother is mending it. I wish she'd make haste. I shall
 catch cold. (He looks more attentively at them.) Is anything the
 matter?
 
 RAINA. No. (She sits down at the stove with a tranquil air.)
 
 SERGIUS. Oh, no! (He sits down at the end of the table, as at
 first.)
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (who is already seated). Nothing, nothing.
 
 PETKOFF (sitting down on the ottoman in his old place). That's
 all right. (He notices Louka.) Anything the matter, Louka?
 
 LOUKA. No, sir.
 
 PETKOFF (genially). That's all right. (He sneezes.) Go and ask
 your mistress for my coat, like a good girl, will you? (She
 turns to obey; but Nicola enters with the coat; and she makes a
 pretence of having business in the room by taking the little
 table with the hookah away to the wall near the windows.)
 
 RAINA (rising quickly, as she sees the coat on Nicola's arm).
 Here it is, papa. Give it to me, Nicola; and do you put some
 more wood on the fire. (She takes the coat, and brings it to the
--**--**--
 not.
 
 PETKOFF. Not! (He looks at them. They are all very serious and
 very conscious.) Do you mean to tell me that Raina sends
 photographic souvenirs to other men?
 
 SERGIUS (enigmatically). The world is not such an innocent
 place as we used to think, Petkoff.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (rising). It's all right, Major. I'm the chocolate
 cream soldier. (Petkoff and Sergius are equally astonished.) The
 gracious young lady saved my life by giving me chocolate creams
 when I was starving--shall I ever forget their flavour! My late
 friend Stolz told you the story at Peerot. I was the fugitive.
 
 PETKOFF. You! (He gasps.) Sergius: do you remember how those two
 women went on this morning when we mentioned it? (Sergius smiles
 cynically. Petkoff confronts Raina severely.) You're a nice young
 woman, aren't you?
 
 RAINA (bitterly). Major Saranoff has changed his mind. And when
 I wrote that on the photograph, I did not know that Captain
 Bluntschli was married.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (much startled protesting vehemently). I'm not
 married.
 
 RAINA (with deep reproach). You said you were.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. I did not. I positively did not. I never was married
 in my life.
 
 PETKOFF (exasperated). Raina: will you kindly inform me, if I
 am not asking too much, which gentleman you are engaged to?
 
 RAINA. To neither of them. This young lady (introducing Louka,
 who faces them all proudly) is the object of Major Saranoff's
 affections at present.
 
 PETKOFF. Louka! Are you mad, Sergius? Why, this girl's engaged
 to Nicola.
 
 NICOLA (coming forward ). I beg your pardon, sir. There is a
 mistake. Louka is not engaged to me.
 
 PETKOFF. Not engaged to you, you scoundrel! Why, you had
 twenty-five levas from me on the day of your betrothal; and she
 had that gilt bracelet from Miss Raina.
 
 NICOLA (with cool unction). We gave it out so, sir. But it was
--**--**--
 grandest manner.) Forgive me!
 
 LOUKA. I forgive you. (She timidly gives him her hand, which he
 kisses.) That touch makes me your affianced wife.
 
 SERGIUS (springing up). Ah, I forgot that!
 
 LOUKA (coldly). You can withdraw if you like.
 
 SERGIUS. Withdraw! Never! You belong to me! (He puts his arm
 about her and draws her to him.) (Catherine comes in and finds
 Louka in Sergius's arms, and all the rest gazing at them in
 bewildered astonishment.)
 
 CATHERINE. What does this mean? (Sergius releases Louka.)
 
 PETKOFF. Well, my dear, it appears that Sergius is going to
 marry Louka instead of Raina. (She is about to break out
 indignantly at him: he stops her by exclaiming testily.) Don't
 blame me: I've nothing to do with it. (He retreats to the
 stove.)
 
 CATHERINE. Marry Louka! Sergius: you are bound by your word to
 us!
 
 SERGIUS (folding his arms). Nothing binds me.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (much pleased by this piece of common sense).
 Saranoff: your hand. My congratulations. These heroics of yours
 have their practical side after all. (To Louka.) Gracious young
 lady: the best wishes of a good Republican! (He kisses her hand,
 to Raina's great disgust.)
 
 CATHERINE (threateningly). Louka: you have been telling
 stories.
 
 LOUKA. I have done Raina no harm.
 
 CATHERINE (haughtily). Raina! (Raina is equally indignant at
 the liberty.)
 
 LOUKA. I have a right to call her Raina: she calls me Louka. I
 told Major Saranoff she would never marry him if the Swiss
 gentleman came back.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (surprised). Hallo!
 
 LOUKA (turning to Raina). I thought you were fonder of him than
 of Sergius. You know best whether I was right.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. What nonsense! I assure you, my dear Major, my dear
 Madame, the gracious young lady simply saved my life, nothing
 else. She never cared two straws for me. Why, bless my heart and
--**--**--
 
 SERGIUS (with grim enjoyment of Bluntschli's discomfiture).
 Bluntschli: my one last belief is gone. Your sagacity is a
 fraud, like all the other things. You have less sense than even
 I have.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (overwhelmed). Twenty-three! Twenty-three!! (He
 considers.) Hm! (Swiftly making up his mind.) In that case,
 Major Petkoff, I beg to propose formally to become a suitor for
 your daughter's hand, in place of Major Saranoff retired.
 
 RAINA. You dare!
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. If you were twenty-three when you said those things
 to me this afternoon, I shall take them seriously.
 
 CATHERINE (loftily polite). I doubt, sir, whether you quite
 realize either my daughter's position or that of Major Sergius
 Saranoff, whose place you propose to take. The Petkoffs and the
 Saranoffs are known as the richest and most important families
 in the country. Our position is almost historical: we can go
 back for nearly twenty years.
 
 PETKOFF. Oh, never mind that, Catherine. (To Bluntschli.) We
 should be most happy, Bluntschli, if it were only a question of
 your position; but hang it, you know, Raina is accustomed to a
 very comfortable establishment. Sergius keeps twenty horses.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. But what on earth is the use of twenty horses? Why,
 it's a circus.
 
 CATHERINE (severely). My daughter, sir, is accustomed to a
 first-rate stable.
 
 RAINA. Hush, mother, you're making me ridiculous.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. Oh, well, if it comes to a question of an
 establishment, here goes! (He goes impetuously to the table and
 seizes the papers in the blue envelope.) How many horses did you
 say?
 
 SERGIUS. Twenty, noble Switzer!
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. I have two hundred horses. (They are amazed.) How
 many carriages?
 
 SERGIUS. Three.
 
 BLUNTSCHLI. I have seventy. Twenty-four of them will hold twelve
 inside, besides two on the box, without counting the driver and
 conductor. How many tablecloths have you?
 
 SERGIUS. How the deuce do I know?
--**--**--
 
 RAINA (succumbing with a shy smile). To my chocolate cream
 soldier!
 
 BLUNTSCHLI (with a boyish laugh of delight). That'll do. Thank
 you. (Looks at his watch and suddenly becomes businesslike.)
 Time's up, Major. You've managed those regiments so well that
 you are sure to be asked to get rid of some of the Infantry of
 the Teemok division. Send them home by way of Lom Palanka.
 Saranoff: don't get married until I come back: I shall be here
 punctually at five in the evening on Tuesday fortnight. Gracious
 ladies--good evening. (He makes them a military bow, and goes.)
 
 SERGIUS. What a man! What a man!
 
--**--**--
 
 MEGAERA (suddenly throwing down her stick) I won't go another
 step.
 
 ANDROCLES (pleading wearily) Oh, not again, dear. What's the good
 of stopping every two miles and saying you won't go another step?
 We must get on to the next village before night. There are wild
 beasts in this wood: lions, they say.
 
 MEGAERA. I don't believe a word of it. You are always threatening
 me with wild beasts to make me walk the very soul out of my body
 when I can hardly drag one foot before another. We haven't seen a
 single lion yet.
 
 ANDROCLES. Well, dear, do you want to see one?
 
 MEGAERA (tearing the bundle from his back) You cruel beast, you
 don't care how tired I am, or what becomes of me (she throws the
 bundle on the ground): always thinking of yourself. Self! self!
 self! always yourself! (She sits down on the bundle).
 
 ANDROCLES (sitting down sadly on the ground with his elbows on
 his knees and his head in his hands) We all have to think of
 ourselves occasionally, dear.
 
 MEGAERA. A man ought to think of his wife sometimes.
 
 ANDROCLES. He can't always help it, dear. You make me think of
 you a good deal. Not that I blame you.
 
 MEGAERA. Blame me! I should think not indeed. Is it my fault that
 I'm married to you?
 
 ANDROCLES. No, dear: that is my fault.
 
 MEGAERA. That's a nice thing to say to me. Aren't you happy with
 me?
 
 ANDROCLES. I don't complain, my love.
 
 MEGAERA. You ought to be ashamed of yourself.
 
 ANDROCLES. I am, my dear.
 
 MEGAERA. You're not: you glory in it.
 
 ANDROCLES. In what, darling?
 
 MEGAERA. In everything. In making me a slave, and making yourself
 a laughing-stock. Its not fair. You get me the name of being a
--**--**--
 
 MEGAERA. You'd much better have remained a drunkard. I can
 forgive a man being addicted to drink: its only natural; and I
 don't deny I like a drop myself sometimes. What I can't stand is
 your being addicted to Christianity. And what's worse again, your
 being addicted to animals. How is any woman to keep her house
 clean when you bring in every stray cat and lost cur and lame
 duck in the whole countryside? You took the bread out of my mouth
 to feed them: you know you did: don't attempt to deny it.
 
 ANDROCLES. Only when they were hungry and you were getting too
 stout, dearie.
 
 MEGAERA. Yes, insult me, do. (Rising) Oh! I won't bear it another
 moment. You used to sit and talk to those dumb brute beasts for
 hours, when you hadn't a word for me.
 
 ANDROCLES. They never answered back, darling. (He rises and again
 shoulders the bundle).
 
 MEGAERA. Well, if you're fonder of animals than of your own wife,
 you can live with them here in the jungle. I've had enough of
 them and enough of you. I'm going back. I'm going home.
 
 ANDROCLES (barring the way back) No, dearie: don't take on like
 that. We can't go back. We've sold everything: we should starve;
 and I should be sent to Rome and thrown to the lions--
 
 MEGAERA. Serve you right! I wish the lions joy of you.
 (Screaming) Are you going to get out of my way and let me go
 home?
 
 ANDROCLES. No, dear--
 
 MEGAERA. Then I'll make my way through the forest; and when I'm
 eaten by the wild beasts you'll know what a wife you've lost.
 (She dashes into the jungle and nearly falls over the sleeping
 lion). Oh! Oh! Andy! Andy! (She totters back and collapses into
--**--**--
 MEGAERA. Oh, don't talk about eating. (The lion rises with a
 great groan and limps towards them). Oh! (She faints).
 
 ANDROCLES (quaking, but keeping between the lion and Megaera)
 Don't you come near my wife, do you hear? (The lion groans.
 Androcles can hardly stand for trembling). Meggy: run. Run for
 your life. If I take my eye off him, its all up. (The lion holds
 up his wounded paw and flaps it piteously before Androcles). Oh,
 he's lame, poor old chap! He's got a thorn in his paw. A
 frightfully big thorn. (Full of sympathy) Oh, poor old man! Did
 um get an awful thorn into um's tootsums wootsums? Has it made um
 too sick to eat a nice little Christian man for um's breakfast?
 Oh, a nice little Christian man will get um's thorn out for um;
 and then um shall eat the nice Christian man and the nice
 Christian man's nice big tender wifey pifey. (The lion responds
 by moans of self-pity). Yes, yes, yes, yes, yes. Now, now (taking
 the paw in his hand) um is not to bite and not to scratch, not
 even if it hurts a very, very little. Now make velvet paws.
 That's right. (He pulls gingerly at the thorn. The lion, with an
 angry yell of pain, jerks back his paw so abruptly that Androcles
 is thrown on his back). Steadeee! Oh, did the nasty cruel little
 Christian man hurt the sore paw? (The lion moans assentingly but
 apologetically). Well, one more little pull and it will be all
 over. Just one little, little, leetle pull; and then um will live
 happily ever after. (He gives the thorn another pull. The lion
 roars and snaps his jaws with a terrifying clash). Oh, mustn't
 frighten um's good kind doctor, um's affectionate nursey. That
--**--**--
 ages, among them one Lavinia, a goodlooking resolute young woman,
 apparently of higher social standing than her fellow-prisoners. A
 centurion, carrying his vinewood cudgel, trudges alongside the
 squad, on its right, in command of it. All are tired and dusty;
 but the soldiers are dogged and indifferent, the Christians
 light-hearted and determined to treat their hardships as a joke
 and encourage one another.
 
 A bugle is heard far behind on the road, where the rest of the
 cohort is following.
 
 CENTURION (stopping) Halt! Orders from the Captain. (They halt
 and wait). Now then, you Christians, none of your larks. The
 captain's coming. Mind you behave yourselves. No singing. Look
 respectful. Look serious, if you're capable of it. See that big
 building over there? That's the Coliseum. That's where you'll be
 thrown to the lions or set to fight the gladiators presently.
 Think of that; and it'll help you to behave properly before the
 captain. (The Captain arrives). Attention! Salute! (The soldiers
 salute).
 
 A CHRISTIAN (cheerfully) God bless you, Captain.
 
 THE CENTURION (scandalised) Silence!
 
 The Captain, a patrician, handsome, about thirty-five, very cold
 and distinguished, very superior and authoritative, steps up on a
 stone seat at the west side of the square, behind the centurion,
 so as to dominate the others more effectually.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Centurion.
 
 THE CENTURION. (standing at attention and saluting) Sir?
 
 THE CAPTAIN (speaking stiffly and officially) You will remind
 your men, Centurion, that we are now entering Rome. You will
 instruct them that once inside the gates of Rome they are in the
 presence of the Emperor. You will make them understand that the
 lax discipline of the march cannot be permitted here. You will
 instruct them to shave every day, not every week. You will
 impress on them particularly that there must be an end to the
--**--**--
 pardon, Sir. (To the Christians) Silennnnce!
 
 THE CAPTAIN. You are to instruct your men that all intimacy with
 Christian prisoners must now cease. The men have fallen into
 habits of dependence upon the prisoners, especially the female
 prisoners, for cooking, repairs to uniforms, writing letters, and
 advice in their private affairs. In a Roman soldier such
 dependence is inadmissible. Let me see no more of it whilst we
 are in the city. Further, your orders are that in addressing
 Christian prisoners, the manners and tone of your men must
 express abhorrence and contempt. Any shortcoming in this respect
 will be regarded as a breach of discipline.(He turns to the
 prisoners) Prisoners.
 
 CENTURION (fiercely) Prisonerrrrrs! Tention! Silence!
 
 THE CAPTAIN. I call your attention, prisoners, to the fact that
 you may be called on to appear in the Imperial Circus at any time
 from tomorrow onwards according to the requirements of the
 managers. I may inform you that as there is a shortage of
 Christians just now, you may expect to be called on very soon.
 
 LAVINIA. What will they do to us, Captain?
 
 CENTURION. Silence!
 
 THE CAPTAIN. The women will be conducted into the arena with the
 wild beasts of the Imperial Menagerie, and will suffer the
 consequences. The men, if of an age to bear arms, will be given
 weapons to defend themselves, if they choose, against the
 Imperial Gladiators.
 
 LAVINIA. Captain: is there no hope that this cruel persecution--
 
 CENTURION (shocked) Silence! Hold your tongue, there.
 Persecution, indeed!
 
 THE CAPTAIN (unmoved and somewhat sardonic) Persecution is not a
 term applicable to the acts of the Emperor. The Emperor is the
 Defender of the Faith. In throwing you to the lions he will be
 upholding the interests of religion in Rome. If you were to throw
 him to the lions, that would no doubt be persecution.
--**--**--
 
 LAVINIA. Captain: your jokes are too grim. Do not think it is
 easy for us to die. Our faith makes life far stronger and more
 wonderful in us than when we walked in darkness and had nothing
 to live for. Death is harder for us than for you: the martyr's
 agony is as bitter as his triumph is glorious.
 
 THE CAPTAIN (rather troubled, addressing her personally and
 gravely) A martyr, Lavinia, is a fool. Your death will prove
 nothing.
 
 LAVINIA. Then why kill me?
 
 THE CAPTAIN. I mean that truth, if there be any truth, needs no
 martyrs.
 
 LAVINIA. No; but my faith, like your sword, needs testing. Can
 you test your sword except by staking your life on it?
 
 THE CAPTAIN (suddenly resuming his official tone) I call the
 attention of the female prisoner to the fact that Christians are
 not allowed to draw the Emperor's officers into arguments and put
 questions to them for which the military regulations provide no
 answer. (The Christians titter).
 
 LAVINIA. Captain: how CAN you?
 
 THE CAPTAIN. I call the female prisoner's attention specially to
 the fact that four comfortable homes have been offered her by
 officers of this regiment, of which she can have her choice the
 moment she chooses to sacrifice as all well-bred Roman ladies do.
 I have no more to say to the prisoners.
 
 CENTURION. Dismiss! But stay where you are.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Centurion: you will remain here with your men in
 charge of the prisoners until the arrival of three Christian
 prisoners in the custody of a cohort of the tenth legion. Among
 these prisoners you will particularly identify an armorer named
 Ferrovius, of dangerous character and great personal strength,
 and a Greek tailor reputed to be a sorcerer, by name Androcles.
 You will add the three to your charge here and march them all to
--**--**--
 
 LAVINIA. Very easy, Captain, when their enemies are as handsome
 as you.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Lavinia: you are laughing at me.
 
 LAVINIA. At you, Captain! Impossible.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Then you are flirting with me, which is worse. Don't
 be foolish.
 
 LAVINIA. But such a very handsome captain.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Incorrigible! (Urgently) Listen to me. The men in
 that audience tomorrow will be the vilest of voluptuaries: men in
 whom the only passion excited by a beautiful woman is a lust to
 see her tortured and torn shrieking limb from limb. It is a crime
 to dignify that passion. It is offering yourself for violation by
 the whole rabble of the streets and the riff-raff of the court at
 the same time. Why will you not choose rather a kindly love and
 an honorable alliance?
 
 LAVINIA. They cannot violate my soul. I alone can do that by
 sacrificing to false gods.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Sacrifice then to the true God. What does his name
 matter? We call him Jupiter. The Greeks call him Zeus. Call him
 what you will as you drop the incense on the altar flame: He will
 understand.
 
 LAVINIA. No. I couldn't. That is the strange thing, Captain, that
 a little pinch of incense should make all that difference.
 Religion is such a great thing that when I meet really religious
 people we are friends at once, no matter what name we give to the
 divine will that made us and moves us. Oh, do you think that I, a
 woman, would quarrel with you for sacrificing to a woman god like
 Diana, if Diana meant to you what Christ means to me? No: we
 should kneel side by side before her altar like two children. But
 when men who believe neither in my god nor in their own--men who
--**--**--
 
 LAVINIA. Not even from death?
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Least of all from death.
 
 LAVINIA. Then I must not come back either. A woman has to be
 braver than a soldier.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Prouder, you mean.
 
 LAVINIA (startled) Prouder! You call our courage pride!
 
 THE CAPTAIN. There is no such thing as courage: there is only
 pride. You Christians are the proudest devils on earth.
 
 LAVINIA (hurt) Pray God then my pride may never become a false
 pride. (She turns away as if she did not wish to continue the
 conversation, but softens and says to him with a smile) Thank you
 for trying to save me from death.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. I knew it was no use; but one tries in spite of
 one's knowledge.
 
 LAVINIA. Something stirs, even in the iron breast of a Roman
 soldier!
 
 THE CAPTAIN. It will soon be iron again. I have seen many women
 die, and forgotten them in a week.
 
 LAVINIA. Remember me for a fortnight, handsome Captain. I shall
 be watching you, perhaps.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. From the skies? Do not deceive yourself, Lavinia.
 There is no future for you beyond the grave.
 
 LAVINIA. What does that matter? Do you think I am only running
 away from the terrors of life into the comfort of heaven? If
 there were no future, or if the future were one of torment, I
 should have to go just the same. The hand of God is upon me.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Yes: when all is said, we are both patricians,
 Lavinia, and must die for our beliefs. Farewell. (He offers her
 his hand. She takes it and presses it. He walks away, trim and
 calm. She looks after him for a moment, and cries a little as he
 disappears through the eastern arch. A trumpet-call is heard from
 the road through the western arch).
--**--**--
 fascinating Christian?
 
 LAVINIA. Don't be foolish. (To Metellus, who has remained on her
 right, so that she is between them) Please don't let your friend
 behave like a cad before the soldiers. How are they to respect
 and obey patricians if they see them behaving like street boys?
 (Sharply to Lentulus) Pull yourself together, man. Hold your head
 up. Keep the corners of your mouth firm; and treat me respectfully.
 What do you take me for?
 
 LENTULUS (irresolutely) Look here, you know: I--you--I--
 
 LAVINIA. Stuff! Go about your business. (She turns decisively
 away and sits down with her comrades, leaving him disconcerted).
 
 METELLUS. You didn't get much out of that. I told you they were
 brutes.
 
 LENTULUS. Plucky little filly! I suppose she thinks I care. (With
 an air of indifference he strolls with Metellus to the east side
 of the square, where they stand watching the return of the
 Centurion through the western arch with his men, escorting three
 prisoners: Ferrovius, Androcles, and Spintho. Ferrovius is a
 powerful, choleric man in the prime of life, with large nostrils,
 staring eyes, and a thick neck: a man whose sensibilities are
 keen and violent to the verge of madness. Spintho is a debauchee,
 the wreck of a good-looking man gone hopelessly to the bad.
 Androcles is overwhelmed with grief, and is restraining his tears
 with great difficulty).
 
 THE CENTURION (to Lavinia) Here are some pals for you. This
 little bit is Ferrovius that you talk so much about. (Ferrovius
 turns on him threateningly. The Centurion holds up his left
 forefinger in admonition). Now remember that you're a Christian,
 and that you've got to return good for evil. (Ferrovius controls
 himself convulsively; moves away from temptation to the east side
 near Lentulus; clasps his hands in silent prayer; and throws
 himself on his knees). That's the way to manage them, eh! This
--**--**--
 one of the turn-the-other-cheek gentlemen, Centurion?
 
 CENTURION. Yes, sir. Lucky for you too, sir, if you want to take
 any liberties with him.
 
 LENTULUS (to Ferrovius) You turn the other cheek when you're
 struck, I'm told.
 
 FERROVIUS (slowly turning his great eyes on him) Yes, by the
 grace of  God, I do, NOW.
 
 LENTULUS. Not that you're a coward, of course; but out of pure
 piety.
 
 FERROVIUS. I fear God more than man; at least I try to.
 
 LENTULUS. Let's see. (He strikes him on the cheek. Androcles
 makes a wild movement to rise and interfere; but Lavinia holds
 him down, watching Ferrovius intently. Ferrovius, without
 flinching, turns the other cheek. Lentulus, rather out of
 countenance, titters foolishly, and strikes him again feebly).
 You know, I should feel ashamed if I let myself be struck like
 that, and took it lying down. But then I'm not a Christian: I'm a
 man. (Ferrovius rises impressively and towers over him. Lentulus
 becomes white with terror; and a shade of green flickers in his
 cheek for a moment).
 
 FERROVIUS (with the calm of a steam hammer) I have not always
 been faithful. The first man who struck me as you have just
 struck me was a stronger man than you: he hit me harder than I
 expected. I was tempted and fell; and it was then that I first
 tasted bitter shame. I never had a happy moment after that until
 I had knelt and asked his forgiveness by his bedside in the
 hospital. (Putting his hands on Lentulus's shoulders with
 paternal weight). But now I have learnt to resist with a strength
 that is not my own. I am not ashamed now, nor angry.
 
 LENTULUS (uneasily) Er--good evening. (He tries to move away).
 
 FERROVIUS (gripping his shoulders) Oh, do not harden your heart,
--**--**--
 holds him ruthlessly.
 
 FERROVIUS. Yes; but I saved his soul. What matters a broken jaw?
 
 LENTULUS. Don't touch me, do you hear? The law--
 
 FERROVIUS. The law will throw me to the lions tomorrow: what
 worse could it do were I to slay you? Pray for strength; and it
 shall be given to you.
 
 LENTULUS. Let me go. Your religion forbids you to strike me.
 
 FERROVIUS. On the contrary, it commands me to strike you. How can
 you turn the other cheek, if you are not first struck on the one
 cheek?
 
 LENTULUS (almost in tears) But I'm convinced already that what
 you said is quite right. I apologize for striking you.
 
 FERROVIUS (greatly pleased) My son: have I softened your heart?
 Has the good seed fallen in a fruitful place? Are your feet
 turning towards a better path?
 
 LENTULUS (abjectly) Yes, yes. There's a great deal in what you
 say.
 
 FERROVIUS (radiant) Join us. Come to the lions. Come to suffering
 and death.
 
 LENTULUS (falling on his knees and bursting into tears) Oh, help
 me. Mother! mother!
 
 FERROVIUS. These tears will water your soul and make it bring
 forth good fruit, my son. God has greatly blessed my efforts at
 conversion. Shall I tell you a miracle--yes, a miracle--wrought
 by me in Cappadocia? A young man--just such a one as you, with
 golden hair like yours--scoffed at and struck me as you scoffed
 at and struck me. I sat up all night with that youth wrestling
 for his soul; and in the morning not only was he a Christian, but
 his hair was as white as snow. (Lentulus falls in a dead faint).
 There, there: take him away. The spirit has overwrought him, poor
 lad. Carry him gently to his house; and leave the rest to heaven.
 
 CENTURION. Take him home. (The servants, intimidated, hastily
--**--**--
 FERROVIUS. How I wish I were weak like our brother here! for then
 I should perhaps be meek and gentle like him. And yet there seems
 to be a special providence that makes my trials less than his. I
 hear tales of the crowd scoffing and casting stones and reviling
 the brethren; but when I come, all this stops: my influence calms
 the passions of the mob: they listen to me in silence; and
 infidels are often converted by a straight heart-to-heart talk
 with me. Every day I feel happier, more confident. Every day
 lightens the load of the great terror.
 
 LAVINIA. The great terror? What is that?
 
 Ferrovius shakes his head and does not answer. He sits down
 beside her on her left, and buries his face in his hands in
 gloomy meditation.
 
 ANDROCLES. Well, you see, sister, he's never quite sure of
 himself. Suppose at the last moment in the arena, with the
 gladiators there to fight him, one of them was to say anything to
 annoy him, he might forget himself and lay that gladiator out.
 
 LAVINIA. That would be splendid.
 
 FERROVIUS (springing up in horror) What!
 
 ANDROCLES. Oh, sister!
 
 FERROVIUS. Splendid to betray my master, like Peter! Splendid to
 act like any common blackguard in the day of my proving! Woman:
 you are no Christian. (He moves away from her to the middle of
 the square, as if her neighborhood contaminated him).
 
 LAVINIA (laughing) You know, Ferrovius, I am not always a
 Christian. I don't think anybody is. There are moments when I
 forget all about it, and something comes out quite naturally, as
 it did then.
 
 SPINTHO. What does it matter? If you die in the arena, you'll be
 a martyr; and all martyrs go to heaven, no matter what they have
 done. That's so, isn't it, Ferrovius?
--**--**--
 you! (He tries to seize Androcles by the throat).
 
 FERROVIUS (holding him in a grip of iron) What's this, brother?
 Anger! Violence! Raising your hand to a brother Christian!
 
 SPINTHO. It's easy for you. You're strong. Your nerves are all
 right. But I'm full of disease. (Ferrovius takes his hand from
 him with instinctive disgust). I've drunk all my nerves away. I
 shall have the horrors all night.
 
 ANDROCLES (sympathetic) Oh, don't take on so, brother. We're all
 sinners.
 
 SPINTHO (snivelling, trying to feel consoled). Yes: I daresay if
 the truth were known, you're all as bad as I am.
 
 LAVINIA (contemptuously) Does THAT comfort you?
 
 FERROVIUS (sternly) Pray, man, pray.
 
 SPINTHO. What's the good of praying? If we're martyred we shall
 go to heaven, shan't we, whether we pray or not?
 
 FERROVIUS. What's that? Not pray! (Seizing him again) Pray this
 instant, you dog, you rotten hound, you slimy snake, you beastly
 goat, or--
 
 SPINTHO. Yes: beat me: kick me. I forgive you: mind that.
 
 FERROVIUS (spurning him with loathing) Yah! (Spintho reels away
 and falls in front of Ferrovius).
 
 ANDROCLES (reaching out and catching the skirt of Ferrovius's
 tunic) Dear brother: if you wouldn't mind--just for my sake--
 
 FERROVIUS. Well?
 
 ANDROCLES. Don't call him by the names of the animals. We've no
 right to. I've had such friends in dogs. A pet snake is the best
 of company. I was nursed on goat's milk. Is it fair to them to
 call the like of him a dog or a snake or a goat?
 
 FERROVIUS. I only meant that they have no souls.
 
 ANDROCLES (anxiously protesting) Oh, believe me, they have. Just
 the same as you and me. I really don't think I could consent to
 go to heaven if I thought there were to be no animals there.
--**--**--
 
 THE OX DRIVER. It's the menagerie service. My team of oxen is
 drawing the new lion to the Coliseum. You clear the road.
 
 CENTURION. What! Go in after you in your dust, with half the town
 at the heels of you and your lion! Not likely. We go first.
 
 THE OX DRIVER. The menagerie service is the Emperor's personal
 retinue. You clear out, I tell you.
 
 CENTURION. You tell me, do you? Well, I'll tell you something. If
 the lion is menagerie service, the lion's dinner is menagerie
 service too. This (pointing to the Christians) is the lion's
 dinner. So back with you to your bullocks double quick; and learn
 your place. March. (The soldiers start). Now then, you Christians,
 step out there.
 
 LAVINIA (marching) Come along, the rest of the dinner. I shall be
 the olives and anchovies.
 
 ANOTHER CHRISTIAN (laughing) I shall be the soup.
 
 ANOTHER. I shall be the fish.
 
 ANOTHER. Ferrovius shall be the roast boar.
 
 FERROVIUS (heavily) I see the joke. Yes, yes: I shall be the
 roast boar. Ha! ha! (He laughs conscientiously and marches out
 with them).
 
 ANDROCLES. I shall be the mince pie. (Each announcement is
 received with a louder laugh by all the rest as the joke catches
 on).
 
 CENTURION (scandalised) Silence! Have some sense of your
 situation. Is this the way for martyrs to behave? (To Spintho,
 who is quaking and loitering) I know what YOU'LL be at that
 dinner. You'll be the emetic. (He shoves him rudely along).
 
 SPINTHO. It's too dreadful: I'm not fit to die.
 
 CENTURION. Fitter than you are to live, you swine.
 
 They pass from the square westward. The oxen, drawing a waggon
 with a great wooden cage and the lion in it, arrive through the
 central arch.
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
 Behind the Emperor's box at the Coliseum, where the performers
--**--**--
 
 The gladiator with the net picks it up. The gladiator with the
 helmet puts it on; and the two go into the arena, the net thrower
 taking out a little brush and arranging his hair as he goes, the
 other tightening his straps and shaking his shoulders loose. Both
 look at themselves in the mirrors before they enter the passage.
 
 LAVINIA. Will they really kill one another?
 
 SPINTHO. Yes, if the people turn down their thumbs.
 
 THE EDITOR. You know nothing about it. The people indeed! Do you
 suppose we would kill a man worth perhaps fifty talents to please
 the riffraff? I should like to catch any of my men at it.
 
 SPINTHO. I thought--
 
 THE EDITOR (contemptuously) You thought! Who cares what you
 think? YOU'LL be killed all right enough.
 
 SPINTHO (groans and again hides his face)!!! Then is nobody ever
 killed except us poor--
 
 LAVINIA. Christians?
 
 THE EDITOR. If the vestal virgins turn down their thumbs, that's
 another matter. They're ladies of rank.
 
 LAVINIA. Does the Emperor ever interfere?
 
 THE EDITOR. Oh, yes: he turns his thumbs up fast enough if the
 vestal virgins want to have one of his pet fighting men killed.
 
 ANDROCLES. But don't they ever just only pretend to kill one
 another? Why shouldn't you pretend to die, and get dragged out as
 if you were dead; and then get up and go home, like an actor?
 
 THE EDITOR. See here: you want to know too much. There will be no
 pretending about the new lion: let that be enough for you. He's
 hungry.
 
 SPINTHO (groaning with horror) Oh, Lord! Can't you stop talking
 about it? Isn't it bad enough for us without that?
 
 ANDROCLES. I'm glad he's hungry. Not that I want him to suffer,
 poor chap! but then he'll enjoy eating me so much more. There's a
--**--**--
 THE EDITOR. Honor! The honor of a tailor?
 
 ANDROCLES (apologetically) Well, perhaps honor is too strong an
 expression. Still, you know, I couldn't allow the tailors to get
 a bad name through me.
 
 THE EDITOR. How much will you remember of all that when you smell
 the beast's breath and see his jaws opening to tear out your
 throat?
 
 SPINTHO (rising with a yell of terror) I can't bear it. Where's
 the altar? I'll sacrifice.
 
 FERROVIUS. Dog of an apostate. Iscariot!
 
 SPINTHO. I'll repent afterwards. I fully mean to die in the arena
 I'll die a martyr and go to heaven; but not this time, not now,
 not until my nerves are better. Besides, I'm too young: I want to
 have just one more good time. (The gladiators laugh at him). Oh,
 will no one tell me where the altar is? (He dashes into the
 passage and vanishes).
 
 ANDROCLES (to the Editor, pointing after Spintho) Brother: I
 can't do that, not even to oblige you. Don't ask me.
 
 THE EDITOR. Well, if you're determined to die, I can't help you.
 But I wouldn't be put off by a swine like that.
 
 FERROVIUS. Peace, peace: tempt him not. Get thee behind him,
 Satan.
 
 THE EDITOR (flushing with rage) For two pins I'd take a turn in
 the arena myself to-day, and pay you out for daring to talk to me
 like that.
 
 Ferrovius springs forward.
 
 LAVINIA (rising quickly and interposing) Brother, brother: you
 forget.
 
 FERROVIUS (curbing himself by a mighty effort) Oh, my temper, my
 wicked temper! (To the Editor, as Lavinia sits down again,
 reassured). Forgive me, brother. My heart was full of wrath: I
 should have been thinking of your dear precious soul.
 
 THE EDITOR. Yah! (He turns his back on Ferrovius contemptuously,
 and goes back to his seat).
--**--**--
 starving. It couldn't help itself. THE CHRISTIANS. What! Ate him!
 How frightful! How terrible! Without a moment to repent! God be
 merciful to him, a sinner! Oh, I can't bear to think of it! In
 the midst of his sin! Horrible, horrible! THE EDITOR. Serve the
 rotter right! THE GLADIATORS. Just walked into it, he did. He's
 martyred all right enough. Good old lion! Old Jock doesn't like
 that: look at his face. Devil a better! The Emperor will laugh
 when he hears of it. I can't help smiling. Ha ha ha!!!!!
 
 THE KEEPER. Now his appetite's taken off, he won't as much as
 look at another Christian for a week.
 
 ANDROCLES. Couldn't you have saved him brother?
 
 THE KEEPER. Saved him! Saved him from a lion that I'd just got
 mad with hunger! a wild one that came out of the forest not four
 weeks ago! He bolted him before you could say Balbus.
 
 LAVINIA (sitting down again) Poor Spintho! And it won't even
 count as martyrdom!
 
 THE KEEPER. Serve him right! What call had he to walk down the
 throat of one of my lions before he was asked?
 
 ANDROCLES. Perhaps the lion won't eat me now.
 
 THE KEEPER. Yes: that's just like a Christian: think only of
 yourself! What am I to do? What am I to say to the Emperor when
 he sees one of my lions coming into the arena half asleep?
 
 THE EDITOR. Say nothing. Give your old lion some bitters and a
 morsel of fried fish to wake up his appetite. (Laughter).
 
 THE KEEPER. Yes: it's easy for you to talk; but--
 
 THE EDITOR (scrambling to his feet) Sh! Attention there! The
 Emperor. (The Keeper bolts precipitately into the passage. The
 gladiators rise smartly and form into line).
 
 The Emperor enters on the Christians' side, conversing with
--**--**--
 CAESAR. My Worship! Good! A new title. Well, what miracles can
 you perform?
 
 ANDROCLES. I can cure warts by rubbing them with my tailor's
 chalk; and I can live with my wife without beating her.
 
 CAESAR. Is that all?
 
 ANDROCLES. You don't know her, Caesar, or you wouldn't say that.
 
 CAESAR. Ah, well, my friend, we shall no doubt contrive a happy
 release for you. Which is Ferrovius?
 
 FERROVIUS. I am he.
 
 CAESAR. They tell me you can fight.
 
 FERROVIUS. It is easy to fight. I can die, Caesar.
 
 CAESAR. That is still easier, is it not?
 
 FERROVIUS. Not to me, Caesar. Death comes hard to my flesh; and
 fighting comes very easily to my spirit (beating his breast and
 lamenting) O sinner that I am! (He throws himself down on the
 steps, deeply discouraged).
 
 CAESAR. Metellus: I should like to have this man in the Pretorian
 Guard.
 
 METELLUS. I should not, Caesar. He looks a spoilsport. There are
 men in whose presence it is impossible to have any fun: men who are
 a sort of walking conscience. He would make us all uncomfortable.
 
 CAESAR. For that reason, perhaps, it might be well to have him.
 An Emperor can hardly have too many consciences. (To Ferrovius)
 Listen, Ferrovius. (Ferrovius shakes his head and will not look
 up). You and your friends shall not be outnumbered to-day in the
 arena. You shall have arms; and there will be no more than one
 gladiator to each Christian. If you come out of the arena alive,
 I will consider favorably any request of yours, and give you a
 place in the Pretorian Guard. Even if the request be that no
 questions be asked about your faith I shall perhaps not refuse
 it.
 
 FERROVIUS. I will not fight. I will die. Better stand with the
--**--**--
 SECUTOR. Let HIM be on his guard. Next time I'll throw my sword
 at his heels and strangle him with his own net before he can hop
 off. (To Retiarius) You see if I don't. (He goes out past the
 gladiators, sulky and furious).
 
 CAESAR (to the chuckling Retiarius). These tricks are not wise,
 my friend. The audience likes to see a dead man in all his beauty
 and splendor. If you smudge his face and spoil his armor they
 will show their displeasure by not letting you kill him. And when
 your turn comes, they will remember it against you and turn their
 thumbs down.
 
 THE RETIARIUS. Perhaps that is why I did it, Caesar. He bet me
 ten sesterces that he would vanquish me. If I had had to kill
 him I should not have had the money.
 
 CAESAR (indulgent, laughing) You rogues: there is no end to your
 tricks. I'll dismiss you all and have elephants to fight. They
 fight fairly. (He goes up to his box, and knocks at it. It is
 opened from within by the Captain, who stands as on parade to let
 him pass). The Call Boy comes from the passage, followed by
 three attendants carrying respectively a bundle of swords, some
 helmets, and some breastplates and pieces of armor which they
 throw down in a heap.
 
 THE CALL BOY. By your leave, Caesar. Number eleven! Gladiators
 and Christians!
 
 Ferrovius springs up, ready for martyrdom. The other Christians
 take the summons as best they can, some joyful and brave, some
 patient and dignified, some tearful and helpless, some embracing
 one another with emotion. The Call Boy goes back into the
 passage.
 
 CAESAR (turning at the door of the box) The hour has come,
 Ferrovius. I shall go into my box and see you killed, since you
--**--**--
 and put on any armor you can find to fit you.
 
 ANDROCLES. No, really: I can't fight: I never could. I can't
 bring myself to dislike anyone enough. I'm to be thrown to the
 lions with the lady.
 
 THE EDITOR. Then get out of the way and hold your noise.
 (Androcles steps aside with cheerful docility). Now then! Are you
 all ready there? A trumpet is heard from the arena.
 
 FERROVIUS (starting convulsively) Heaven give me strength!
 
 THE EDITOR. Aha! That frightens you, does it?
 
 FERROVIUS. Man: there is no terror like the terror of that sound
 to me. When I hear a trumpet or a drum or the clash of steel or
 the hum of the catapult as the great stone flies, fire runs
 through my veins: I feel my blood surge up hot behind my eyes: I
 must charge: I must strike: I must conquer: Caesar himself will
 not be safe in his imperial seat if once that spirit gets loose
 in me. Oh, brothers, pray! exhort me! remind me that if I raise
 my sword my honor falls and my Master is crucified afresh.
 
 ANDROCLES. Just keep thinking how cruelly you might hurt the poor
 gladiators.
 
 FERROVIUS. It does not hurt a man to kill him.
 
 LAVINIA. Nothing but faith can save you.
 
 FERROVIUS. Faith! Which faith? There are two faiths. There is our
 faith. And there is the warrior's faith, the faith in fighting,
 the faith that sees God in the sword. How if that faith should
 overwhelm me?
 
 LAVINIA. You will find your real faith in the hour of trial.
 
 FERROVIUS. That is what I fear. I know that I am a fighter. How
 can I feel sure that I am a Christian?
 
 ANDROCLES. Throw away the sword, brother.
 
 FERROVIUS. I cannot. It cleaves to my hand. I could as easily
--**--**--
 off in one twist.
 
 Before the Editor can retort, the Call Boy rushes up through the
 passage; and the Captain comes from the Emperor's box and
 descends the steps.
 
 THE CALL BOY. In with you: into the arena. The stage is waiting.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. The Emperor is waiting. (To the Editor) What are you
 dreaming of, man? Send your men in at once.
 
 THE EDITOR. Yes, Sir: it's these Christians hanging back.
 
 FERROVIUS (in a voice of thunder) Liar!
 
 THE EDITOR (not heeding him) March. (The gladiators told off to
 fight with the Christians march down the passage) Follow up
 there, you.
 
 THE CHRISTIAN MEN AND WOMEN (as they part) Be steadfast, brother.
 Farewell. Hold up the faith, brother. Farewell. Go to glory,
 dearest. Farewell. Remember: we are praying for you. Farewell. Be
 strong, brother. Farewell. Don't forget that the divine love and
 our love surround you. Farewell. Nothing can hurt you: remember
 that, brother. Farewell. Eternal glory, dearest. Farewell.
 
 THE EDITOR (out of patience) Shove them in, there.
 
 The remaining gladiators and the Call Boy make a movement towards
 them.
 
 FERROVIUS (interposing) Touch them, dogs; and we die here, and
 cheat the heathen of their spectacle. (To his fellow Christians)
 Brothers: the great moment has come. That passage is your hill to
 Calvary. Mount it bravely, but meekly; and remember! not a word
 of reproach, not a blow nor a struggle. Go. (They go out through
 the passage. He turns to Lavinia) Farewell.
 
 LAVINIA. You forget: I must follow before you are cold.
 
 FERROVIUS. It is true. Do not envy me because I pass before you
 to glory. (He goes through the passage).
 
 THE EDITOR (to the Call Boy) Sickening work, this. Why can't they
 all be thrown to the lions? It's not a man's job. (He throws
--**--**--
 
 THE CAPTAIN (coming to her side) I am on duty with the Emperor,
 Lavinia.
 
 LAVINIA. Is it part of your duty to laugh at us?
 
 THE CAPTAIN. No: that is part of my private pleasure. Your friend
 here is a humorist. I laughed at his telling you to think of
 yourself to keep up your heart. I say, think of yourself and burn
 the incense.
 
 LAVINIA. He is not a humorist: he was right. You ought to know
 that, Captain: you have been face to face with death.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Not with certain death, Lavinia. Only death in
 battle, which spares more men than death in bed. What you are
 facing is certain death. You have nothing left now but your faith
 in this craze of yours: this Christianity. Are your Christian
 fairy stories any truer than our stories about Jupiter and Diana,
 in which, I may tell you, I believe no more than the Emperor
 does, or any educated man in Rome?
 
 LAVINIA. Captain: all that seems nothing to me now. I'll not say
 that death is a terrible thing; but I will say that it is so real
 a thing that when it comes close, all the imaginary things--all
 the stories, as you call them--fade into mere dreams beside that
 inexorable reality. I know now that I am not dying for stories or
 dreams. Did you hear of the dreadful thing that happened here
 while we were waiting?
 
 THE CAPTAIN. I heard that one of your fellows bolted, and ran
 right into the jaws of the lion. I laughed. I still laugh.
 
 LAVINIA. Then you don't understand what that meant?
 
 THE CAPTAIN. It meant that the lion had a cur for his breakfast.
 
 LAVINIA. It meant more than that, Captain. It meant that a man
 cannot die for a story and a dream. None of us believed the
--**--**--
 THE CAPTAIN (strongly moved). By great Diana, I think I would
 strangle you if you gave in now.
 
 LAVINIA (putting her hand on the head of Androcles) The hand of
 God is on us three, Captain.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. What nonsense it all is! And what a monstrous thing
 that you should die for such nonsense, and that I should look on
 helplessly when my whole soul cries out against it! Die then if
 you must; but at least I can cut the Emperor's throat and then my
 own when I see your blood.
 
 The Emperor throws open the door of his box angrily, and appears
 in wrath on the threshold. The Editor, the Call Boy, and the
 gladiators spring to their feet.
 
 THE EMPEROR. The Christians will not fight; and your curs cannot
 get their blood up to attack them. It's all that fellow with the
 blazing eyes. Send for the whip. (The Call Boy rushes out on the
 east side for the whip). If that will not move them, bring the
 hot irons. The man is like a mountain. (He returns angrily into
 the box and slams the door).
 
 The Call Boy returns with a man in a hideous Etruscan mask,
 carrying a whip. They both rush down the passage into the arena.
 
 LAVINIA (rising) Oh, that is unworthy. Can they not kill him
 without dishonoring him?
 
 ANDROCLES (scrambling to his feet and running into the middle of
 the space between the staircases) It's dreadful. Now I want to
 fight. I can't bear the sight of a whip. The only time I ever hit
 a man was when he lashed an old horse with a whip. It was
 terrible: I danced on his face when he was on the ground. He
 mustn't strike Ferrovius: I'll go into the arena and kill him
--**--**--
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Who are the baskets for?
 
 THE CALL Boy. For the whip. He's in pieces. They're all in
 pieces, more or less. (Lavinia hides her face).
 
 (Two more masked slaves come in with a basket and follow the
 others into the arena, as the Call Boy turns to the gladiators
 and exclaims, exhausted) Boys, he's killed the lot.
 
 THE EMPEROR (again bursting from his box, this time in an ecstasy
 of delight) Where is he? Magnificent! He shall have a laurel
 crown.
 
 Ferrovius, madly waving his bloodstained sword, rushes through
 the passage in despair, followed by his co-religionists, and by
 the menagerie keeper, who goes to the gladiators. The gladiators
 draw their swords nervously.
 
 FERROVIUs. Lost! lost forever! I have betrayed my Master. Cut off
 this right hand: it has offended. Ye have swords, my brethren:
 strike.
 
 LAVINIA. No, no. What have you done, Ferrovius?
 
 FERROVIUS. I know not; but there was blood behind my eyes; and
 there's blood on my sword. What does that mean?
 
 THE EMPEROR (enthusiastically, on the landing outside his box)
 What does it mean? It means that you are the greatest man in
 Rome. It means that you shall have a laurel crown of gold. Superb
 fighter, I could almost yield you my throne. It is a record for
 my reign: I shall live in history. Once, in Domitian's time, a
 Gaul slew three men in the arena and gained his freedom. But when
 before has one naked man slain six armed men of the bravest and
 best? The persecution shall cease: if Christians can fight like
 this, I shall have none but Christians to fight for me. (To the
 Gladiators) You are ordered to become Christians, you there: do
 you hear?
 
 RETIARIUS. It is all one to us, Caesar. Had I been there with my
--**--**--
 THE MENAGERIE KEEPER. Why not that little Greek chap? He's not a
 Christian: he's a sorcerer.
 
 THE EMPEROR. The very thing: he will do very well.
 
 THE CALL Boy (issuing from the passage) Number twelve. The
 Christian for the new lion.
 
 ANDROCLES (rising, and pulling himself sadly together) Well, it
 was to be, after all.
 
 LAVINIA. I'll go in his place, Caesar. Ask the Captain whether
 they do not like best to see a woman torn to pieces. He told me
 so yesterday.
 
 THE EMPEROR. There is something in that: there is certainly
 something in that--if only I could feel sure that your brother
 would not fret.
 
 ANDROCLES. No: I should never have another happy hour. No: on the
 faith of a Christian and the honor of a tailor, I accept the lot
 that has fallen on me. If my wife turns up, give her my love and
 say that my wish was that she should be happy with her next, poor
 fellow! Caesar: go to your box and see how a tailor can die. Make
 way for number twelve there. (He marches out along the passage).
 
 The vast audience in the amphitheatre now sees the Emperor
 re-enter his box and take his place as Androcles, desperately
 frightened, but still marching with piteous devotion, emerges
 from the other end of the passage, and finds himself at the focus
 of thousands of eager eyes. The lion's cage, with a heavy
 portcullis grating, is on his left. The Emperor gives a signal. A
 gong sounds. Androcles shivers at the sound; then falls on his
 knees and prays.
 
 The grating rises with a clash. The lion bounds into the arena.
 He rushes round frisking in his freedom. He sees Androcles. He
 stops; rises stiffly by straightening his legs; stretches out his
 nose forward and his tail in a horizontal line behind, like a
--**--**--
 roars, achieves something very like a laugh).
 
 THE EMPEROR (standing on a chair inside his box and looking over
 the wall) Sorcerer: I command you to put that lion to death
 instantly. It is guilty of high treason. Your conduct is most
 disgra-- (the lion charges at him up the stairs) help! (He
 disappears. The lion rears against the box; looks over the
 partition at him, and roars. The Emperor darts out through the
 door and down to Androcles, pursued by the lion.)
 
 ANDROCLES. Don't run away, sir: he can't help springing if you
 run. (He seizes the Emperor and gets between him and the lion,
 who stops at once). Don't be afraid of him.
 
 THE EMPEROR. I am NOT afraid of him. (The lion crouches,
 growling. The Emperor clutches Androcles) Keep between us.
 
 ANDROCLES. Never be afraid of animals, your Worship: that's the
 great secret. He'll be as gentle as a lamb when he knows that you
 are his friend. Stand quite still; and smile; and let him smell
 you all over just to reassure him; for, you see, he's afraid of
 you; and he must examine you thoroughly before he gives you his
 confidence. (To the lion) Come now, Tommy; and speak nicely to
 the Emperor, the great, good Emperor who has power to have all
 our heads cut off if we don't behave very, VERY respectfully to
 him.
 
 The lion utters a fearful roar. The Emperor dashes madly up the
 steps, across the landing, and down again on the other side, with
 the lion in hot pursuit. Androcles rushes after the lion;
 overtakes him as he is descending; and throws himself on his
 back, trying to use his toes as a brake. Before he can stop him
 the lion gets hold of the trailing end of the Emperor's robe.
--**--**--
 Androcles, my sweetest friend, my long lost brother, come to my
 arms. (He embraces Androcles). Oh, what an abominable smell of
 garlic!
 
 The lion lets go the robe and rolls over on his back, clasping
 his forepaws over one another coquettishly above his nose.
 
 ANDROCLES. There! You see, your worship, a child might play with
 him now. See! (He tickles the lion's belly. The lion wriggles
 ecstatically). Come and pet him.
 
 THE EMPEROR. I must conquer these unkingly terrors. Mind you
 don't go away from him, though. (He pats the lion's chest).
 
 ANDROCLES. Oh, sir, how few men would have the courage to do
 that--
 
 THE EMPEROR. Yes: it takes a bit of nerve. Let us invite the
 Court in and frighten them. Is he safe, do you think?
 
 ANDROCLES. Quite safe now, sir.
 
 THE EMPEROR (majestically) What ho, there! All who are within
 hearing, return without fear. Caesar has tamed the lion. (All the
 fugitives steal cautiously in. The menagerie keeper comes from
 the passage with other keepers armed with iron bars and
 tridents). Take those things away. I have subdued the beast. (He
 places his foot on it).
 
 FERROVIUS (timidly approaching the Emperor and looking down with
 awe on the lion) It is strange that I, who fear no man, should
 fear a lion.
 
 THE CAPTAIN. Every man fears something, Ferrovius.
 
 THE EMPEROR. How about the Pretorian Guard now?
 
 FERROVIUS. In my youth I worshipped Mars, the God of War. I
 turned from him to serve the Christian god; but today the
 Christian god forsook me; and Mars overcame me and took back his
 own. The Christian god is not yet. He will come when Mars and I
 are dust; but meanwhile I must serve the gods that are, not the
 God that will be. Until then I accept service in the Guard,
--**--**--
 back). You see how magnanimous we Romans are, Androcles. We
 suffer you to go in peace.
 
 ANDROCLES. I thank your worship. I thank you all, ladies and
 gentlemen. Come, Tommy. Whilst we stand together, no cage for
 you: no slavery for me. (He goes out with the lion, everybody
 crowding away to give him as wide a berth as possible).
 
 
 
 In this play I have represented one of the Roman persecutions of
 the early Christians, not as the conflict of a false theology
 with a true, but as what all such persecutions essentially are:
 an attempt to suppress a propaganda that seemed to threaten the
 interests involved in the established law and order, organized
 and maintained in the name of religion and justice by politicians
 who are pure opportunist Have-and-Holders. People who are shown
 by their inner light the possibility of a better world based on
 the demand of the spirit for a nobler and more abundant life, not
 for themselves at the expense of others, but for everybody, are
 naturally dreaded and therefore hated by the Have-and-Holders,
 who keep always in reserve two sure weapons against them. The
 first is a persecution effected by the provocation, organization,
 and arming of that herd instinct which makes men abhor all
 departures from custom, and, by the most cruel punishments and
 the wildest calumnies, force eccentric people to behave and
 profess exactly as other people do. The second is by leading the
 herd to war, which immediately and infallibly makes them forget
 everything, even their most cherished and hardwon public
 liberties and private interests, in the irresistible surge of
 their pugnacity and the tense pre-occupation of their terror.
 
 There is no reason to believe that there was anything more in the
 Roman persecutions than this. The attitude of the Roman Emperor
--**--**--
 Lavinia, a clever and fearless freethinker, shocks the Pauline
 Ferrovius, who is comparatively stupid and conscience ridden.
 Spintho, the blackguardly debauchee, is presented as one of the
 typical Christians of that period on the authority of St.
 Augustine, who seems to have come to the conclusion at one period
 of his development that most Christians were what we call wrong
 uns. No doubt he was to some extent right: I have had occasion
 often to point out that revolutionary movements attract those who
 are not good enough for established institutions as well as those
 who are too good for them.
 
 But the most striking aspect of the play at this moment is the
 terrible topicality given it by the war. We were at peace when I
 pointed out, by the mouth of Ferrovius, the path of an honest man
 who finds out, when the trumpet sounds, that he cannot follow
 Jesus. Many years earlier, in The Devil's Disciple, I touched the
 same theme even more definitely, and showed the minister throwing
 off his black coat for ever when he discovered, amid the thunder
 of the captains and the shouting, that he was a born fighter.
 Great numbers of our clergy have found themselves of late in the
 position of Ferrovius and Anthony Anderson. They have discovered
 that they hate not only their enemies but everyone who does not
 share their hatred, and that they want to fight and to force
 other people to fight. They have turned their churches into
 recruiting stations and their vestries into munition workshops.
 But it has never occurred to them to take off their black coats
 and say quite simply, "I find in the hour of trial that the
 Sermon on the Mount is tosh, and that I am not a Christian. I
 apologize for all the unpatriotic nonsense I have been preaching
--**--**--
 Freethinkers. Thus we see that even among men who make a
 profession of religion the great majority are as Martian as the
 majority of their congregations. The average clergyman is an
 official who makes his living by christening babies, marrying
 adults, conducting a ritual, and making the best he can (when he
 has any conscience about it) of a certain routine of school
 superintendence, district visiting, and organization of
 almsgiving, which does not necessarily touch Christianity at any
 point except the point of the tongue. The exceptional or
 religious clergyman may be an ardent Pauline salvationist, in
 which case his more cultivated parishioners dislike him, and say
 that he ought to have joined the Methodists. Or he may be an
 artist expressing religious emotion without intellectual
 definition by means of poetry, music, vestments and architecture,
 also producing religious ecstacy by physical expedients, such as
 fasts and vigils, in which case he is denounced as a Ritualist.
 Or he may be either a Unitarian Deist like Voltaire or Tom Paine,
 or the more modern sort of Anglican Theosophist to whom the Holy
 Ghost is the Elan Vital of Bergson, and the Father and Son are an
 expression of the fact that our functions and aspects are
 manifold, and that we are all sons and all either potential or
 actual parents, in which case he is strongly suspected by the
 straiter Salvationists of being little better than an Atheist.
 All these varieties, you see, excite remark. They may be very
 popular with their congregations; but they are regarded by the
 average man as the freaks of the Church. The Church, like the
 society of which it is an organ, is balanced and steadied by the
 great central Philistine mass above whom theology looms as a
 highly spoken of and doubtless most important thing, like Greek
--**--**--
 heretical religious sects: they will be Peculiars, Anti-Vivisectionists,
 Flat-Earth men, scoffers at the laboratories, or infidels who refuse
 to kneel down when a procession of doctors goes by. But the lions
 will hurt them just as much, and the spectators will enjoy themselves
 just as much, as the Roman lions and spectators used to do.
 
 It was currently reported in the Berlin newspapers that when
 Androcles was first performed in Berlin, the Crown Prince rose
 and left the house, unable to endure the (I hope) very clear and
 fair exposition of autocratic Imperialism given by the Roman
 captain to his Christian prisoners. No English Imperialist was
 intelligent and earnest enough to do the same in London. If the
 report is correct, I confirm the logic of the Crown Prince, and
 am glad to find myself so well understood. But I can assure him
 that the Empire which served for my model when I wrote Androcles
 was, as he is now finding to his cost, much nearer my home than
 the German one.
 
--**--**--
 In the preface to my Plays for Puritans I explained the predicament of
 our contemporary English drama, forced to deal almost exclusively with
 cases of sexual attraction, and yet forbidden to exhibit the incidents
 of that attraction or even to discuss its nature. Your suggestion that
 I should write a Don Juan play was virtually a challenge to me to treat
 this subject myself dramatically. The challenge was difficult enough
 to be worth accepting, because, when you come to think of it, though we
 have plenty of dramas with heroes and heroines who are in love and must
 accordingly marry or perish at the end of the play, or about people
 whose relations with one another have been complicated by the marriage
 laws, not to mention the looser sort of plays which trade on the
 tradition that illicit love affairs are at once vicious and delightful,
 we have no modern English plays in which the natural attraction of the
 sexes for one another is made the mainspring of the action. That is
 why we insist on beauty in our performers, differing herein from the
 countries our friend William Archer holds up as examples of seriousness
 to our childish theatres. There the Juliets and Isoldes, the Romeos and
 Tristans, might be our mothers and fathers. Not so the English actress.
 The heroine she impersonates is not allowed to discuss the elemental
 relations of men and women: all her romantic twaddle about novelet-made
 love, all her purely legal dilemmas as to whether she was married
 or "betrayed," quite miss our hearts and worry our minds. To console
 ourselves we must just look at her. We do so; and her beauty feeds our
 starving emotions. Sometimes we grumble ungallantly at the lady because
 she does not act as well as she looks. But in a drama which, with all
--**--**--
 philosophically. Our vagabond libertines are no more interesting from
 that point of view than the sailor who has a wife in every port, and
 Byron's hero is, after all, only a vagabond libertine. And he is dumb:
 he does not discuss himself with a Sganarelle-Leporello or with the
 fathers or brothers of his mistresses: he does not even, like Casanova,
 tell his own story. In fact he is not a true Don Juan at all; for he is
 no more an enemy of God than any romantic and adventurous young sower of
 wild oats. Had you and I been in his place at his age, who knows whether
 we might not have done as he did, unless indeed your fastidiousness
 had saved you from the empress Catherine. Byron was as little of a
 philosopher as Peter the Great: both were instances of that rare and
 useful, but unedifying variation, an energetic genius born without
 the prejudices or superstitions of his contemporaries. The resultant
 unscrupulous freedom of thought made Byron a greater poet than
 Wordsworth just as it made Peter a greater king than George III; but
 as it was, after all, only a negative qualification, it did not prevent
 Peter from being an appalling blackguard and an arrant poltroon, nor did
 it enable Byron to become a religious force like Shelley. Let us, then,
 leave Byron's Don Juan out of account. Mozart's is the last of the true
 Don Juans; for by the time he was of age, his cousin Faust had, in the
 hands of Goethe, taken his place and carried both his warfare and his
 reconciliation with the gods far beyond mere lovemaking into politics,
 high art, schemes for reclaiming new continents from the ocean, and
 recognition of an eternal womanly principle in the universe. Goethe's
 Faust and Mozart's Don Juan were the last words of the XVIII century
--**--**--
 As a result, Man is no longer, like Don Juan, victor in the duel of
 sex. Whether he has ever really been may be doubted: at all events
 the enormous superiority of Woman's natural position in this matter is
 telling with greater and greater force. As to pulling the Nonconformist
 Conscience by the beard as Don Juan plucked the beard of the
 Commandant's statue in the convent of San Francisco, that is out of the
 question nowadays: prudence and good manners alike forbid it to a hero
 with any mind. Besides, it is Don Juan's own beard that is in danger of
 plucking. Far from relapsing into hypocrisy, as Sganarelle feared,
 he has unexpectedly discovered a moral in his immorality. The growing
 recognition of his new point of view is heaping responsibility on him.
 His former jests he has had to take as seriously as I have had to take
 some of the jests of Mr W. S. Gilbert. His scepticism, once his least
 tolerated quality, has now triumphed so completely that he can no
 longer assert himself by witty negations, and must, to save himself from
 cipherdom, find an affirmative position. His thousand and three affairs
 of gallantry, after becoming, at most, two immature intrigues leading to
 sordid and prolonged complications and humiliations, have been discarded
 altogether as unworthy of his philosophic dignity and compromising to
 his newly acknowledged position as the founder of a school. Instead of
 pretending to read Ovid he does actually read Schopenhaur and Nietzsche,
 studies Westermarck, and is concerned for the future of the race instead
 of for the freedom of his own instincts. Thus his profligacy and his
 dare-devil airs have gone the way of his sword and mandoline into the
 rag shop of anachronisms and superstitions. In fact, he is now more
--**--**--
 be ashamed as well as I knew the vanity of the poetic qualities of which
 Englishmen teach Irishmen to be proud. For the Irishman instinctively
 disparages the quality which makes the Englishman dangerous to him; and
 the Englishman instinctively flatters the fault that makes the Irishman
 harmless and amusing to him. What is wrong with the prosaic Englishman
 is what is wrong with the prosaic men of all countries: stupidity. The
 vitality which places nourishment and children first, heaven and hell
 a somewhat remote second, and the health of society as an organic whole
 nowhere, may muddle successfully through the comparatively tribal stages
 of gregariousness; but in nineteenth century nations and twentieth
 century empires the determination of every man to be rich at all costs,
 and of every woman to be married at all costs, must, without a highly
 scientific social organization, produce a ruinous development of
 poverty, celibacy, prostitution, infant mortality, adult degeneracy, and
 everything that wise men most dread. In short, there is no future for
 men, however brimming with crude vitality, who are neither intelligent
 nor politically educated enough to be Socialists. So do not
 misunderstand me in the other direction either: if I appreciate the
 vital qualities of the Englishman as I appreciate the vital qualities of
 the bee, I do not guarantee the Englishman against being, like the
 bee (or the Canaanite) smoked out and unloaded of his honey by beings
 inferior to himself in simple acquisitiveness, combativeness, and
 fecundity, but superior to him in imagination and cunning.
 
 The Don Juan play, however, is to deal with sexual attraction, and not
 with nutrition, and to deal with it in a society in which the serious
 business of sex is left by men to women, as the serious business of
 nutrition is left by women to men. That the men, to protect themselves
--**--**--
 produce really impressive art-works. Those who can are men of genius:
 that is, men selected by Nature to carry on the work of building up an
 intellectual consciousness of her own instinctive purpose. Accordingly,
 we observe in the man of genius all the unscrupulousness and all the
 "self-sacrifice" (the two things are the same) of Woman. He will risk
 the stake and the cross; starve, when necessary, in a garret all his
 life; study women and live on their work and care as Darwin studied
 worms and lived upon sheep; work his nerves into rags without payment,
 a sublime altruist in his disregard of himself, an atrocious egotist in
 his disregard of others. Here Woman meets a purpose as impersonal, as
 irresistible as her own; and the clash is sometimes tragic. When it is
 complicated by the genius being a woman, then the game is one for a king
 of critics: your George Sand becomes a mother to gain experience for
 the novelist and to develop her, and gobbles up men of genius, Chopins,
 Mussets and the like, as mere hors d'oeuvres.
 
 I state the extreme case, of course; but what is true of the great man
 who incarnates the philosophic consciousness of Life and the woman who
 incarnates its fecundity, is true in some degree of all geniuses and
 all women. Hence it is that the world's books get written, its pictures
 painted, its statues modelled, its symphonies composed, by people who
 are free of the otherwise universal dominion of the tyranny of sex.
 Which leads us to the conclusion, astonishing to the vulgar, that art,
 instead of being before all things the expression of the normal sexual
 situation, is really the only department in which sex is a superseded
 and secondary power, with its consciousness so confused and its purpose
--**--**--
 people the most perfect political constitution and the soundest
 political program that benevolent omniscience can devise for them, and
 they will interpret it into mere fashionable folly or canting charity as
 infallibly as a savage converts the philosophical theology of a Scotch
 missionary into crude African idolatry.
 
 I do not know whether you have any illusions left on the subject of
 education, progress, and so forth. I have none. Any pamphleteer can show
 the way to better things; but when there is no will there is no way. My
 nurse was fond of remarking that you cannot make a silk purse out of
 a sow's ear, and the more I see of the efforts of our churches and
 universities and literary sages to raise the mass above its own level,
 the more convinced I am that my nurse was right. Progress can do nothing
 but make the most of us all as we are, and that most would clearly not
 be enough even if those who are already raised out of the lowest
 abysses would allow the others a chance. The bubble of Heredity has been
 pricked: the certainty that acquirements are negligible as elements in
 practical heredity has demolished the hopes of the educationists as well
 as the terrors of the degeneracy mongers; and we know now that there is
 no hereditary "governing class" any more than a hereditary hooliganism.
 We must either breed political capacity or be ruined by Democracy,
 which was forced on us by the failure of the older alternatives. Yet
 if Despotism failed only for want of a capable benevolent despot, what
 chance has Democracy, which requires a whole population of capable
 voters: that is, of political critics who, if they cannot govern in
 person for lack of spare energy or specific talent for administration,
--**--**--
 sense. You cannot accuse me of this pitiable barrenness, this feeble
 evasion. I not only tell you that my hero wrote a revolutionists'
 handbook: I give you the handbook at full length for your edification if
 you care to read it. And in that handbook you will find the politics of
 the sex question as I conceive Don Juan's descendant to understand them.
 Not that I disclaim the fullest responsibility for his opinions and for
 those of all my characters, pleasant and unpleasant. They are all right
 from their several points of view; and their points of view are, for the
 dramatic moment, mine also. This may puzzle the people who believe that
 there is such a thing as an absolutely right point of view, usually
 their own. It may seem to them that nobody who doubts this can be in a
 state of grace. However that may be, it is certainly true that nobody
 who agrees with them can possibly be a dramatist, or indeed anything
 else that turns upon a knowledge of mankind. Hence it has been pointed
 out that Shakespear had no conscience. Neither have I, in that sense.
 
 You may, however, remind me that this digression of mine into politics
 was preceded by a very convincing demonstration that the artist never
 catches the point of view of the common man on the question of sex,
 because he is not in the same predicament. I first prove that anything I
 write on the relation of the sexes is sure to be misleading; and then I
 proceed to write a Don Juan play. Well, if you insist on asking me why
 I behave in this absurd way, I can only reply that you asked me to,
 and that in any case my treatment of the subject may be valid for the
--**--**--
 could do anything with a serious positive character: they could place a
 human figure before you with perfect verisimilitude; but when the moment
 came for making it live and move, they found, unless it made them laugh,
 that they had a puppet on their hands, and had to invent some artificial
 external stimulus to make it work. This is what is the matter with
 Hamlet all through: he has no will except in his bursts of temper.
 Foolish Bardolaters make a virtue of this after their fashion:
 they declare that the play is the tragedy of irresolution; but all
 Shakespear's projections of the deepest humanity he knew have the same
 defect: their characters and manners are lifelike; but their actions
 are forced on them from without, and the external force is grotesquely
 inappropriate except when it is quite conventional, as in the case of
 Henry V. Falstaff is more vivid than any of these serious reflective
 characters, because he is self-acting: his motives are his own appetites
 and instincts and humors. Richard III, too, is delightful as the
 whimsical comedian who stops a funeral to make love to the corpse's
 widow; but when, in the next act, he is replaced by a stage villain who
 smothers babies and offs with people's heads, we are revolted at the
 imposture and repudiate the changeling. Faulconbridge, Coriolanus,
 Leontes are admirable descriptions of instinctive temperaments: indeed
 the play of Coriolanus is the greatest of Shakespear's comedies; but
 description is not philosophy; and comedy neither compromises the author
 nor reveals him. He must be judged by those characters into which he
 puts what he knows of himself, his Hamlets and Macbeths and Lears and
 Prosperos. If these characters are agonizing in a void about factitious
 melodramatic murders and revenges and the like, whilst the comic
--**--**--
 not dream of buying a set of sermons on Faith versus Works. At bottom
 the controversy is the same, and the dramatic results are the same.
 Bunyan makes no attempt to present his pilgrims as more sensible or
 better conducted than Mr Worldly Wiseman. Mr W. W.'s worst enemies, as
 Mr Embezzler, Mr Never-go-to-Church-on-Sunday, Mr Bad Form, Mr Murderer,
 Mr Burglar, Mr Co-respondent, Mr Blackmailer, Mr Cad, Mr Drunkard, Mr
 Labor Agitator and so forth, can read the Pilgrim's Progress without
 finding a word said against them; whereas the respectable people who
 snub them and put them in prison, such as Mr W.W. himself and his young
 friend Civility; Formalist and Hypocrisy; Wildhead, Inconsiderate, and
 Pragmatick (who were clearly young university men of good family
 and high feeding); that brisk lad Ignorance, Talkative, By-Ends of
 Fairspeech and his mother-in-law Lady Feigning, and other reputable
 gentlemen and citizens, catch it very severely. Even Little Faith,
 though he gets to heaven at last, is given to understand that it served
 him right to be mobbed by the brothers Faint Heart, Mistrust, and
 Guilt, all three recognized members of respectable society and veritable
 pillars of the law. The whole allegory is a consistent attack on
 morality and respectability, without a word that one can remember
 against vice and crime. Exactly what is complained of in Nietzsche and
 Ibsen, is it not? And also exactly what would be complained of in all
 the literature which is great enough and old enough to have attained
 canonical rank, officially or unofficially, were it not that books are
 admitted to the canon by a compact which confesses their greatness in
 consideration of abrogating their meaning; so that the reverend rector
 can agree with the prophet Micah as to his inspired style without being
 committed to any complicity in Micah's furiously Radical opinions. Why,
--**--**--
 Luther destroyed the style of Giotto. All the assertions get disproved
 sooner or later; and so we find the world full of a magnificent debris
 of artistic fossils, with the matter-of-fact credibility gone clean out
 of them, but the form still splendid. And that is why the old masters
 play the deuce with our mere susceptibles. Your Royal Academician thinks
 he can get the style of Giotto without Giotto's beliefs, and correct
 his perspective into the bargain. Your man of letters thinks he can
 get Bunyan's or Shakespear's style without Bunyan's conviction or
 Shakespear's apprehension, especially if he takes care not to split
 his infinitives. And so with your Doctors of Music, who, with their
 collections of discords duly prepared and resolved or retarded or
 anticipated in the manner of the great composers, think they can learn
 the art of Palestrina from Cherubim's treatise. All this academic art
 is far worse than the trade in sham antique furniture; for the man who
 sells me an oaken chest which he swears was made in the XIII century,
 though as a matter of fact he made it himself only yesterday, at least
 does not pretend that there are any modern ideas in it, whereas your
 academic copier of fossils offers them to you as the latest outpouring
 of the human spirit, and, worst of all, kidnaps young people as pupils
 and persuades them that his limitations are rules, his observances
 dexterities, his timidities good taste, and his emptinesses purities.
 And when he declares that art should not be didactic, all the people who
 have nothing to teach and all the people who don't want to learn agree
 with him emphatically.
 
 I pride myself on not being one of these susceptible: If you study
 the electric light with which I supply you in that Bumbledonian public
--**--**--
 engraved portrait of Richard Cobden; enlarged photographs of Martineau,
 Huxley, and George Eliot; autotypes of allegories by Mr G.F. Watts (for
 Roebuck believed in the fine arts with all the earnestness of a man who
 does not understand them), and an impression of Dupont's engraving of
 Delaroche's Beaux Artes hemicycle, representing the great men of
 all ages. On the wall behind him, above the mantelshelf, is a family
 portrait of impenetrable obscurity.
 
 A chair stands near the writing table for the convenience of business
 visitors. Two other chairs are against the wall between the busts.
 
 A parlormaid enters with a visitor's card. Roebuck takes it, and nods,
 pleased. Evidently a welcome caller.
 
 RAMSDEN. Show him up.
 
 The parlormaid goes out and returns with the visitor.
 
 THE MAID. Mr Robinson.
 
 Mr Robinson is really an uncommonly nice looking young fellow. He must,
 one thinks, be the jeune premier; for it is not in reason to suppose
 that a second such attractive male figure should appear in one story.
 The slim shapely frame, the elegant suit of new mourning, the small head
 and regular features, the pretty little moustache, the frank clear eyes,
 the wholesome bloom and the youthful complexion, the well brushed glossy
 hair, not curly, but of fine texture and good dark color, the arch of
 good nature in the eyebrows, the erect forehead and neatly pointed chin,
 all announce the man who will love and suffer later on. And that he will
 not do so without sympathy is guaranteed by an engaging sincerity and
 eager modest serviceableness which stamp him as a man of amiable nature.
 The moment he appears, Ramsden's face expands into fatherly liking and
 welcome, an expression which drops into one of decorous grief as the
 young man approaches him with sorrow in his face as well as in his black
--**--**--
 
 RAMSDEN. Oh, that was his partiality: we were very old friends, you
 know. But there was something else he used to say about you. I wonder
 whether I ought to tell you or not!
 
 OCTAVIUS. You know best.
 
 RAMSDEN. It was something about his daughter.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [eagerly] About Ann! Oh, do tell me that, Mr Ramsden.
 
 RAMSDEN. Well, he said he was glad, after all, you were not his son,
 because he thought that someday Annie and you--[Octavius blushes
 vividly]. Well, perhaps I shouldn't have told you. But he was in
 earnest.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Oh, if only I thought I had a chance! You know, Mr Ramsden, I
 don't care about money or about what people call position; and I can't
 bring myself to take an interest in the business of struggling for them.
 Well, Ann has a most exquisite nature; but she is so accustomed to be
 in the thick of that sort of thing that she thinks a man's character
 incomplete if he is not ambitious. She knows that if she married me she
 would have to reason herself out of being ashamed of me for not being a
 big success of some kind.
 
 RAMSDEN. [Getting up and planting himself with his back to the
 fireplace] Nonsense, my boy, nonsense! You're too modest. What does she
 know about the real value of men at her age? [More seriously] Besides,
 she's a wonderfully dutiful girl. Her father's wish would be sacred to
 her. Do you know that since she grew up to years of discretion, I don't
 believe she has ever once given her own wish as a reason for doing
 anything or not doing it. It's always "Father wishes me to," or "Mother
 wouldn't like it." It's really almost a fault in her. I have often told
 her she must learn to think for herself.
--**--**--
 THE MAID. Mr Tanner wishes to see you, sir.
 
 RAMSDEN. Mr Tanner!
 
 OCTAVIUS. Jack!
 
 RAMSDEN. How dare Mr Tanner call on me! Say I cannot see him.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [hurt] I am sorry you are turning my friend from your door
 like that.
 
 THE MAID. [calmly] He's not at the door, sir. He's upstairs in the
 drawingroom with Miss Ramsden. He came with Mrs Whitefield and Miss Ann
 and Miss Robinson, sir.
 
 Ramsden's feelings are beyond words.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [grinning] That's very like Jack, Mr Ramsden. You must see
 him, even if it's only to turn him out.
 
 RAMSDEN. [hammering out his words with suppressed fury] Go upstairs and
 ask Mr Tanner to be good enough to step down here. [The parlormaid goes
 out; and Ramsden returns to the fireplace, as to a fortified position].
 I must say that of all the confounded pieces of impertinence--well, if
 these are Anarchist manners I hope you like them. And Annie with him!
 Annie! A-- [he chokes].
 
 OCTAVIUS. Yes: that's what surprises me. He's so desperately afraid of
 Ann. There must be something the matter.
 
 Mr John Tanner suddenly opens the door and enters. He is too young to be
 described simply as a big man with a beard. But it is already plain that
 middle life will find him in that category. He has still some of the
 slimness of youth; but youthfulness is not the effect he aims at: his
 frock coat would befit a prime minister; and a certain high chested
 carriage of the shoulders, a lofty pose of the head, and the Olympian
 majesty with which a mane, or rather a huge wisp, of hazel colored
 hair is thrown back from an imposing brow, suggest Jupiter rather than
 Apollo. He is prodigiously fluent of speech, restless, excitable (mark
 the snorting nostril and the restless blue eye, just the thirty-secondth
--**--**--
 TANNER. Mean! [He holds up the will]. Do you know who is appointed Ann's
 guardian by this will?
 
 RAMSDEN. [coolly] I believe I am.
 
 TANNER. You! You and I, man. I! I!! I!!! Both of us! [He flings the will
 down on the writing table].
 
 RAMSDEN. You! Impossible.
 
 TANNER. It's only too hideously true. [He throws himself into Octavius's
 chair]. Ramsden: get me out of it somehow. You don't know Ann as well
 as I do. She'll commit every crime a respectable woman can; and
 she'll justify every one of them by saying that it was the wish of
 her guardians. She'll put everything on us; and we shall have no more
 control over her than a couple of mice over a cat.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Jack: I wish you wouldn't talk like that about Ann.
 
 TANNER. This chap's in love with her: that's another complication. Well,
 she'll either jilt him and say I didn't approve of him, or marry him
 and say you ordered her to. I tell you, this is the most staggering blow
 that has ever fallen on a man of my age and temperament.
 
 RAMSDEN. Let me see that will, sir. [He goes to the writing table and
 picks it up]. I cannot believe that my old friend Whitefield would have
 shown such a want of confidence in me as to associate me with-- [His
 countenance falls as he reads].
 
 TANNER. It's all my own doing: that's the horrible irony of it. He told
 me one day that you were to be Ann's guardian; and like a fool I began
 arguing with him about the folly of leaving a young woman under the
 control of an old man with obsolete ideas.
 
 RAMSDEN. [stupended] My ideas obsolete!!!!!
 
 TANNER. Totally. I had just finished an essay called Down with
--**--**--
 
 RAMSDEN. I do not believe that Whitefield was in his right senses
 when he made that will. You have admitted that he made it under your
 influence.
 
 TANNER. You ought to be pretty well obliged to me for my influence. He
 leaves you two thousand five hundred for your trouble. He leaves Tavy a
 dowry for his sister and five thousand for himself.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [his tears flowing afresh] Oh, I can't take it. He was too
 good to us.
 
 TANNER. You won't get it, my boy, if Ramsden upsets the will.
 
 RAMSDEN. Ha! I see. You have got me in a cleft stick.
 
 TANNER. He leaves me nothing but the charge of Ann's morals, on the
 ground that I have already more money than is good for me. That shows
 that he had his wits about him, doesn't it?
 
 RAMSDEN. [grimly] I admit that.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [rising and coming from his refuge by the wall] Mr Ramsden:
 I think you are prejudiced against Jack. He is a man of honor, and
 incapable of abusing--
 
 TANNER. Don't, Tavy: you'll make me ill. I am not a man of honor: I am
 a man struck down by a dead hand. Tavy: you must marry her after all and
 take her off my hands. And I had set my heart on saving you from her!
 
 OCTAVIUS. Oh, Jack, you talk of saving me from my highest happiness.
 
 TANNER. Yes, a lifetime of happiness. If it were only the first half
 hour's happiness, Tavy, I would buy it for you with my last penny. But
 a lifetime of happiness! No man alive could bear it: it would be hell on
 earth.
 
 RAMSDEN. [violently] Stuff, sir. Talk sense; or else go and waste
 someone else's time: I have something better to do than listen to your
--**--**--
 the British public. I detest its prejudices; I scorn its narrowness; I
 demand the right to think for myself. You pose as an advanced man. Let
 me tell you that I was an advanced man before you were born.
 
 TANNER. I knew it was a long time ago.
 
 RAMSDEN. I am as advanced as ever I was. I defy you to prove that I have
 ever hauled down the flag. I am more advanced than ever I was. I grow
 more advanced every day.
 
 TANNER. More advanced in years, Polonius.
 
 RAMSDEN. Polonius! So you are Hamlet, I suppose.
 
 TANNER. No: I am only the most impudent person you've ever met. That's
 your notion of a thoroughly bad character. When you want to give me a
 piece of your mind, you ask yourself, as a just and upright man, what
 is the worst you can fairly say of me. Thief, liar, forger, adulterer,
 perjurer, glutton, drunkard? Not one of these names fit me. You have
 to fall back on my deficiency in shame. Well, I admit it. I even
 congratulate myself; for if I were ashamed of my real self, I should
 cut as stupid a figure as any of the rest of you. Cultivate a little
 impudence, Ramsden; and you will become quite a remarkable man.
 
 RAMSDEN. I have no--
 
 TANNER. You have no desire for that sort of notoriety. Bless you, I knew
 that answer would come as well as I know that a box of matches will come
 out of an automatic machine when I put a penny in the slot: you would be
 ashamed to say anything else.
 
 The crushing retort for which Ramsden has been visibly collecting his
 forces is lost for ever; for at this point Octavius returns with Miss
 Ann Whitefield and her mother; and Ramsden springs up and hurries to the
--**--**--
 have expected of you; and it does you credit. But it does not settle the
 question so completely as you think. Let me put a case to you. Suppose
 you were to discover that I had been guilty of some disgraceful
 action--that I was not the man your poor dear father took me for. Would
 you still consider it right that I should be Rhoda's guardian?
 
 ANN. I can't imagine you doing anything disgraceful, Granny.
 
 TANNER. [to Ramsden] You haven't done anything of the sort, have you?
 
 RAMSDEN. [indignantly] No sir.
 
 MRS. WHITEFIELD. [placidly] Well, then, why suppose it?
 
 ANN. You see, Granny, Mamma would not like me to suppose it.
 
 RAMSDEN. [much perplexed] You are both so full of natural and
 affectionate feeling in these family matters that it is very hard to put
 the situation fairly before you.
 
 TANNER. Besides, my friend, you are not putting the situation fairly
 before them.
 
 RAMSDEN. [sulkily] Put it yourself, then.
 
 TANNER. I will. Ann: Ramsden thinks I am not fit be your guardian; and I
 quite agree with him. He considers that if your father had read my book,
 he wouldn't have appointed me. That book is the disgraceful action he
 has been talking about. He thinks it's your duty for Rhoda's sake to ask
 him to act alone and to make me withdraw. Say the word and I will.
 
 ANN. But I haven't read your book, Jack.
 
 TANNER. [diving at the waste-paper basket and fishing the book out for
 her] Then read it at once and decide.
 
 RAMSDEN. If I am to be your guardian, I positively forbid you to read
 that book, Annie. [He smites the table with his fist and rises].
 
 ANN. Of course, if you don't wish it. [She puts the book on the table].
 
 TANNER. If one guardian is to forbid you to read the other guardian's
--**--**--
 MRS WHITEFIELD. Of course. My fault as usual! [She follows Ann].
 
 TANNER. [coming from the bockcase] Ramsden: we're
 beaten--smashed--nonentitized, like her mother.
 
 RAMSDEN. Stuff, Sir. [He follows Mrs Whitefield out of the room].
 
 TANNER. [left alone with Octavius, stares whimsically at him] Tavy: do
 you want to count for something in the world?
 
 OCTAVIUS. I want to count for something as a poet: I want to write a
 great play.
 
 TANNER. With Ann as the heroine?
 
 OCTAVIUS. Yes: I confess it.
 
 TANNER. Take care, Tavy. The play with Ann as the heroine is all right;
 but if you're not very careful, by Heaven she'll marry you.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [sighing] No such luck, Jack!
 
 TANNER. Why, man, your head is in the lioness's mouth: you are half
 swallowed already--in three bites--Bite One, Ricky; Bite Two, Ticky;
 Bite Three, Tavy; and down you go.
 
 OCTAVIUS. She is the same to everybody, Jack: you know her ways.
 
 TANNER. Yes: she breaks everybody's back with the stroke of her paw; but
 the question is, which of us will she eat? My own opinion is that she
 means to eat you.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [rising, pettishly] It's horrible to talk like that about her
 when she is upstairs crying for her father. But I do so want her to eat
 me that I can bear your brutalities because they give me hope.
 
 TANNER. Tavy; that's the devilish side of a woman's fascination: she
 makes you will your own destruction.
 
 OCTAVIUS. But it's not destruction: it's fulfilment.
 
 TANNER. Yes, of HER purpose; and that purpose is neither her happiness
 nor yours, but Nature's. Vitality in a woman is a blind fury of
 creation. She sacrifices herself to it: do you think she will hesitate
 to sacrifice you?
 
 OCTAVIUS. Why, it is just because she is self-sacrificing that she will
--**--**--
 
 TANNER. Am I in the way? Good morning, fellow guardian [he goes towards
 the door].
 
 ANN. Stop, Jack. Granny: he must know, sooner or later.
 
 RAMSDEN. Octavius: I have a very serious piece of news for you. It is of
 the most private and delicate nature--of the most painful nature too, I
 am sorry to say. Do you wish Mr Tanner to be present whilst I explain?
 
 OCTAVIUS. [turning pale] I have no secrets from Jack.
 
 RAMSDEN. Before you decide that finally, let me say that the news
 concerns your sister, and that it is terrible news.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Violet! What has happened? Is she--dead?
 
 RAMSDEN. I am not sure that it is not even worse than that.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Is she badly hurt? Has there been an accident?
 
 RAMSDEN. No: nothing of that sort.
 
 TANNER. Ann: will you have the common humanity to tell us what the
 matter is?
 
 ANN. [half whispering] I can't. Violet has done something dreadful. We
 shall have to get her away somewhere. [She flutters to the writing
 table and sits in Ramsden's chair, leaving the three men to fight it out
 between them].
 
 OCTAVIUS. [enlightened] Is that what you meant, Mr Ramsden?
 
 RAMSDEN. Yes. [Octavius sinks upon a chair, crushed]. I am afraid there
 is no doubt that Violet did not really go to Eastbourne three weeks ago
 when we thought she was with the Parry Whitefields. And she called on a
 strange doctor yesterday with a wedding ring on her finger. Mrs. Parry
 Whitefield met her there by chance; and so the whole thing came out.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [rising with his fists clenched] Who is the scoundrel?
 
 ANN. She won't tell us.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [collapsing upon his chair again] What a frightful thing!
 
 TANNER. [with angry sarcasm] Dreadful. Appalling. Worse than death, as
 Ramsden says. [He comes to Octavius]. What would you not give, Tavy, to
--**--**--
 Nothing. Simply nothing.
 
 RAMSDEN. Hmph! I'm not so sure of that. If any man has paid Violet any
 special attention, we can easily find that out. If there is any man of
 notoriously loose principles among us--
 
 TANNER. Ahem!
 
 RAMSDEN. [raising his voice] Yes sir, I repeat, if there is any man of
 notoriously loose principles among us--
 
 TANNER. Or any man notoriously lacking in self-control.
 
 RAMSDEN. [aghast] Do you dare to suggest that I am capable of such an
 act?
 
 TANNER. My dear Ramsden, this is an act of which every man is capable.
 That is what comes of getting at cross purposes with Nature. The
 suspicion you have just flung at me clings to us all. It's a sort of mud
 that sticks to the judge's ermine or the cardinal's robe as fast as to
 the rags of the tramp. Come, Tavy: don't look so bewildered: it might
 have been me: it might have been Ramsden; just as it might have been
 anybody. If it had, what could we do but lie and protest as Ramsden is
 going to protest.
 
 RAMSDEN. [choking] I--I--I--
 
 TANNER. Guilt itself could not stammer more confusedly, And yet you know
 perfectly well he's innocent, Tavy.
 
 RAMSDEN. [exhausted] I am glad you admit that, sir. I admit, myself,
 that there is an element of truth in what you say, grossly as you
 may distort it to gratify your malicious humor. I hope, Octavius, no
 suspicion of me is possible in your mind.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Of you! No, not for a moment.
 
 TANNER. [drily] I think he suspects me just a little.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Jack: you couldn't--you wouldn't--
 
 TANNER. Why not?
 
 OCTAVIUS. [appalled] Why not!
 
 TANNER. Oh, well, I'll tell you why not. First, you would feel bound
 to quarrel with me. Second, Violet doesn't like me. Third, if I had
--**--**--
 RAMSDEN. Not in your spirit sir. Not for your reasons.
 
 TANNER. You can explain that if anybody calls you to account, here or
 hereafter. [He turns away, and plants himself in front of Mr Herbert
 Spencer, at whom he stares gloomily].
 
 ANN. [rising and coming to Ramsden] Granny: hadn't you better go up to
 the drawingroom and tell them what we intend to do?
 
 RAMSDEN. [looking pointedly at Tanner] I hardly like to leave you alone
 with this gentleman. Will you not come with me?
 
 ANN. Miss Ramsden would not like to speak about it before me, Granny. I
 ought not to be present.
 
 RAMSDEN. You are right: I should have thought of that. You are a good
 girl, Annie.
 
 He pats her on the shoulder. She looks up at him with beaming eyes and
 he goes out, much moved. Having disposed of him, she looks at Tanner.
 His back being turned to her, she gives a moment's attention to her
 personal appearance, then softly goes to him and speaks almost into his
 ear.
 
 ANN. Jack [he turns with a start]: are you glad that you are my
 guardian? You don't mind being made responsible for me, I hope.
 
 TANNER. The latest addition to your collection of scapegoats, eh?
 
 ANN. Oh, that stupid old joke of yours about me! Do please drop it. Why
 do you say things that you know must pain me? I do my best to please
 you, Jack: I suppose I may tell you so now that you are my guardian. You
 will make me so unhappy if you refuse to be friends with me.
 
 TANNER. [studying her as gloomily as he studied the dust] You need not
 go begging for my regard. How unreal our moral judgments are! You seem
 to me to have absolutely no conscience--only hypocrisy; and you can't
--**--**--
 
 ANN. Tempted! Jack!
 
 TANNER. Yes, my dear Lady Mephistopheles, tempted. You were insatiably
 curious as to what a boy might be capable of, and diabolically clever at
 getting through his guard and surprising his inmost secrets.
 
 ANN. What nonsense! All because you used to tell me long stories of the
 wicked things you had done--silly boys tricks! And you call such things
 inmost secrets: Boys' secrets are just like men's; and you know what
 they are!
 
 TANNER. [obstinately] No I don't. What are they, pray?
 
 ANN. Why, the things they tell everybody, of course.
 
 TANNER. Now I swear I told you things I told no one else. You lured me
 into a compact by which we were to have no secrets from one another. We
 were to tell one another everything, I didn't notice that you never told
 me anything.
 
 ANN. You didn't want to talk about me, Jack. You wanted to talk about
 yourself.
 
 TANNER. Ah, true, horribly true. But what a devil of a child you must
 have been to know that weakness and to play on it for the satisfaction
 of your own curiosity! I wanted to brag to you, to make myself
 interesting. And I found myself doing all sorts of mischievous things
 simply to have something to tell you about. I fought with boys I didn't
 hate; I lied about things I might just as well have told the truth
 about; I stole things I didn't want; I kissed little girls I didn't care
 for. It was all bravado: passionless and therefore unreal.
 
 ANN. I never told of you, Jack.
 
 TANNER. No; but if you had wanted to stop me you would have told of me.
 You wanted me to go on.
 
 ANN. [flashing out] Oh, that's not true: it's NOT true, Jack. I never
--**--**--
 
 ANN. Oh, do be sensible, Jack. You know you're talking nonsense.
 
 TANNER. The most solemn earnest, Ann. You didn't notice at that time
 that you were getting a soul too. But you were. It was not for nothing
 that you suddenly found you had a moral duty to chastise and reform
 Rachel. Up to that time you had traded pretty extensively in being a
 good child; but you had never set up a sense of duty to others. Well, I
 set one up too. Up to that time I had played the boy buccaneer with no
 more conscience than a fox in a poultry farm. But now I began to have
 scruples, to feel obligations, to find that veracity and honor were no
 longer goody-goody expressions in the mouths of grown up people, but
 compelling principles in myself.
 
 ANN. [quietly] Yes, I suppose you're right. You were beginning to be a
 man, and I to be a woman.
 
 TANNER. Are you sure it was not that we were beginning to be something
 more? What does the beginning of manhood and womanhood mean in most
 people's mouths? You know: it means the beginning of love. But love
 began long before that for me. Love played its part in the earliest
 dreams and follies and romances I can remember--may I say the earliest
 follies and romances we can remember?--though we did not understand it
 at the time. No: the change that came to me was the birth in me of moral
 passion; and I declare that according to my experience moral passion is
 the only real passion.
 
 ANN. All passions ought to be moral, Jack.
 
 TANNER. Ought! Do you think that anything is strong enough to impose
 oughts on a passion except a stronger passion still?
 
 ANN. Our moral sense controls passion, Jack. Don't be stupid.
--**--**--
 to this day. Yes, Ann: the old childish compact between us was an
 unconscious love compact.
 
 ANN. Jack!
 
 TANNER. Oh, don't be alarmed--
 
 ANN. I am not alarmed.
 
 TANNER. [whimsically] Then you ought to be: where are your principles?
 
 ANN. Jack: are you serious or are you not?
 
 TANNER. Do you mean about the moral passion?
 
 ANN. No, no; the other one. [Confused] Oh! you are so silly; one never
 knows how to take you.
 
 TANNER. You must take me quite seriously. I am your guardian; and it is
 my duty to improve your mind.
 
 ANN. The love compact is over, then, is it? I suppose you grew tired of
 me?
 
 TANNER. No; but the moral passion made our childish relations
 impossible. A jealous sense of my new individuality arose in me.
 
 ANN. You hated to be treated as a boy any longer. Poor Jack!
 
 TANNER. Yes, because to be treated as a boy was to be taken on the old
 footing. I had become a new person; and those who knew the old person
 laughed at me. The only man who behaved sensibly was my tailor: he took
 my measure anew every time he saw me, whilst all the rest went on with
 their old measurements and expected them to fit me.
 
 ANN. You became frightfully self-conscious.
 
 TANNER. When you go to heaven, Ann, you will be frightfully conscious of
 your wings for the first year or so. When you meet your relatives there,
 and they persist in treating you as if you were still a mortal, you will
 not be able to bear them. You will try to get into a circle which has
 never known you except as an angel.
 
 ANN. So it was only your vanity that made you run away from us after
 all?
--**--**--
 
 TANNER. I don't say it was a bad one. But bad or good, I didn't choose
 to be cut to your measure. And I won't be cut to it.
 
 ANN. Nobody wants you to, Jack. I assure you--really on my word--I
 don't mind your queer opinions one little bit. You know we have all been
 brought up to have advanced opinions. Why do you persist in thinking me
 so narrow minded?
 
 TANNER. That's the danger of it. I know you don't mind, because you've
 found out that it doesn't matter. The boa constrictor doesn't mind the
 opinions of a stag one little bit when once she has got her coils round
 it.
 
 ANN. [rising in sudden enlightenment] O-o-o-o-oh! NOW I understand why
 you warned Tavy that I am a boa constrictor. Granny told me. [She laughs
 and throws her boa around her neck]. Doesn't it feel nice and soft,
 Jack?
 
 TANNER. [in the toils] You scandalous woman, will you throw away even
 your hypocrisy?
 
 ANN. I am never hypocritical with you, Jack. Are you angry? [She
 withdraws the boa and throws it on a chair]. Perhaps I shouldn't have
 done that.
 
 TANNER. [contemptuously] Pooh, prudery! Why should you not, if it amuses
 you?
 
 ANN. [Shyly] Well, because--because I suppose what you really meant by
 the boa constrictor was THIS [she puts her arms round his neck].
 
 TANNER. [Staring at her] Magnificent audacity! [She laughs and pats his
 cheeks]. Now just to think that if I mentioned this episode not a soul
 would believe me except the people who would cut me for telling, whilst
 if you accused me of it nobody would believe my denial.
 
 ANN. [taking her arms away with perfect dignity] You are incorrigible,
 Jack. But you should not jest about our affection for one another.
 Nobody could possibly misunderstand it. YOU do not misunderstand it, I
--**--**--
 TANNER. [to Octavius] Well, let her consult him. He will be glad enough
 to have her sent abroad. Where is the difficulty?
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. [Taking the answer out of Octavius's mouth]. The
 difficulty, Mr Jack, is that when he offered to help her I didn't offer
 to become her accomplice in her wickedness. She either pledges her word
 never to see that man again, or else she finds some new friends; and the
 sooner the better.
 
 [The parlormaid appears at the door. Ann hastily resumes her seat, and
 looks as unconcerned as possible. Octavius instinctively imitates her].
 
 THE MAID. The cab is at the door, ma'am.
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. What cab?
 
 THE MAID. For Miss Robinson.
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. Oh! [Recovering herself] All right. [The maid withdraws].
 She has sent for a cab.
 
 TANNER. I wanted to send for that cab half an hour ago.
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. I am glad she understands the position she has placed
 herself in.
 
 RAMSDEN. I don't like her going away in this fashion, Susan. We had
 better not do anything harsh.
 
 OCTAVIUS. No: thank you again and again; but Miss Ramsden is quite
 right. Violet cannot expect to stay.
 
 ANN. Hadn't you better go with her, Tavy?
 
 OCTAVIUS. She won't have me.
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. Of course she won't. She's going straight to that man.
 
 TANNER. As a natural result of her virtuous reception here.
 
 RAMSDEN. [much troubled] There, Susan! You hear! and there's some truth
 in it. I wish you could reconcile it with your principles to be a little
 patient with this poor girl. She's very young; and there's a time for
 everything.
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. Oh, she will get all the sympathy she wants from the men.
 I'm surprised at you, Roebuck.
 
 TANNER. So am I, Ramsden, most favorably.
 
 Violet appears at the door. She is as impenitent and self-assured a
--**--**--
 Sensation. Ann and Miss Ramsden rise and turn toward the two. Violet,
 more surprised than any of the others, forgets her glove, and comes
 forward into the middle of the room, both puzzled and displeased.
 Octavius alone does not move or raise his head; he is overwhelmed with
 shame.
 
 ANN. [pleading to Tanner to be sensible] Jack!
 
 MISS RAMSDEN. [outraged] Well, I must say!
 
 VIOLET. [sharply to Tanner] Who told you?
 
 TANNER. Why, Ramsden and Tavy of course. Why should they not?
 
 VIOLET. But they don't know.
 
 TANNER. Don't know what?
 
 VIOLET. They don't know that I am in the right, I mean.
 
 TANNER. Oh, they know it in their hearts, though they think themselves
 bound to blame you by their silly superstitions about morality and
 propriety and so forth. But I know, and the whole world really knows,
 though it dare not say so, that you were right to follow your instinct;
 that vitality and bravery are the greatest qualities a woman can have,
 and motherhood her solemn initiation into womanhood; and that the fact
 of your not being legally married matters not one scrap either to your
 own worth or to our real regard for you.
 
 VIOLET. [flushing with indignation] Oh! You think me a wicked woman,
 like the rest. You think I have not only been vile, but that I share
 your abominable opinions. Miss Ramsden: I have borne your hard words
 because I knew you would be sorry for them when you found out the truth.
 But I won't bear such a horrible insult as to be complimented by Jack on
 being one of the wretches of whom he approves. I have kept my marriage
 a secret for my husband's sake. But now I claim my right as a married
 woman not to be insulted.
--**--**--
 Ramsden. The cup of our ignominy is full.
 
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
 On the carriage drive in the park of a country house near Richmond a
 motor car has broken down. It stands in front of a clump of trees round
 which the drive sweeps to the house, which is partly visible through
 them: indeed Tanner, standing in the drive with the car on his right
 hand, could get an unobstructed view of the west corner of the house on
 his left were he not far too much interested in a pair of supine legs
 in blue serge trousers which protrude from beneath the machine. He is
 watching them intently with bent back and hands supported on his knees.
 His leathern overcoat and peaked cap proclaim him one of the dismounted
 passengers.
 
 THE LEGS. Aha! I got him.
 
 TANNER. All right now?
 
 THE LEGS. All right now.
 
 Tanner stoops and takes the legs by the ankles, drawing their owner
 forth like a wheelbarrow, walking on his hands, with a hammer in his
 mouth. He is a young man in a neat suit of blue serge, clean shaven,
 dark eyed, square fingered, with short well brushed black hair and
 rather irregular sceptically turned eyebrows. When he is manipulating
 the car his movements are swift and sudden, yet attentive and
 deliberate. With Tanner and Tanner's friends his manner is not in the
 least deferential, but cool and reticent, keeping them quite effectually
 at a distance whilst giving them no excuse for complaining of him.
 Nevertheless he has a vigilant eye on them always, and that, too, rather
 cynically, like a man who knows the world well from its seamy side. He
 speaks slowly and with a touch of sarcasm; and as he does not at all
 affect the gentleman in his speech, it may be inferred that his smart
--**--**--
 TANNER. Sarcasm, Tavy, sarcasm! Oh, if you could only see into Enry's
 soul, the depth of his contempt for a gentleman, the arrogance of his
 pride in being an engineer, would appal you. He positively likes the car
 to break down because it brings out my gentlemanly helplessness and his
 workmanlike skill and resource.
 
 STRAKER. Never you mind him, Mr Robinson. He likes to talk. We know him,
 don't we?
 
 OCTAVIUS. [earnestly] But there's a great truth at the bottom of what he
 says. I believe most intensely in the dignity of labor.
 
 STRAKER. [unimpressed] That's because you never done any Mr Robinson.
 My business is to do away with labor. You'll get more out of me and a
 machine than you will out of twenty laborers, and not so much to drink
 either.
 
 TANNER. For Heaven's sake, Tavy, don't start him on political economy.
 He knows all about it; and we don't. You're only a poetic Socialist,
 Tavy: he's a scientific one.
 
 STRAKER. [unperturbed] Yes. Well, this conversation is very improvin;
 but I've got to look after the car; and you two want to talk about your
 ladies. I know. [He retires to busy himself about the car; and presently
 saunters off towards the house].
 
 TANNER. That's a very momentous social phenomenon.
 
 OCTAVIUS. What is?
 
 TANNER. Straker is. Here have we literary and cultured persons been
 for years setting up a cry of the New Woman whenever some unusually old
 fashioned female came along; and never noticing the advent of the New
 Man. Straker's the New Man.
 
 OCTAVIUS. I see nothing new about him, except your way of chaffing
 him. But I don't want to talk about him just now. I want to speak to you
 about Ann.
 
 TANNER. Straker knew even that. He learnt it at the Polytechnic,
--**--**--
 Petrarch didn't see half as much of Laura, nor Dante of Beatrice, as you
 see of Ann now; and yet they wrote first-rate poetry--at least so
 I'm told. They never exposed their idolatry to the test of domestic
 familiarity; and it lasted them to their graves. Marry Ann and at
 the end of a week you'll find no more inspiration than in a plate of
 muffins.
 
 OCTAVIUS. You think I shall tire of her.
 
 TANNER. Not at all: you don't get tired of muffins. But you don't find
 inspiration in them; and you won't in her when she ceases to be a poet's
 dream and becomes a solid eleven stone wife. You'll be forced to dream
 about somebody else; and then there will be a row.
 
 OCTAVIUS. This sort of talk is no use, Jack. You don't understand. You
 have never been in love.
 
 TANNER. I! I have never been out of it. Why, I am in love even with Ann.
 But I am neither the slave of love nor its dupe. Go to the bee, thou
 poet: consider her ways and be wise. By Heaven, Tavy, if women could do
 without our work, and we ate their children's bread instead of making
 it, they would kill us as the spider kills her mate or as the bees kill
 the drone. And they would be right if we were good for nothing but love.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Ah, if we were only good enough for Love! There is nothing
 like Love: there is nothing else but Love: without it the world would be
 a dream of sordid horror.
 
 TANNER. And this--this is the man who asks me to give him the hand of my
 ward! Tavy: I believe we were changed in our cradles, and that you are
 the real descendant of Don Juan.
--**--**--
 go out with you to-day in the car. It is a cruel disappointment to her,
 poor child!
 
 TANNER. What do you say now, Tavy.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Surely you cannot misunderstand, Jack. Ann is showing you the
 kindest consideration, even at the cost of deceiving you.
 
 ANN. What do you mean?
 
 TANNER. Would you like to cure Rhoda's headache, Ann?
 
 ANN. Of course.
 
 TANNER. Then tell her what you said just now; and add that you arrived
 about two minutes after I had received her letter and read it.
 
 ANN. Rhoda has written to you!
 
 TANNER. With full particulars.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Never mind him, Ann. You were right, quite right. Ann was only
 doing her duty, Jack; and you know it. Doing it in the kindest way, too.
 
 ANN. [going to Octavius] How kind you are, Tavy! How helpful! How well
 you understand!
 
 Octavius beams.
 
 TANNER. Ay: tighten the coils. You love her, Tavy, don't you?
 
 OCTAVIUS. She knows I do.
 
 ANN. Hush. For shame, Tavy!
 
 TANNER. Oh, I give you leave. I am your guardian; and I commit you to
 Tavy's care for the next hour.
 
 ANN. No, Jack. I must speak to you about Rhoda. Ricky: will you go back
 to the house and entertain your American friend? He's rather on Mamma's
 hands so early in the morning. She wants to finish her housekeeping.
 
 OCTAVIUS. I fly, dearest Ann [he kisses her hand].
 
 ANN. [tenderly] Ricky Ticky Tavy!
 
 He looks at her with an eloquent blush, and runs off.
 
 TANNER. [bluntly] Now look here, Ann. This time you've landed yourself;
 and if Tavy were not in love with you past all salvation he'd have found
 out what an incorrigible liar you are.
 
 ANN. You misunderstand, Jack. I didn't dare tell Tavy the truth.
 
 TANNER. No: your daring is generally in the opposite direction. What the
--**--**--
 woman who pleads her mother's authority is unfit to bear citizens to a
 free people.
 
 ANN. [watching him with quiet curiosity] I suppose you will go in
 seriously for politics some day, Jack.
 
 TANNER. [heavily let down] Eh? What? Wh--? [Collecting his scattered
 wits] What has that got to do with what I have been saying?
 
 ANN. You talk so well.
 
 TANNER. Talk! Talk! It means nothing to you but talk. Well, go back
 to your mother, and help her to poison Rhoda's imagination as she has
 poisoned yours. It is the tame elephants who enjoy capturing the wild
 ones.
 
 ANN. I am getting on. Yesterday I was a boa constrictor: to-day I am an
 elephant.
 
 TANNER. Yes. So pack your trunk and begone; I have no more to say to
 you.
 
 ANN. You are so utterly unreasonable and impracticable. What can I do?
 
 TANNER. Do! Break your chains. Go your way according to your own
 conscience and not according to your mother's. Get your mind clean
 and vigorous; and learn to enjoy a fast ride in a motor car instead of
 seeing nothing in it but an excuse for a detestable intrigue. Come with
 me to Marseilles and across to Algiers and to Biskra, at sixty miles
 an hour. Come right down to the Cape if you like. That will be a
 Declaration of Independence with a vengeance. You can write a book about
 it afterwards. That will finish your mother and make a woman of you.
 
 ANN. [thoughtfully] I don't think there would be any harm in that, Jack.
 You are my guardian: you stand in my father's place, by his own wish.
 Nobody could say a word against our travelling together. It would be
 delightful: thank you a thousand times, Jack. I'll come.
 
 TANNER. [aghast] You'll come!!!
--**--**--
 first rate manner before venturing across the Atlantic. To this culture
 he finds English people either totally indifferent as they very commonly
 are to all culture, or else politely evasive, the truth being that
 Hector's culture is nothing but a state of saturation with our literary
 exports of thirty years ago, reimported by him to be unpacked at a
 moment's notice and hurled at the head of English literature, science
 and art, at every conversational opportunity. The dismay set up by
 these sallies encourages him in his belief that he is helping to educate
 England. When he finds people chattering harmlessly about Anatole France
 and Nietzsche, he devastates them with Matthew Arnold, the Autocrat of
 the Breakfast Table, and even Macaulay; and as he is devoutly religious
 at bottom, he first leads the unwary, by humorous irreverences, to wave
 popular theology out of account in discussing moral questions with him,
 and then scatters them in confusion by demanding whether the carrying
 out of his ideals of conduct was not the manifest object of God Almighty
 in creating honest men and pure women. The engaging freshness of his
 personality and the dumbfoundering staleness of his culture make it
 extremely difficult to decide whether he is worth knowing; for
 whilst his company is undeniably pleasant and enlivening, there is
 intellectually nothing new to be got out of him, especially as he
 despises politics, and is careful not to talk commercial shop, in which
 department he is probably much in advance of his English capitalist
 friends. He gets on best with romantic Christians of the amoristic sect:
 hence the friendship which has sprung up between him and Octavius.
 
 In appearance Hector is a neatly built young man of twenty-four, with
 a short, smartly trimmed black beard, clear, well shaped eyes, and an
--**--**--
 
 TANNER. Abyss beneath abyss of perfidy!
 
 ANN. [hastily, to distract attention from this outburst] Oh, I forgot:
 you have not met Mr Malone. Mr Tanner, my guardian: Mr Hector Malone.
 
 HECTOR. Pleased to meet you, Mr Tanner. I should like to suggest an
 extension of the travelling party to Nice, if I may.
 
 ANN. Oh, we're all coming. That's understood, isn't it?
 
 HECTOR. I also am the modest possessor of a motor car. If Miss Robinson
 will allow me the privilege of taking her, my car is at her service.
 
 OCTAVIUS. Violet!
 
 General constraint.
 
 ANN. [subduedly] Come, mother: we must leave them to talk over the
 arrangements. I must see to my travelling kit.
 
 Mrs Whitefield looks bewildered; but Ann draws her discreetly away; and
 they disappear round the corner towards the house.
 
 HECTOR. I think I may go so far as to say that I can depend on Miss
 Robinson's consent.
 
 Continued embarrassment.
 
 OCTAVIUS. I'm afraid we must leave Violet behind, There are
 circumstances which make it impossible for her to come on such an
 expedition.
 
 HECTOR. [amused and not at all convinced] Too American, eh? Must the
 young lady have a chaperone?
 
 OCTAVIUS. It's not that, Malone--at least not altogether.
 
 HECTOR. Indeed! May I ask what other objection applies?
 
 TANNER. [impatiently] Oh, tell him, tell him. We shall never be able to
 keep the secret unless everybody knows what it is. Mr Malone: if you go
 to Nice with Violet, you go with another man's wife. She is married.
 
 HECTOR. [thunderstruck] You don't tell me so!
 
 TANNER. We do. In confidence.
 
 RAMSDEN. [with an air of importance, lest Malone should suspect a
 misalliance] Her marriage has not yet been made known: she desires that
 it shall not be mentioned for the present.
 
 HECTOR. I shall respect the lady's wishes. Would it be indiscreet to ask
--**--**--
 in England merely because she has no handle to her name. Of course it's
 just absurd. But I tell you, Violet, I don't like deceiving him. I feel
 as if I was stealing his money. Why won't you let me own up?
 
 VIOLET. We can't afford it. You can be as romantic as you please about
 love, Hector; but you mustn't be romantic about money.
 
 HECTOR. [divided between his uxoriousness and his habitual elevation
 of moral sentiment] That's very English. [Appealing to her impulsively]
 Violet: Dad's bound to find us out some day.
 
 VIOLET. Oh yes, later on of course. But don't let's go over this every
 time we meet, dear. You promised--
 
 HECTOR. All right, all right, I--
 
 VIOLET. [not to be silenced] It is I and not you who suffer by this
 concealment; and as to facing a struggle and poverty and all that sort
 of thing I simply will not do it. It's too silly.
 
 HECTOR. You shall not. I'll sort of borrow the money from my dad until I
 get on my own feet; and then I can own up and pay up at the same time.
 
 VIOLET. [alarmed and indignant] Do you mean to work? Do you want to
 spoil our marriage?
 
 HECTOR. Well, I don't mean to let marriage spoil my character. Your
 friend Mr Tanner has got the laugh on me a bit already about that; and--
 
 VIOLET. The beast! I hate Jack Tanner.
 
 HECTOR. [magnanimously] Oh, he's all right: he only needs the love of
 a good woman to ennoble him. Besides, he's proposed a motoring trip to
 Nice; and I'm going to take you.
 
 VIOLET. How jolly!
 
 HECTOR. Yes; but how are we going to manage? You see, they've warned
 me off going with you, so to speak. They've told me in confidence that
--**--**--
 to be said could be sung.
 
 STRAKER. It wasn't Voltaire: it was Bow Mar Shay.
 
 TANNER. I stand corrected: Beaumarchais of course. Now you seem to think
 that what is too delicate to be said can be whistled. Unfortunately your
 whistling, though melodious, is unintelligible. Come! there's nobody
 listening: neither my genteel relatives nor the secretary of your
 confounded Union. As man to man, Enry, why do you think that my friend
 has no chance with Miss Whitefield?
 
 STRAKER. Cause she's arter summun else.
 
 TANNER. Bosh! who else?
 
 STRAKER. You.
 
 TANNER. Me!!!
 
 STRAKER. Mean to tell me you didn't know? Oh, come, Mr Tanner!
 
 TANNER. [in fierce earnest] Are you playing the fool, or do you mean it?
 
 STRAKER. [with a flash of temper] I'm not playin no fool. [More coolly]
 Why, it's as plain as the nose on your face. If you ain't spotted that,
 you don't know much about these sort of things. [Serene again] Ex-cuse
 me, you know, Mr Tanner; but you asked me as man to man; and I told you
 as man to man.
 
 TANNER. [wildly appealing to the heavens] Then I--I am the bee, the
 spider, the marked down victim, the destined prey.
 
 STRAKER. I dunno about the bee and the spider. But the marked down
 victim, that's what you are and no mistake; and a jolly good job for
 you, too, I should say.
 
 TANNER. [momentously] Henry Straker: the moment of your life has
 arrived.
 
 STRAKER. What d'y'mean?
 
 TANNER. That record to Biskra.
 
 STRAKER. [eagerly] Yes?
 
 TANNER. Break it.
 
 STRAKER. [rising to the height of his destiny] D'y'mean it?
 
 TANNER. I do.
 
 STRAKER. When?
 
 TANNER. Now. Is that machine ready to start?
 
 STRAKER. [quailing] But you can't--
 
 TANNER. [cutting him short by getting into the car] Off we go. First to
 the bank for money; then to my rooms for my kit; then to your rooms for
--**--**--
 the road, is a man who is either a Spaniard or a Scotchman. Probably a
 Spaniard, since he wears the dress of a Spanish goatherd and seems at
 home in the Sierra Nevada, but very like a Scotchman for all that. In
 the hollow, on the slope leading to the quarry-cave, are about a dozen
 men who, as they recline at their cave round a heap of smouldering white
 ashes of dead leaf and brushwood, have an air of being conscious of
 themselves as picturesque scoundrels honoring the Sierra by using it as
 an effective pictorial background. As a matter of artistic fact they are
 not picturesque; and the mountains tolerate them as lions tolerate lice.
 An English policeman or Poor Law Guardian would recognize them as a
 selected band of tramps and ablebodied paupers.
 
 This description of them is not wholly contemptuous. Whoever has
 intelligently observed the tramp, or visited the ablebodied ward of a
 workhouse, will admit that our social failures are not all drunkards and
 weaklings. Some of them are men who do not fit the class they were born
 into. Precisely the same qualities that make the educated gentleman an
 artist may make an uneducated manual laborer an ablebodied pauper. There
 are men who fall helplessly into the workhouse because they are good
 far nothing; but there are also men who are there because they are
 strongminded enough to disregard the social convention (obviously not a
 disinterested one on the part of the ratepayer) which bids a man live
 by heavy and badly paid drudgery when he has the alternative of walking
 into the workhouse, announcing himself as a destitute person, and
 legally compelling the Guardians to feed, clothe and house him better
 than he could feed, clothe and house himself without great exertion.
 When a man who is born a poet refuses a stool in a stockbroker's office,
--**--**--
 left shoulder, rises to address them. The applause which greets him
 shows that he is a favorite orator.
 
 THE CHIEF. Friends and fellow brigands. I have a proposal to make
 to this meeting. We have now spent three evenings in discussing the
 question Have Anarchists or Social-Democrats the most personal courage?
 We have gone into the principles of Anarchism and Social-Democracy at
 great length. The cause of Anarchy has been ably represented by our one
 Anarchist, who doesn't know what Anarchism means [laughter]--
 
 THE ANARCHIST. [rising] A point of order, Mendoza--
 
 MENDOZA. [forcibly] No, by thunder: your last point of order took half
 an hour. Besides, Anarchists don't believe in order.
 
 THE ANARCHIST. [mild, polite but persistent: he is, in fact, the
 respectable looking elderly man in the celluloid collar and cuffs] That
 is a vulgar error. I can prove--
 
 MENDOZA. Order, order.
 
 THE OTHERS [shouting] Order, order. Sit down. Chair! Shut up.
 
 The Anarchist is suppressed.
 
 MENDOZA. On the other hand we have three Social-Democrats among us. They
 are not on speaking terms; and they have put before us three distinct
 and incompatible views of Social-Democracy.
 
 THE MAJORITY. [shouting assent] Hear, hear! So we are. Right.
 
 THE ROWDY SOCIAL-DEMOCRAT. [smarting under oppression] You ain't no
 Christian. You're a Sheeny, you are.
 
 MENDOZA. [with crushing magnanimity] My friend; I am an exception to
 all rules. It is true that I have the honor to be a Jew; and, when the
 Zionists need a leader to reassemble our race on its historic soil
 of Palestine, Mendoza will not be the last to volunteer [sympathetic
 applause--hear, hear, etc.]. But I am not a slave to any superstition.
 I have swallowed all the formulas, even that of Socialism; though, in a
 sense, once a Socialist, always a Socialist.
 
 THE SOCIAL-DEMOCRATS. Hear, hear!
--**--**--
 
 MENDOZA. [on the hill, using his glass] Two only, a capitalist and his
 chauffeur. They look English.
 
 DUVAL. Angliche! Aoh yess. Cochons! [Handling the rifle] Faut tire,
 n'est-ce-pas?
 
 MENDOZA. No: the nails have gone home. Their tire is down: they stop.
 
 DUVAL. [shouting to the others] Fondez sur eux, nom de Dieu!
 
 MENDOZA. [rebuking his excitement] Du calme, Duval: keep your hair on.
 They take it quietly. Let us descend and receive them.
 
 Mendoza descends, passing behind the fire and coming forward, whilst
 Tanner and Straker, in their motoring goggles, leather coats, and caps,
 are led in from the road by brigands.
 
 TANNER. Is this the gentleman you describe as your boss? Does he speak
 English?
 
 THE ROWDY SOCIAL-DEMOCRAT. Course he does. Y'don't suppowz we
 Hinglishmen lets ahrselves be bossed by a bloomin Spenniard, do you?
 
 MENDOZA. [with dignity] Allow me to introduce myself: Mendoza, President
 of the League of the Sierra! [Posing loftily] I am a brigand: I live by
 robbing the rich.
 
 TANNER. [promptly] I am a gentleman: I live by robbing the poor. Shake
 hands.
 
 THE ENGLISH SOCIAL-DEMOCRATS. Hear, hear!
 
 General laughter and good humor. Tanner and Mendoza shake hands. The
 Brigands drop into their former places.
 
 STRAKER. Ere! where do I come in?
 
 TANNER. [introducing] My friend and chauffeur.
 
 THE SULKY SOCIAL-DEMOCRAT. [suspiciously] Well, which is he? friend or
 show-foor? It makes all the difference you know.
 
 MENDOZA. [explaining] We should expect ransom for a friend. A
 professional chauffeur is free of the mountains. He even takes a
 trifling percentage of his princpal's ransom if he will honor us by
 accepting it.
 
 STRAKER. I see. Just to encourage me to come this way again. Well, I'll
 think about it.
 
 DUVAL. [impulsively rushing across to Straker] Mon frere! [He embraces
 him rapturously and kisses him on both cheeks].
--**--**--
 
 TANNER. Are you all Socialists here, may I ask?
 
 MENDOZA. [repudiating this humiliating misconception] Oh no, no, no:
 nothing of the kind, I assure you. We naturally have modern views as to
 the justice of the existing distribution of wealth: otherwise we should
 lose our self-respect. But nothing that you could take exception to,
 except two or three faddists.
 
 TANNER. I had no intention of suggesting anything discreditable. In
 fact, I am a bit of a Socialist myself.
 
 STRAKER. [drily] Most rich men are, I notice.
 
 MENDOZA. Quite so. It has reached us, I admit. It is in the air of the
 century.
 
 STRAKER. Socialism must be looking up a bit if your chaps are taking to
 it.
 
 MENDOZA. That is true, sir. A movement which is confined to philosophers
 and honest men can never exercise any real political influence: there
 are too few of them. Until a movement shows itself capable of spreading
 among brigands, it can never hope for a political majority.
 
 TANNER. But are your brigands any less honest than ordinary citizens?
 
 MENDOZA. Sir: I will be frank with you. Brigandage is abnormal. Abnormal
 professions attract two classes: those who are not good enough for
 ordinary bourgeois life and those who are too good for it. We are dregs
 and scum, sir: the dregs very filthy, the scum very superior.
 
 STRAKER. Take care! some o the dregs'll hear you.
 
 MENDOZA. It does not matter: each brigand thinks himself scum, and likes
 to hear the others called dregs.
 
 TANNER. Come! you are a wit. [Mendoza inclines his head, flattered]. May
 one ask you a blunt question?
 
 MENDOZA. As blunt as you please.
 
 TANNER. How does it pay a man of your talent to shepherd such a flock as
 this on broiled rabbit and prickly pears? I have seen men less gifted,
--**--**--
 say that I would have sold the lot, faces, dowries, clothes, titles, and
 all, for a smile from this woman. Yet she was a woman of the people,
 a worker: otherwise--let me reciprocate your bluntness--I should have
 scorned her.
 
 TANNER. Very properly. And did she respond to your love?
 
 MENDOZA. Should I be here if she did? She objected to marry a Jew.
 
 TANNER. On religious grounds?
 
 MENDOZA. No: she was a freethinker. She said that every Jew considers in
 his heart that English people are dirty in their habits.
 
 TANNER. [surprised] Dirty!
 
 MENDOZA. It showed her extraordinary knowledge of the world; for it
 is undoubtedly true. Our elaborate sanitary code makes us unduly
 contemptuous of the Gentile.
 
 TANNER. Did you ever hear that, Henry?
 
 STRAKER. I've heard my sister say so. She was cook in a Jewish family
 once.
 
 MENDOZA. I could not deny it; neither could I eradicate the impression
 it made on her mind. I could have got round any other objection; but
 no woman can stand a suspicion of indelicacy as to her person. My
 entreaties were in vain: she always retorted that she wasn't good enough
 for me, and recommended me to marry an accursed barmaid named Rebecca
 Lazarus, whom I loathed. I talked of suicide: she offered me a packet
 of beetle poison to do it with. I hinted at murder: she went into
 hysterics; and as I am a living man I went to America so that she might
 sleep without dreaming that I was stealing upstairs to cut her throat.
 In America I went out west and fell in with a man who was wanted by the
 police for holding up trains. It was he who had the idea of holding up
 motors cars--in the South of Europe: a welcome idea to a desperate and
--**--**--
 
 TANNER. [clapping him rudely on the shoulder] Put them in the fire,
 President.
 
 MENDOZA. [startled] Eh?
 
 TANNER. You are sacrificing your career to a monomania.
 
 MENDOZA. I know it.
 
 TANNER. No you don't. No man would commit such a crime against himself
 if he really knew what he was doing. How can you look round at these
 august hills, look up at this divine sky, taste this finely tempered
 air, and then talk like a literary hack on a second floor in Bloomsbury?
 
 MENDOZA. [shaking his head] The Sierra is no better than Bloomsbury when
 once the novelty has worn off. Besides, these mountains make you dream
 of women--of women with magnificent hair.
 
 TANNER. Of Louisa, in short. They will not make me dream of women, my
 friend: I am heartwhole.
 
 MENDOZA. Do not boast until morning, sir. This is a strange country for
 dreams.
 
 TANNER. Well, we shall see. Goodnight. [He lies down and composes
 himself to sleep].
 
 Mendoza, with a sigh, follows his example; and for a few moments
 there is peace in the Sierra. Then Mendoza sits up suddenly and says
 pleadingly to Tanner--
 
 MENDOZA. Just allow me to read a few lines before you go to sleep. I
 should really like your opinion of them.
 
 TANNER. [drowsily] Go on. I am listening.
 
 MENDOZA. I saw thee first in Whitsun week Louisa, Louisa--
 
 TANNER. [roaring himself] My dear President, Louisa is a very pretty
 name; but it really doesn't rhyme well to Whitsun week.
 
 MENDOZA. Of course not. Louisa is not the rhyme, but the refrain.
 
 TANNER. [subsiding] Ah, the refrain. I beg your pardon. Go on.
 
 MENDOZA. Perhaps you do not care for that one: I think you will like
 this better. [He recites, in rich soft tones, and to slow time]
 
      Louisa, I love thee.
--**--**--
 century and the Sierra?
 
 Another pallor in the void, this time not violet, but a disagreeable
 smoky yellow. With it, the whisper of a ghostly clarionet turning this
 tune into infinite sadness:
 
 (Here there is another musical staff.)
 
 The yellowish pallor moves: there is an old crone wandering in the void,
 bent and toothless; draped, as well as one can guess, in the coarse
 brown frock of some religious order. She wanders and wanders in her
 slow hopeless way, much as a wasp flies in its rapid busy way, until
 she blunders against the thing she seeks: companionship. With a sob of
 relief the poor old creature clutches at the presence of the man and
 addresses him in her dry unlovely voice, which can still express pride
 and resolution as well as suffering.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Excuse me; but I am so lonely; and this place is so
 awful.
 
 DON JUAN. A new comer?
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Yes: I suppose I died this morning. I confessed; I had
 extreme unction; I was in bed with my family about me and my eyes fixed
 on the cross. Then it grew dark; and when the light came back it was
 this light by which I walk seeing nothing. I have wandered for hours in
 horrible loneliness.
 
 DON JUAN. [sighing] Ah! you have not yet lost the sense of time. One
 soon does, in eternity.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Where are we?
 
 DON JUAN. In hell.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN [proudly] Hell! I in hell! How dare you?
 
 DON JUAN. [unimpressed] Why not, Senora?
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. You do not know to whom you are speaking. I am a lady,
 and a faithful daughter of the Church.
 
 DON JUAN. I do not doubt it.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. But how then can I be in hell? Purgatory, perhaps: I have
--**--**--
 
 DON JUAN. Oh, then there is no mistake: you are intentionally damned.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Why do you say that?
 
 DON JUAN. Because hell, Senora, is a place for the wicked. The wicked
 are quite comfortable in it: it was made for them. You tell me you feel
 no pain. I conclude you are one of those for whom Hell exists.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Do you feel no pain?
 
 DON JUAN. I am not one of the wicked, Senora; therefore it bores me,
 bores me beyond description, beyond belief.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Not one of the wicked! You said you were a murderer.
 
 DON JUAN. Only a duel. I ran my sword through an old man who was trying
 to run his through me.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. If you were a gentleman, that was not a murder.
 
 DON JUAN. The old man called it murder, because he was, he said,
 defending his daughter's honor. By this he meant that because I
 foolishly fell in love with her and told her so, she screamed; and he
 tried to assassinate me after calling me insulting names.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. You were like all men. Libertines and murderers all, all,
 all!
 
 DON JUAN. And yet we meet here, dear lady.
 
 THE OLD WOMAN. Listen to me. My father was slain by just such a wretch
 as you, in just such a duel, for just such a cause. I screamed: it was
 my duty. My father drew on my assailant: his honor demanded it. He fell:
 that was the reward of honor. I am here: in hell, you tell me that is
 the reward of duty. Is there justice in heaven?
 
 DON JUAN. No; but there is justice in hell: heaven is far above such
 idle human personalities. You will be welcome in hell, Senora. Hell
--**--**--
 DON JUAN. Provided my staying be not interpreted as pursuit.
 
 ANA. [releasing him] You may well wonder how I can endure your presence.
 My dear, dear father!
 
 DON JUAN. Would you like to see him?
 
 ANA. My father HERE!!!
 
 DON JUAN. No: he is in heaven.
 
 ANA. I knew it. My noble father! He is looking down on us now. What must
 he feel to see his daughter in this place, and in conversation with his
 murderer!
 
 DON JUAN. By the way, if we should meet him--
 
 ANA. How can we meet him? He is in heaven.
 
 DON JUAN. He condescends to look in upon us here from time to time.
 Heaven bores him. So let me warn you that if you meet him he will be
 mortally offended if you speak of me as his murderer! He maintains that
 he was a much better swordsman than I, and that if his foot had not
 slipped he would have killed me. No doubt he is right: I was not a good
 fencer. I never dispute the point; so we are excellent friends.
 
 ANA. It is no dishonor to a soldier to be proud of his skill in arms.
 
 DON JUAN. You would rather not meet him, probably.
 
 ANA. How dare you say that?
 
 DON JUAN. Oh, that is the usual feeling here. You may remember that on
 earth--though of course we never confessed it--the death of anyone
 we knew, even those we liked best, was always mingled with a certain
 satisfaction at being finally done with them.
 
 ANA. Monster! Never, never.
 
 DON JUAN. [placidly] I see you recognize the feeling. Yes: a funeral was
 always a festivity in black, especially the funeral of a relative. At
 all events, family ties are rarely kept up here. Your father is quite
--**--**--
 work, nothing to be gained by praying, nothing to be lost by doing what
 you like. Hell, in short, is a place where you have nothing to do but
 amuse yourself. [Don Juan sighs deeply]. You sigh, friend Juan; but if
 you dwelt in heaven, as I do, you would realize your advantages.
 
 DON JUAN. You are in good spirits to-day, Commander. You are positively
 brilliant. What is the matter?
 
 THE STATUE. I have come to a momentous decision, my boy. But first,
 where is our friend the Devil? I must consult him in the matter. And Ana
 would like to make his acquaintance, no doubt.
 
 ANA. You are preparing some torment for me.
 
 DON JUAN. All that is superstition, Ana. Reassure yourself. Remember:
 the devil is not so black as he is painted.
 
 THE STATUE. Let us give him a call.
 
 At the wave of the statue's hand the great chords roll out again but
 this time Mozart's music gets grotesquely adulterated with Gounod's.
 A scarlet halo begins to glow; and into it the Devil rises, very
 Mephistophelean, and not at all unlike Mendoza, though not so
 interesting. He looks older; is getting prematurely bald; and, in spite
 of an effusion of goodnature and friendliness, is peevish and sensitive
 when his advances are not reciprocated. He does not inspire much
 confidence in his powers of hard work or endurance, and is, on the
 whole, a disagreeably self-indulgent looking person; but he is clever
 and plausible, though perceptibly less well bred than the two other men,
 and enormously less vital than the woman.
 
 THE DEVIL. [heartily] Have I the pleasure of again receiving a visit
 from the illustrious Commander of Calatrava? [Coldly] Don Juan, your
 servant. [Politely] And a strange lady? My respects, Senora.
 
 ANA. Are you--
 
 THE DEVIL. [bowing] Lucifer, at your service.
--**--**--
 still here; but he moped and went to heaven. Curious how these clever
 men, whom you would have supposed born to be popular here, have turned
 out social failures, like Don Juan!
 
 DON JUAN. I am really very sorry to be a social failure.
 
 THE DEVIL. Not that we don't admire your intellect, you know. We do. But
 I look at the matter from your own point of view. You don't get on with
 us. The place doesn't suit you. The truth is, you have--I won't say no
 heart; for we know that beneath all your affected cynicism you have a
 warm one.
 
 DON JUAN. [shrinking] Don't, please don't.
 
 THE DEVIL. [nettled] Well, you've no capacity for enjoyment. Will that
 satisfy you?
 
 DON JUAN. It is a somewhat less insufferable form of cant than the
 other. But if you'll allow me, I'll take refuge, as usual, in solitude.
 
 THE DEVIL. Why not take refuge in Heaven? That's the proper place for
 you. [To Ana] Come, Senora! could you not persuade him for his own good
 to try a change of air?
 
 ANA. But can he go to Heaven if he wants to?
 
 THE DEVIL. What's to prevent him?
 
 ANA. Can anybody--can I go to Heaven if I want to?
 
 THE DEVIL. [rather contemptuously] Certainly, if your taste lies that
 way.
 
 ANA. But why doesn't everybody go to Heaven, then?
 
 THE STATUE. [chuckling] I can tell you that, my dear. It's because
 heaven is the most angelically dull place in all creation: that's why.
 
 THE DEVIL. His excellency the Commander puts it with military bluntness;
 but the strain of living in Heaven is intolerable. There is a notion
 that I was turned out of it; but as a matter of fact nothing could have
 induced me to stay there. I simply left it and organized this place.
--**--**--
 rooms where they play the classical compositions of his Excellency's
 friend Mozart. Those who go to the racecourses can stay away from them
 and go to the classical concerts instead if they like: there is no law
 against it; for Englishmen never will be slaves: they are free to do
 whatever the Government and public opinion allows them to do. And the
 classical concert is admitted to be a higher, more cultivated, poetic,
 intellectual, ennobling place than the racecourse. But do the lovers of
 racing desert their sport and flock to the concert room? Not they.
 They would suffer there all the weariness the Commander has suffered in
 heaven. There is the great gulf of the parable between the two places. A
 mere physical gulf they could bridge; or at least I could bridge it for
 them (the earth is full of Devil's Bridges); but the gulf of dislike
 is impassable and eternal. And that is the only gulf that separates my
 friends here from those who are invidiously called the blest.
 
 ANA. I shall go to heaven at once.
 
 THE STATUE. My child; one word of warning first. Let me complete my
 friend Lucifer's similitude of the classical concert. At every one of
 those concerts in England you will find rows of weary people who are
 there, not because they really like classical music, but because they
 think they ought to like it. Well, there is the same thing in heaven.
 A number of people sit there in glory, not because they are happy, but
 because they think they owe it to their position to be in heaven. They
 are almost all English.
 
 THE DEVIL. Yes: the Southerners give it up and join me just as you
 have done. But the English really do not seem to know when they are
--**--**--
 contemplation of such romantic mirages as beauty and pleasure; so would
 I enjoy the contemplation of that which interests me above all things
 namely, Life: the force that ever strives to attain greater power of
 contemplating itself. What made this brain of mine, do you think? Not
 the need to move my limbs; for a rat with half my brains moves as well
 as I. Not merely the need to do, but the need to know what I do, lest in
 my blind efforts to live I should be slaying myself.
 
 THE STATUE. You would have slain yourself in your blind efforts to fence
 but for my foot slipping, my friend.
 
 DON JUAN. Audacious ribald: your laughter will finish in hideous boredom
 before morning.
 
 THE STATUE. Ha ha! Do you remember how I frightened you when I said
 something like that to you from my pedestal in Seville? It sounds rather
 flat without my trombones.
 
 DON JUAN. They tell me it generally sounds flat with them, Commander.
 
 ANA. Oh, do not interrupt with these frivolities, father. Is there
 nothing in Heaven but contemplation, Juan?
 
 DON JUAN. In the Heaven I seek, no other joy. But there is the work of
 helping Life in its struggle upward. Think of how it wastes and scatters
 itself, how it raises up obstacles to itself and destroys itself in its
 ignorance and blindness. It needs a brain, this irresistible force, lest
 in its ignorance it should resist itself. What a piece of work is man!
 says the poet. Yes: but what a blunderer! Here is the highest miracle of
 organization yet attained by life, the most intensely alive thing that
 exists, the most conscious of all the organisms; and yet, how wretched
 are his brains! Stupidity made sordid and cruel by the realities learnt
--**--**--
 sevenpence on her children's schooling: the law had to force her to let
 them be taught gratuitously; but on death she spent all she had. Their
 imagination glows, their energies rise up at the idea of death, these
 people: they love it; and the more horrible it is the more they enjoy
 it. Hell is a place far above their comprehension: they derive their
 notion of it from two of the greatest fools that ever lived, an Italian
 and an Englishman. The Italian described it as a place of mud, frost,
 filth, fire, and venomous serpents: all torture. This ass, when he was
 not lying about me, was maundering about some woman whom he saw once in
 the street. The Englishman described me as being expelled from Heaven
 by cannons and gunpowder; and to this day every Briton believes that
 the whole of his silly story is in the Bible. What else he says I do not
 know; for it is all in a long poem which neither I nor anyone else ever
 succeeded in wading through. It is the same in everything. The highest
 form of literature is the tragedy, a play in which everybody is
 murdered at the end. In the old chronicles you read of earthquakes and
 pestilences, and are told that these showed the power and majesty of God
 and the littleness of Man. Nowadays the chronicles describe battles.
 In a battle two bodies of men shoot at one another with bullets and
 explosive shells until one body runs away, when the others chase the
 fugitives on horseback and cut them to pieces as they fly. And this, the
 chronicle concludes, shows the greatness and majesty of empires, and the
 littleness of the vanquished. Over such battles the people run about
 the streets yelling with delight, and egg their Governments on to spend
--**--**--
 only a means to the end of getting children and rearing them.
 
 ANA. Is that your idea of a woman's mind? I call it cynical and
 disgusting materialism.
 
 DON JUAN. Pardon me, Ana: I said nothing about a woman's whole mind. I
 spoke of her view of Man as a separate sex. It is no more cynical than
 her view of herself as above all things a Mother. Sexually, Woman is
 Nature's contrivance for perpetuating its highest achievement. Sexually,
 Man is Woman's contrivance for fulfilling Nature's behest in the most
 economical way. She knows by instinct that far back in the evolutional
 process she invented him, differentiated him, created him in order to
 produce something better than the single-sexed process can produce.
 Whilst he fulfils the purpose for which she made him, he is welcome to
 his dreams, his follies, his ideals, his heroisms, provided that the
 keystone of them all is the worship of woman, of motherhood, of the
 family, of the hearth. But how rash and dangerous it was to invent a
 separate creature whose sole function was her own impregnation! For mark
 what has happened. First, Man has multiplied on her hands until there
 are as many men as women; so that she has been unable to employ for her
 purposes more than a fraction of the immense energy she has left at
 his disposal by saving him the exhausting labor of gestation. This
 superfluous energy has gone to his brain and to his muscle. He has
 become too strong to be controlled by her bodily, and too imaginative
 and mentally vigorous to be content with mere self-reproduction. He has
 created civilization without consulting her, taking her domestic labor
 for granted as the foundation of it.
 
 ANA. THAT is true, at all events.
 
 THE DEVIL. Yes; and this civilization! what is it, after all?
--**--**--
 as our friend Aristophanes long ago pointed out, are so extraordinarily
 superior, with their power of flight and their lovely plumage, and,
 may I add, the touching poetry of their loves and nestings, that it is
 inconceivable that Life, having once produced them, should, if love
 and beauty were her object, start off on another line and labor at the
 clumsy elephant and the hideous ape, whose grandchildren we are?
 
 ANA. Aristophanes was a heathen; and you, Juan, I am afraid, are very
 little better.
 
 THE DEVIL. You conclude, then, that Life was driving at clumsiness and
 ugliness?
 
 DON JUAN. No, perverse devil that you are, a thousand times no. Life
 was driving at brains--at its darling object: an organ by which it can
 attain not only self-consciousness but self-understanding.
 
 THE STATUE. This is metaphysics, Juan. Why the devil should--[to the
 Devil] I BEG your pardon.
 
 THE DEVIL. Pray don't mention it. I have always regarded the use of my
 name to secure additional emphasis as a high compliment to me. It is
 quite at your service, Commander.
 
 THE STATUE. Thank you: that's very good of you. Even in heaven, I never
 quite got out of my old military habits of speech. What I was going to
 ask Juan was why Life should bother itself about getting a brain. Why
 should it want to understand itself? Why not be content to enjoy itself?
 
 DON JUAN. Without a brain, Commander, you would enjoy yourself without
 knowing it, and so lose all the fun.
 
 THE STATUE. True, most true. But I am quite content with brain enough to
 know that I'm enjoying myself. I don't want to understand why. In
 fact, I'd rather not. My experience is that one's pleasures don't bear
 thinking about.
 
 DON JUAN. That is why intellect is so unpopular. But to Life, the force
--**--**--
 
 DON JUAN. She did more: she interpreted all the other teaching for me.
 Ah, my friends, when the barriers were down for the first time, what
 an astounding illumination! I had been prepared for infatuation, for
 intoxication, for all the illusions of love's young dream; and lo! never
 was my perception clearer, nor my criticism more ruthless. The most
 jealous rival of my mistress never saw every blemish in her more keenly
 than I. I was not duped: I took her without chloroform.
 
 ANA. But you did take her.
 
 DON JUAN. That was the revelation. Up to that moment I had never lost
 the sense of being my own master; never consciously taken a single step
 until my reason had examined and approved it. I had come to believe that
 I was a purely rational creature: a thinker! I said, with the foolish
 philosopher, "I think; therefore I am." It was Woman who taught me to
 say "I am; therefore I think." And also "I would think more; therefore I
 must be more."
 
 THE STATUE. This is extremely abstract and metaphysical, Juan. If you
 would stick to the concrete, and put your discoveries in the form
 of entertaining anecdotes about your adventures with women, your
 conversation would be easier to follow.
 
 DON JUAN. Bah! what need I add? Do you not understand that when I stood
 face to face with Woman, every fibre in my clear critical brain warned
 me to spare her and save myself. My morals said No. My conscience said
 No. My chivalry and pity for her said No. My prudent regard for myself
 said No. My ear, practised on a thousand songs and symphonies; my eye,
 exercised on a thousand paintings; tore her voice, her features, her
 color to shreds. I caught all those tell-tale resemblances to her father
--**--**--
 really wishes to do he will finally discover a means of doing? Well,
 you have done your best, you virtuous ladies, and others of your way
 of thinking, to bend Man's mind wholly towards honorable love as the
 highest good, and to understand by honorable love romance and beauty
 and happiness in the possession of beautiful, refined, delicate,
 affectionate women. You have taught women to value their own youth,
 health, shapeliness, and refinement above all things. Well, what place
 have squalling babies and household cares in this exquisite paradise of
 the senses and emotions? Is it not the inevitable end of it all that the
 human will shall say to the human brain: Invent me a means by which I
 can have love, beauty, romance, emotion, passion without their wretched
 penalties, their expenses, their worries, their trials, their illnesses
 and agonies and risks of death, their retinue of servants and nurses and
 doctors and schoolmasters.
 
 THE DEVIL. All this, Senor Don Juan, is realized here in my realm.
 
 DON JUAN. Yes, at the cost of death. Man will not take it at that price:
 he demands the romantic delights of your hell whilst he is still on
 earth. Well, the means will be found: the brain will not fail when the
 will is in earnest. The day is coming when great nations will find their
 numbers dwindling from census to census; when the six roomed villa will
 rise in price above the family mansion; when the viciously reckless poor
 and the stupidly pious rich will delay the extinction of the race only
 by degrading it; whilst the boldly prudent, the thriftily selfish and
 ambitious, the imaginative and poetic, the lovers of money and solid
 comfort, the worshippers of success, art, and of love, will all oppose
 to the Force of Life the device of sterility.
--**--**--
 of mankind lead to anything better than making the most of those
 pleasures of art and love which you yourself admit refined you, elevated
 you, developed you?
 
 DON JUAN. I never demonstrated the extinction of mankind. Life cannot
 will its own extinction either in its blind amorphous state or in any
 of the forms into which it has organized itself. I had not finished when
 His Excellency interrupted me.
 
 THE STATUE. I begin to doubt whether you ever will finish, my friend.
 You are extremely fond of hearing yourself talk.
 
 DON JUAN. True; but since you have endured so much you may as well
 endure to the end. Long before this sterilization which I described
 becomes more than a clearly foreseen possibility, the reaction will
 begin. The great central purpose of breeding the race, ay, breeding it
 to heights now deemed superhuman: that purpose which is now hidden in a
 mephitic cloud of love and romance and prudery and fastidiousness, will
 break through into clear sunlight as a purpose no longer to be confused
 with the gratification of personal fancies, the impossible realization
 of boys' and girls' dreams of bliss, or the need of older people for
 companionship or money. The plain-spoken marriage services of the
 vernacular Churches will no longer be abbreviated and half suppressed
 as indelicate. The sober decency, earnestness and authority of their
 declaration of the real purpose of marriage will be honored
 and accepted, whilst their romantic vowings and pledgings and
 until-death-do-us-partings and the like will be expunged as unbearable
 frivolities. Do my sex the justice to admit, Senora, that we have always
 recognized that the sex relation is not a personal or friendly relation
 at all.
 
 ANA. Not a personal or friendly relation! What relation is more
 personal? more sacred? more holy?
 
 DON JUAN. Sacred and holy, if you like, Ana, but not personally
--**--**--
 a murderer. I have always preferred to stand up to those facts and build
 institutions on their recognition. You prefer to propitiate the three
 devils by proclaiming their chastity, their thrift, and their loving
 kindness; and to base your institutions on these flatteries. Is it any
 wonder that the institutions do not work smoothly?
 
 THE STATUE. What used the ladies to say, Juan?
 
 DON JUAN. Oh, come! Confidence for confidence. First tell me what you
 used to say to the ladies.
 
 THE STATUE. I! Oh, I swore that I would be faithful to the death; that
 I should die if they refused me; that no woman could ever be to me what
 she was--
 
 ANA. She? Who?
 
 THE STATUE. Whoever it happened to be at the time, my dear. I had
 certain things I always said. One of them was that even when I was
 eighty, one white hair of the woman I loved would make me tremble more
 than the thickest gold tress from the most beautiful young head. Another
 was that I could not bear the thought of anyone else being the mother of
 my children.
 
 DON JUAN. [revolted] You old rascal!
 
 THE STATUE. [Stoutly] Not a bit; for I really believed it with all
 my soul at the moment. I had a heart: not like you. And it was this
 sincerity that made me successful.
 
 DON JUAN. Sincerity! To be fool enough to believe a ramping, stamping,
 thumping lie: that is what you call sincerity! To be so greedy for
 a woman that you deceive yourself in your eagerness to deceive her:
 sincerity, you call it!
 
 THE STATUE. Oh, damn your sophistries! I was a man in love, not a
 lawyer. And the women loved me for it, bless them!
 
 DON JUAN. They made you think so. What will you say when I tell you that
--**--**--
 DON JUAN. Yes, it is mere talk. But why is it mere talk? Because,
 my friend, beauty, purity, respectability, religion, morality, art,
 patriotism, bravery and the rest are nothing but words which I or anyone
 else can turn inside out like a glove. Were they realities, you
 would have to plead guilty to my indictment; but fortunately for your
 self-respect, my diabolical friend, they are not realities. As you
 say, they are mere words, useful for duping barbarians into adopting
 civilization, or the civilized poor into submitting to be robbed and
 enslaved. That is the family secret of the governing caste; and if we
 who are of that caste aimed at more Life for the world instead of at
 more power and luxury for our miserable selves, that secret would make
 us great. Now, since I, being a nobleman, am in the secret too, think
 how tedious to me must be your unending cant about all these moralistic
 figments, and how squalidly disastrous your sacrifice of your lives to
 them! If you even believed in your moral game enough to play it fairly,
 it would be interesting to watch; but you don't: you cheat at every
 trick; and if your opponent outcheats you, you upset the table and try
 to murder him.
 
 THE DEVIL. On earth there may be some truth in this, because the people
 are uneducated and cannot appreciate my religion of love and beauty; but
 here--
 
 DON JUAN. Oh yes: I know. Here there is nothing but love and beauty.
 Ugh! it is like sitting for all eternity at the first act of a
 fashionable play, before the complications begin. Never in my worst
 moments of superstitious terror on earth did I dream that Hell was so
 horrible. I live, like a hairdresser, in the continual contemplation
--**--**--
 sprinkling and inoculate them with disease to save them from catching it
 accidentally; then you will take to politics, where you will become the
 catspaw of corrupt functionaries and the henchman of ambitious humbugs;
 and the end will be despair and decrepitude, broken nerve and
 shattered hopes, vain regrets for that worst and silliest of wastes
 and sacrifices, the waste and sacrifice of the power of enjoyment: in
 a word, the punishment of the fool who pursues the better before he has
 secured the good.
 
 DON JUAN. But at least I shall not be bored. The service of the Life
 Force has that advantage, at all events. So fare you well, Senor Satan.
 
 THE DEVIL. [amiably] Fare you well, Don Juan. I shall often think of our
 interesting chats about things in general. I wish you every happiness:
 Heaven, as I said before, suits some people. But if you should change
 your mind, do not forget that the gates are always open here to the
 repentant prodigal. If you feel at any time that warmth of heart,
 sincere unforced affection, innocent enjoyment, and warm, breathing,
 palpitating reality--
 
 DON JUAN. Why not say flesh and blood at once, though we have left those
 two greasy commonplaces behind us?
 
 THE DEVIL. [angrily] You throw my friendly farewell back in my teeth,
 then, Don Juan?
 
 DON JUAN. By no means. But though there is much to be learnt from a
 cynical devil, I really cannot stand a sentimental one. Senor Commander:
 you know the way to the frontier of hell and heaven. Be good enough to
 direct me.
 
 THE STATUE. Oh, the frontier is only the difference between two ways of
 looking at things. Any road will take you across it if you really want
 to get there.
 
 DON JUAN. Good. [saluting Dona Ana] Senora: your servant.
--**--**--
 some hopes of him; but he was a confirmed Life Force worshipper. It was
 he who raked up the Superman, who is as old as Prometheus; and the 20th
 century will run after this newest of the old crazes when it gets tired
 of the world, the flesh, and your humble servant.
 
 THE STATUE. Superman is a good cry; and a good cry is half the battle. I
 should like to see this Nietzsche.
 
 THE DEVIL. Unfortunately he met Wagner here, and had a quarrel with him.
 
 THE STATUE. Quite right, too. Mozart for me!
 
 THE DEVIL. Oh, it was not about music. Wagner once drifted into Life
 Force worship, and invented a Superman called Siegfried. But he came to
 his senses afterwards. So when they met here, Nietzsche denounced him
 as a renegade; and Wagner wrote a pamphlet to prove that Nietzsche was
 a Jew; and it ended in Nietzsche's going to heaven in a huff. And a
 good riddance too. And now, my friend, let us hasten to my palace and
 celebrate your arrival with a grand musical service.
 
 THE STATUE. With pleasure: you're most kind.
 
 THE DEVIL. This way, Commander. We go down the old trap [he places
 himself on the grave trap].
 
 THE STATUE. Good. [Reflectively] All the same, the Superman is a fine
 conception. There is something statuesque about it. [He places himself
 on the grave trap beside The Devil. It begins to descend slowly. Red
 glow from the abyss]. Ah, this reminds me of old times.
 
 THE DEVIL. And me also.
 
 ANA. Stop! [The trap stops].
 
 THE DEVIL. You, Senora, cannot come this way. You will have an
 apotheosis. But you will be at the palace before us.
 
 ANA. That is not what I stopped you for. Tell me where can I find the
--**--**--
 VIOLET. What are you doing here with all these men?
 
 ANN. Why did you leave us without a word of warning?
 
 HECTOR. I want that bunch of roses, Miss Whitefield. [To Tanner] When
 we found you were gone, Miss Whitefield bet me a bunch of roses my car
 would not overtake yours before you reached Monte Carlo.
 
 TANNER. But this is not the road to Monte Carlo.
 
 HECTOR. No matter. Miss Whitefield tracked you at every stopping place:
 she is a regular Sherlock Holmes.
 
 TANNER. The Life Force! I am lost.
 
 OCTAVIUS. [Bounding gaily down from the road into the amphitheatre, and
 coming between Tanner and Straker] I am so glad you are safe, old chap.
 We were afraid you had been captured by brigands.
 
 RAMSDEN. [who has been staring at Mendoza] I seem to remember the face
 of your friend here. [Mendoza rises politely and advances with a smile
 between Ann and Ramsden].
 
 HECTOR. Why, so do I.
 
 OCTAVIUS. I know you perfectly well, Sir; but I can't think where I have
 met you.
 
 MENDOZA. [to Violet] Do YOU remember me, madam?
 
 VIOLET. Oh, quite well; but I am so stupid about names.
 
 MENDOZA. It was at the Savoy Hotel. [To Hector] You, sir, used to come
 with this lady [Violet] to lunch. [To Octavius] You, sir, often brought
 this lady [Ann] and her mother to dinner on your way to the Lyceum
 Theatre. [To Ramsden] You, sir, used to come to supper, with [dropping
 his voice to a confidential but perfectly audible whisper] several
 different ladies.
 
 RAMSDEN. [angrily] Well, what is that to you, pray?
 
 OCTAVIUS. Why, Violet, I thought you hardly knew one another before this
 trip, you and Malone!
 
 VIOLET. [vexed] I suppose this person was the manager.
 
 MENDOZA. The waiter, madam. I have a grateful recollection of you all.
--**--**--
 
 MENDOZA. [between his teeth] Goon. Talk politics, you idiots: nothing
 sounds more respectable. Keep it up, I tell you.
 
 The soldiers line the road, commanding the amphitheatre with their
 rifles. The brigands, struggling with an over-whelming impulse to hide
 behind one another, look as unconcerned as they can. Mendoza rises
 superbly, with undaunted front. The officer in command steps down from
 the road in to the amphitheatre; looks hard at the brigands; and then
 inquiringly at Tanner.
 
 THE OFFICER. Who are these men, Senor Ingles?
 
 TANNER. My escort.
 
 Mendoza, with a Mephistophelean smile, bows profoundly. An irrepressible
 grin runs from face to face among the brigands. They touch their hats,
 except the Anarchist, who defies the State with folded arms.
 
 
 
 
 ACT IV
 
 The garden of a villa in Granada. Whoever wishes to know what it is like
 must go to Granada and see. One may prosaically specify a group of hills
 dotted with villas, the Alhambra on the top of one of the hills, and
 a considerable town in the valley, approached by dusty white roads in
 which the children, no matter what they are doing or thinking about,
 automatically whine for halfpence and reach out little clutching brown
 palms for them; but there is nothing in this description except the
 Alhambra, the begging, and the color of the roads, that does not fit
 Surrey as well as Spain. The difference is that the Surrey hills are
 comparatively small and ugly, and should properly be called the Surrey
 Protuberances; but these Spanish hills are of mountain stock: the
 amenity which conceals their size does not compromise their dignity.
 
 This particular garden is on a hill opposite the Alhambra; and the villa
 is as expensive and pretentious as a villa must be if it is to be let
 furnished by the week to opulent American and English visitors. If we
--**--**--
 This elderly gentleman defies the Spanish sun in a black frock coat,
 tall silk bat, trousers in which narrow stripes of dark grey and lilac
 blend into a highly respectable color, and a black necktie tied into a
 bow over spotless linen. Probably therefore a man whose social position
 needs constant and scrupulous affirmation without regard to climate:
 one who would dress thus for the middle of the Sahara or the top of Mont
 Blanc. And since he has not the stamp of the class which accepts as its
 life-mission the advertizing and maintenance of first rate tailoring and
 millinery, he looks vulgar in his finery, though in a working dress of
 any kind he would look dignified enough. He is a bullet cheeked man with
 a red complexion, stubbly hair, smallish eyes, a hard mouth that folds
 down at the corners, and a dogged chin. The looseness of skin that comes
 with age has attacked his throat and the laps of his cheeks; but he is
 still hard as an apple above the mouth; so that the upper half of his
 face looks younger than the lower. He has the self-confidence of one who
 has made money, and something of the truculence of one who has made it
 in a brutalizing struggle, his civility having under it a perceptible
 menace that he has other methods in reserve if necessary. Withal, a man
 to be rather pitied when he is not to be feared; for there is something
 pathetic about him at times, as if the huge commercial machine which has
 worked him into his frock coat had allowed him very little of his own
 way and left his affections hungry and baffled. At the first word
 that falls from him it is clear that he is an Irishman whose native
--**--**--
 comes o livin in provincial places like Ireland and America. Over here
 you're Ector: if you avn't noticed it before you soon will.
 
 The growing strain of the conversation is here relieved by Violet, who
 has sallied from the villa and through the garden to the steps, which
 she now descends, coming very opportunely between Malone and Straker.
 
 VIOLET. [to Straker] Did you take my message?
 
 STRAKER. Yes, miss. I took it to the hotel and sent it up, expecting to
 see young Mr Malone. Then out walks this gent, and says it's all right
 and he'll come with me. So as the hotel people said he was Mr Ector
 Malone, I fetched him. And now he goes back on what he said. But if he
 isn't the gentleman you meant, say the word: it's easy enough to fetch
 him back again.
 
 MALONE. I should esteem it a great favor if I might have a short
 conversation with you, madam. I am Hector's father, as this bright
 Britisher would have guessed in the course of another hour or so.
 
 STRAKER. [coolly defiant] No, not in another year or so. When we've ad
 you as long to polish up as we've ad im, perhaps you'll begin to look a
 little bit up to is mark. At present you fall a long way short. You've
 got too many aitches, for one thing. [To Violet, amiably] All right,
 Miss: you want to talk to him: I shan't intrude. [He nods affably to
 Malone and goes out through the little gate in the paling].
 
 VIOLET. [very civilly] I am so sorry, Mr Malone, if that man has been
 rude to you. But what can we do? He is our chauffeur.
 
 MALONE. Your what?
 
 VIOLET. The driver of our automobile. He can drive a motor car at
--**--**--
 VIOLET. I am sure you would not be unreasonable with him, Mr Malone.
 
 MALONE. I hope not, Miss Robinson; but at your age you might think many
 things unreasonable that don't seem so to me.
 
 VIOLET. [with a little shrug] Oh well, I suppose there's no use our
 playing at cross purposes, Mr Malone. Hector wants to marry me.
 
 MALONE. I inferred from your note that he might. Well, Miss Robinson,
 he is his own master; but if he marries you he shall not have a rap from
 me. [He takes off his spectacles and pockets them with the note].
 
 VIOLET. [with some severity] That is not very complimentary to me, Mr
 Malone.
 
 MALONE. I say nothing against you, Miss Robinson: I daresay you are an
 amiable and excellent young lady. But I have other views for Hector.
 
 VIOLET. Hector may not have other views for himself, Mr Malone.
 
 MALONE. Possibly not. Then he does without me: that's all. I daresay you
 are prepared for that. When a young lady writes to a young man to
 come to her quick, quick, quick, money seems nothing and love seems
 everything.
 
 VIOLET. [sharply] I beg your pardon, Mr Malone: I do not think anything
 so foolish. Hector must have money.
 
 MALONE. [staggered] Oh, very well, very well. No doubt he can work for
 it.
 
 VIOLET. What is the use of having money if you have to work for it? [She
 rises impatiently]. It's all nonsense, Mr Malone: you must enable your
 son to keep up his position. It is his right.
 
 MALONE. [grimly] I should not advise you to marry him on the strength of
 that right, Miss Robinson.
 
 Violet, who has almost lost her temper, controls herself with an effort;
 unclenches her fingers; and resumes her seat with studied tranquillity
--**--**--
 for Hector. That's straightforward isn't it, like yourself?
 
 VIOLET. [icily pitying his sentimentality] Really, Mr Malone, I am
 astonished to hear a man of your age and good sense talking in that
 romantic way. Do you suppose English noblemen will sell their places to
 you for the asking?
 
 MALONE. I have the refusal of two of the oldest family mansions in
 England. One historic owner can't afford to keep all the rooms dusted:
 the other can't afford the death duties. What do you say now?
 
 VIOLET. Of course it is very scandalous; but surely you know that the
 Government will sooner or later put a stop to all these Socialistic
 attacks on property.
 
 MALONE. [grinning] D'y' think they'll be able to get that done before I
 buy the house--or rather the abbey? They're both abbeys.
 
 VIOLET. [putting that aside rather impatiently] Oh, well, let us talk
 sense, Mr Malone. You must feel that we haven't been talking sense so
 far.
 
 MALONE. I can't say I do. I mean all I say.
 
 VIOLET. Then you don't know Hector as I do. He is romantic and faddy--he
 gets it from you, I fancy--and he wants a certain sort of wife to take
 care of him. Not a faddy sort of person, you know.
 
 MALONE. Somebody like you, perhaps?
 
 VIOLET. [quietly] Well, yes. But you cannot very well ask me to
 undertake this with absolutely no means of keeping up his position.
 
 MALONE. [alarmed] Stop a bit, stop a bit. Where are we getting to? I'm
 not aware that I'm asking you to undertake anything.
 
 VIOLET. Of course, Mr Malone, you can make it very difficult for me to
 speak to you if you choose to misunderstand me.
 
 MALONE. [half bewildered] I don't wish to take any unfair advantage; but
 we seem to have got off the straight track somehow.
--**--**--
 comes angrily between Hector and Violet, and almost bawls into Hector's
 left ear] You've picked up that habit of the British aristocracy, have
 you?
 
 HECTOR. That's all right. Don't you trouble yourself about that. I'll
 answer for the morality of what I'm doing.
 
 TANNER. [coming forward to Hector's right hand with flashing eyes] Well
 said, Malone! You also see that mere marriage laws are not morality! I
 agree with you; but unfortunately Violet does not.
 
 MALONE. I take leave to doubt that, sir. [Turning on Violet] Let me tell
 you, Mrs Robinson, or whatever your right name is, you had no right to
 send that letter to my son when you were the wife of another man.
 
 HECTOR. [outraged] This is the last straw. Dad: you have insulted my
 wife.
 
 MALONE. YOUR wife!
 
 TANNER. YOU the missing husband! Another moral impostor! [He smites his
 brow, and collapses into Malone's chair].
 
 MALONE. You've married without my consent!
 
 RAMSDEN. You have deliberately humbugged us, sir!
 
 HECTOR. Here: I have had just about enough of being badgered. Violet and
 I are married: that's the long and the short of it. Now what have you
 got to say--any of you?
 
 MALONE. I know what I've got to say. She's married a beggar.
 
 HECTOR. No; she's married a Worker [his American pronunciation imparts
 an overwhelming intensity to this simple and unpopular word]. I start to
 earn my own living this very afternoon.
 
 MALONE. [sneering angrily] Yes: you're very plucky now, because you got
 your remittance from me yesterday or this morning, I reckon. Wait til
 it's spent. You won't be so full of cheek then.
 
 HECTOR. [producing a letter from his pocketbook] Here it is [thrusting
 it on his father]. Now you just take your remittance and yourself out of
 my life. I'm done with remittances; and I'm done with you. I don't sell
--**--**--
 obsequiously by Malone to the upper end of the garden].
 
 TANNER. [drawing Ramsden's attention to Malone's cringing attitude as he
 takes leave of Violet] And that poor devil is a billionaire! one of the
 master spirits of the age! Led on a string like a pug dog by the first
 girl who takes the trouble to despise him. I wonder will it ever come to
 that with me. [He comes down to the lawn.]
 
 RAMSDEN. [following him] The sooner the better for you.
 
 MALONE. [clapping his hands as he returns through the garden] That'll be
 a grand woman for Hector. I wouldn't exchange her for ten duchesses. [He
 descends to the lawn and comes between Tanner and Ramsden].
 
 RAMSDEN. [very civil to the billionaire] It's an unexpected pleasure to
 find you in this corner of the world, Mr Malone. Have you come to buy up
 the Alhambra?
 
 MALONE. Well, I don't say I mightn't. I think I could do better with it
 than the Spanish government. But that's not what I came about. To tell
 you the truth, about a month ago I overheard a deal between two men over
 a bundle of shares. They differed about the price: they were young and
 greedy, and didn't know that if the shares were worth what was bid for
 them they must be worth what was asked, the margin being too small to
 be of any account, you see. To amuse meself, I cut in and bought the
 shares. Well, to this day I haven't found out what the business is. The
 office is in this town; and the name is Mendoza, Limited. Now whether
 Mendoza's a mine, or a steamboat line, or a bank, or a patent article--
 
 TANNER. He's a man. I know him: his principles are thoroughly
 commercial. Let us take you round the town in our motor, Mr Malone, and
--**--**--
 Examiner, much less of people who consciously profit by Mrs Warren's
 profession, or who personally make use of it, or who hold the widely
 whispered view that it is an indispensable safety-valve for the
 protection of domestic virtue, or, above all, who are smitten with a
 sentimental affection for our fallen sister, and would "take her up
 tenderly, lift her with care, fashioned so slenderly, young, and SO
 fair." Nor am I prepared to accept the verdict of the medical gentlemen
 who would compulsorily sanitate and register Mrs Warren, whilst leaving
 Mrs Warren's patrons, especially her military patrons, free to destroy
 her health and anybody else's without fear of reprisals. But I should be
 quite content to have my play judged by, say, a joint committee of
 the Central Vigilance Society and the Salvation Army. And the sterner
 moralists the members of the committee were, the better.
 
 Some of the journalists I have shocked reason so unripely that they will
 gather nothing from this but a confused notion that I am accusing the
 National Vigilance Association and the Salvation Army of complicity in
 my own scandalous immorality. It will seem to them that people who would
 stand this play would stand anything. They are quite mistaken. Such
 an audience as I have described would be revolted by many of our
 fashionable plays. They would leave the theatre convinced that the
 Plymouth Brother who still regards the playhouse as one of the gates of
 hell is perhaps the safest adviser on the subject of which he knows so
 little. If I do not draw the same conclusion, it is not because I am one
 of those who claim that art is exempt from moral obligations, and deny
 that the writing or performance of a play is a moral act, to be treated
--**--**--
 protectors and passed on to be "redeemed" by old and faithful lovers who
 have adored them in spite of their levities. Naturally, the poorer girls
 in the gallery will believe in the beauty, in the exquisite dresses, and
 the luxurious living, and will see that there is no real necessity for
 the consumption, the suicide, or the ejectment: mere pious forms, all
 of them, to save the Censor's face. Even if these purely official
 catastrophes carried any conviction, the majority of English girls
 remain so poor, so dependent, so well aware that the drudgeries of such
 honest work as is within their reach are likely enough to lead them
 eventually to lung disease, premature death, and domestic desertion or
 brutality, that they would still see reason to prefer the primrose path
 to the strait path of virtue, since both, vice at worst and virtue at
 best, lead to the same end in poverty and overwork. It is true that the
 Board School mistress will tell you that only girls of a certain kind
 will reason in this way. But alas! that certain kind turns out on
 inquiry to be simply the pretty, dainty kind: that is, the only kind
 that gets the chance of acting on such reasoning. Read the first report
 of the Commission on the Housing of the Working Classes [Bluebook C
 4402, 8d., 1889]; read the Report on Home Industries (sacred word,
 Home!) issued by the Women's Industrial Council [Home Industries of
 Women in London, 1897, 1s., 12 Buckingham Street, W. C.]; and ask
 yourself whether, if the lot in life therein described were your lot
 in life, you would not prefer the lot of Cleopatra, of Theodora, of the
 Lady of the Camellias, of Mrs Tanqueray, of Zaza, of Iris. If you can
 go deep enough into things to be able to say no, how many ignorant
--**--**--
 single scene of Mrs Warren's Profession or Iris. None of our plays rouse
 the sympathy of the audience by an exhibition of the pains of maternity,
 as Chinese plays constantly do. Each nation has its own particular set
 of tapus in addition to the common human stock; and though each of
 these tapus limits the scope of the dramatist, it does not make drama
 impossible. If the Examiner were to refuse to license plays with female
 characters in them, he would only be doing to the stage what our tribal
 customs already do to the pulpit and the bar. I have myself written a
 rather entertaining play with only one woman in it, and she is quite
 heartwhole; and I could just as easily write a play without a woman in
 it at all. I will even go so far as to promise the Mr Redford my support
 if he will introduce this limitation for part of the year, say during
 Lent, so as to make a close season for that dullest of stock dramatic
 subjects, adultery, and force our managers and authors to find out what
 all great dramatists find out spontaneously: to wit, that people who
 sacrifice every other consideration to love are as hopelessly unheroic
 on the stage as lunatics or dipsomaniacs. Hector is the world's hero;
 not Paris nor Antony.
 
 But though I do not question the possibility of a drama in which love
 should be as effectively ignored as cholera is at present, there is not
 the slightest chance of that way out of the difficulty being taken by
 the Mr Redford. If he attempted it there would be a revolt in which he
 would be swept away in spite of my singlehanded efforts to defend him.
 A complete tapu is politically impossible. A complete toleration is
--**--**--
 to the audience that when she met Captain Ardale she sinned "but in
 intention."
 
 Play number one. A prince is compelled by his parents to marry the
 daughter of a neighboring king, but loves another maiden. The scene
 represents a hall in the king's palace at night. The wedding has taken
 place that day; and the closed door of the nuptial chamber is in view of
 the audience. Inside, the princess awaits her bridegroom. A duenna is in
 attendance. The bridegroom enters. His sole desire is to escape from a
 marriage which is hateful to him. An idea strikes him. He will assault
 the duenna, and get ignominiously expelled from the palace by his
 indignant father-in-law. To his horror, when he proceeds to carry out
 this stratagem, the duenna, far from raising an alarm, is flattered,
 delighted, and compliant. The assaulter becomes the assaulted. He flings
 her angrily to the ground, where she remains placidly. He flies. The
 father enters; dismisses the duenna; and listens at the keyhole of
 his daughter's nuptial chamber, uttering various pleasantries, and
 declaring, with a shiver, that a sound of kissing, which he supposes to
 proceed from within, makes him feel young again.
 
 In deprecation of the scandalized astonishment with which such a story
 as this will be read, I can only say that it was not presented on the
 stage until its propriety had been certified by the chief officer of the
 Queen of England's household.
 
 Story number two. A German officer finds himself in an inn with a French
 lady who has wounded his national vanity. He resolves to humble her by
 committing a rape upon her. He announces his purpose. She remonstrates,
 implores, flies to the doors and finds them locked, calls for help
 and finds none at hand, runs screaming from side to side, and, after
--**--**--
 would protect the Censorship against effective exposure and criticism.
 Not long ago an American Review of high standing asked me for an article
 on the Censorship of the English stage. I replied that such an article
 would involve passages too disagreeable for publication in a magazine
 for general family reading. The editor persisted nevertheless; but
 not until he had declared his readiness to face this, and had pledged
 himself to insert the article unaltered (the particularity of the pledge
 extending even to a specification of the exact number of words in the
 article) did I consent to the proposal. What was the result?
 
 The editor, confronted with the two stories given above, threw his
 pledge to the winds, and, instead of returning the article, printed
 it with the illustrative examples omitted, and nothing left but the
 argument from political principles against the Censorship. In doing this
 he fired my broadside after withdrawing the cannon balls; for neither
 the Censor nor any other Englishman, except perhaps Mr Leslie Stephen
 and a few other veterans of the dwindling old guard of Benthamism, cares
 a dump about political principle. The ordinary Briton thinks that if
 every other Briton is not kept under some form of tutelage, the more
 childish the better, he will abuse his freedom viciously. As far as its
 principle is concerned, the Censorship is the most popular institution
 in England; and the playwright who criticizes it is slighted as a
 blackguard agitating for impunity. Consequently nothing can really shake
 the confidence of the public in the Lord Chamberlain's department except
 a remorseless and unbowdlerized narration of the licentious fictions
 which slip through its net, and are hallmarked by it with the approval
 of the Throne. But since these narrations cannot be made public without
 great difficulty, owing to the obligation an editor is under not to
--**--**--
 any particular effect on his mind at all, and that when he was once
 satisfied that the ill-conducted hero was a German and not an English
 officer, he passed the play without studying its moral tendencies. Even
 if he had undertaken that study, there is no more reason to suppose
 that he is a competent moralist than there is to suppose that I am a
 competent mathematician. But truly it does not matter whether he is a
 moralist or not. Let nobody dream for a moment that what is wrong with
 the Censorship is the shortcoming of the gentleman who happens at any
 moment to be acting as Censor. Replace him to-morrow by an Academy of
 Letters and an Academy of Dramatic Poetry, and the new and enlarged
 filter will still exclude original and epoch-making work, whilst passing
 conventional, old-fashioned, and vulgar work without question. The
 conclave which compiles the index of the Roman Catholic Church is the
 most august, ancient, learned, famous, and authoritative censorship in
 Europe. Is it more enlightened, more liberal, more tolerant that the
 comparatively infinitesimal office of the Lord Chamberlain? On the
 contrary, it has reduced itself to a degree of absurdity which makes a
 Catholic university a contradiction in terms. All censorships exist
 to prevent anyone from challenging current conceptions and existing
 institutions. All progress is initiated by challenging current concepts,
 and executed by supplanting existing institutions. Consequently the
 first condition of progress is the removal of censorships. There is the
 whole case against censorships in a nutshell.
 
 It will be asked whether theatrical managers are to be allowed to
 produce what they like, without regard to the public interest. But that
 is not the alternative. The managers of our London music-halls are not
 subject to any censorship. They produce their entertainments on their
--**--**--
 not mine. The play had been in print for four years; and I have spared
 no pains to make known that my plays are built to induce, not voluptuous
 reverie but intellectual interest, not romantic rhapsody but humane
 concern. Accordingly, I do not find those critics who are gifted with
 intellectual appetite and political conscience complaining of want of
 dramatic power. Rather do they protest, not altogether unjustly, against
 a few relapses into staginess and caricature which betray the young
 playwright and the old playgoer in this early work of mine.
 
 As to the voluptuaries, I can assure them that the playwright, whether
 he be myself or another, will always disappoint them. The drama can do
 little to delight the senses: all the apparent instances to the contrary
 are instances of the personal fascination of the performers. The drama
 of pure feeling is no longer in the hands of the playwright: it has been
 conquered by the musician, after whose enchantments all the verbal arts
 seem cold and tame. Romeo and Juliet with the loveliest Juliet is dry,
 tedious, and rhetorical in comparison with Wagner's Tristan, even though
 Isolde be both fourteen stone and forty, as she often is in Germany.
 Indeed, it needed no Wagner to convince the public of this. The
 voluptuous sentimentality of Gounod's Faust and Bizet's Carmen has
 captured the common playgoer; and there is, flatly, no future now for
 any drama without music except the drama of thought. The attempt to
 produce a genus of opera without music (and this absurdity is what
 our fashionable theatres have been driving at for a long time without
 knowing it) is far less hopeful than my own determination to accept
 problem as the normal materiel of the drama.
 
 That this determination will throw me into a long conflict with our
--**--**--
 the stage: that is, the performers in their own persons. In this
 phase the playwright who attempts to revive genuine drama produces the
 disagreeable impression of the pedant who attempts to start a serious
 discussion at a fashionable at-home. Later on, when he has driven the
 tea services out and made the people who had come to use the theatre as
 a drawing-room understand that it is they and not the dramatist who are
 the intruders, he has to face the accusation that his plays ignore human
 feeling, an illusion produced by that very resistance of fact and law to
 human feeling which creates drama. It is the _deus ex machina_ who, by
 suspending that resistance, makes the fall of the curtain an immediate
 necessity, since drama ends exactly where resistance ends. Yet the
 introduction of this resistance produces so strong an impression of
 heartlessness nowadays that a distinguished critic has summed up the
 impression made on him by Mrs Warren's Profession, by declaring that
 "the difference between the spirit of Tolstoy and the spirit of Mr
 Shaw is the difference between the spirit of Christ and the spirit of
 Euclid." But the epigram would be as good if Tolstoy's name were put in
 place of mine and D'Annunzio's in place of Tolstoy. At the same time
 I accept the enormous compliment to my reasoning powers with sincere
 complacency; and I promise my flatterer that when he is sufficiently
 accustomed to and therefore undazzled by problem on the stage to be able
 to attend to the familiar factor of humanity in it as well as to the
 unfamiliar one of a real environment, he will both see and feel that
 Mrs Warren's Profession is no mere theorem, but a play of instincts
 and temperaments in conflict with each other and with a flinty social
--**--**--
 "Why, it comes into my mind, do you know, sir," said Wegg with an air of
 insinuating frankness (having first again looked hard at the book), "that
 you made a little mistake this morning, which I had meant to set you
 right in; only something put it out of my head. I think you said Rooshan
 Empire, sir?"
 
 "It is Rooshan; ain't it, Wegg?"
 
 "No, sir. Roman. Roman."
 
 "What's the difference, Wegg?"
 
 "The difference, sir?" Mr Wegg was faltering and in danger of breaking
 down, when a bright thought flashed upon him. "The difference, sir?
 There you place me in a difficulty, Mr Boffin. Suffice it to observe,
 that the difference is best postponed to some other occasion when Mrs
 Boffin does not honor us with her company. In Mrs Boffin's presence,
 sir, we had better drop it."
 
 Mr Wegg thus came out of his disadvantage with quite a chivalrous air,
 and not only that, but by dint of repeating with a manly delicacy,
 "In Mrs Boffin's presence, sir, we had better drop it!" turned the
 disadvantage on Boffin, who felt that he had committed himself in a very
 painful manner.
 
 I am willing to let Mr Wegg drop it on these terms, provided I am
 allowed to mention here that Mrs Warren's Profession is a play for
 women; that it was written for women; that it has been performed and
 produced mainly through the determination of women that it should be
 performed and produced; that the enthusiasm of women made its first
 performance excitingly successful; and that not one of these women had
 any inducement to support it except their belief in the timeliness and
 the power of the lesson the play teaches. Those who were "surprised to
 see ladies present" were men; and when they proceeded to explain that
--**--**--
 gentleman rose up in wrath against the slum landlord, the slum
 landlord very effectively shewed him that slums are the product, not
 of individual Harpagons, but of the indifference of virtuous young
 gentlemen to the condition of the city they live in, provided they
 live at the west end of it on money earned by someone else's labor. The
 notion that prostitution is created by the wickedness of Mrs Warren
 is as silly as the notion--prevalent, nevertheless, to some extent in
 Temperance circles--that drunkenness is created by the wickedness of
 the publican. Mrs Warren is not a whit a worse woman than the reputable
 daughter who cannot endure her. Her indifference to the ultimate social
 consequences of her means of making money, and her discovery of that
 means by the ordinary method of taking the line of least resistance to
 getting it, are too common in English society to call for any special
 remark. Her vitality, her thrift, her energy, her outspokenness, her
 wise care of her daughter, and the managing capacity which has enabled
 her and her sister to climb from the fried fish shop down by the Mint
 to the establishments of which she boasts, are all high English social
 virtues. Her defence of herself is so overwhelming that it provokes the
 St James Gazette to declare that "the tendency of the play is wholly
 evil" because "it contains one of the boldest and most specious defences
 of an immoral life for poor women that has ever been penned." Happily
 the St James Gazette here speaks in its haste. Mrs Warren's defence of
 herself is not only bold and specious, but valid and unanswerable.
 But it is no defence at all of the vice which she organizes. It is
 no defence of an immoral life to say that the alternative offered
--**--**--
 
 One critic is so enslaved by this sort of logic that he calls my
 portraiture of the Reverend Samuel Gardner an attack on religion.
 
 According to this view Subaltern Iago is an attack on the army, Sir
 John Falstaff an attack on knighthood, and King Claudius an attack on
 royalty. Here again the clamor for naturalness and human feeling, raised
 by so many critics when they are confronted by the real thing on the
 stage, is really a clamor for the most mechanical and superficial sort
 of logic. The dramatic reason for making the clergyman what Mrs Warren
 calls "an old stick-in-the-mud," whose son, in spite of much capacity
 and charm, is a cynically worthless member of society, is to set up a
 mordant contrast between him and the woman of infamous profession, with
 her well brought-up, straightforward, hardworking daughter. The critics
 who have missed the contrast have doubtless observed often enough that
 many clergymen are in the Church through no genuine calling, but simply
 because, in circles which can command preferment, it is the refuge
 of "the fool of the family"; and that clergymen's sons are often
 conspicuous reactionists against the restraints imposed on them in
 childhood by their father's profession. These critics must know, too,
 from history if not from experience, that women as unscrupulous as Mrs
 Warren have distinguished themselves as administrators and rulers, both
 commercially and politically. But both observation and knowledge are
 left behind when journalists go to the theatre. Once in their stalls,
 they assume that it is "natural" for clergymen to be saintly, for
 soldiers to be heroic, for lawyers to be hard-hearted, for sailors to
 be simple and generous, for doctors to perform miracles with little
 bottles, and for Mrs Warren to be a beast and a demon. All this is not
--**--**--
 year with board and lodging is an impossibly low wage for a barmaid. It
 goes on to cite Mr Charles Booth as having testified that there are
 many laborers' wives who are happy and contented on eighteen shillings
 a week. But I can go further than that myself. I have seen an Oxford
 agricultural laborer's wife looking cheerful on eight shillings a week;
 but that does not console me for the fact that agriculture in England
 is a ruined industry. If poverty does not matter as long as it is
 contented, then crime does not matter as long as it is unscrupulous. The
 truth is that it is only then that it does matter most desperately.
 Many persons are more comfortable when they are dirty than when they are
 clean; but that does not recommend dirt as a national policy.
 
 Here I must for the present break off my arduous work of educating the
 Press. We shall resume our studies later on; but just now I am tired of
 playing the preceptor; and the eager thirst of my pupils for improvement
 does not console me for the slowness of their progress. Besides, I must
 reserve space to gratify my own vanity and do justice to the six artists
 who acted my play, by placing on record the hitherto unchronicled
 success of the first representation. It is not often that an author,
 after a couple of hours of those rare alternations of excitement and
 intensely attentive silence which only occur in the theatre when actors
 and audience are reacting on one another to the utmost, is able to step
 on the stage and apply the strong word genius to the representation with
 the certainty of eliciting an instant and overwhelming assent from the
 audience. That was my good fortune on the afternoon of Sunday, the fifth
--**--**--
 more trying to the dramatic temperament than mere difficulties.
 
 The acting, too, required courage and character as well as skill and
 intelligence. The veto of the Censor introduced quite a novel element of
 moral responsibility into the undertaking. And the characters were very
 unusual on the English stage. The younger heroine is, like her mother,
 an Englishwoman to the backbone, and not, like the heroines of our
 fashionable drama, a prima donna of Italian origin. Consequently she
 was sure to be denounced as unnatural and undramatic by the critics.
 The most vicious man in the play is not in the least a stage villain;
 indeed, he regards his own moral character with the sincere complacency
 of a hero of melodrama. The amiable devotee of romance and beauty is
 shewn at an age which brings out the futilization which these worships
 are apt to produce if they are made the staple of life instead of
 the sauce. The attitude of the clever young people to their elders is
 faithfully represented as one of pitiless ridicule and unsympathetic
 criticism, and forms a spectacle incredible to those who, when young,
 were not cleverer than their nearest elders, and painful to those
 sentimental parents who shrink from the cruelty of youth, which pardons
 nothing because it knows nothing. In short, the characters and their
 relations are of a kind that the routineer critic has not yet learned
 to place; so that their misunderstanding was a foregone conclusion.
 Nevertheless, there was no hesitation behind the curtain. When it went
 up at last, a stage much too small for the company was revealed to an
 auditorium much too small for the audience. But the players, though it
 was impossible for them to forget their own discomfort, at once made the
 spectators forget theirs. It certainly was a model audience, responsive
--**--**--
 
 
 
 ACT I
 
 
 [Summer afternoon in a cottage garden on the eastern slope of a hill a
 little south of Haslemere in Surrey. Looking up the hill, the cottage is
 seen in the left hand corner of the garden, with its thatched roof and
 porch, and a large latticed window to the left of the porch. A paling
 completely shuts in the garden, except for a gate on the right. The
 common rises uphill beyond the paling to the sky line. Some folded
 canvas garden chairs are leaning against the side bench in the porch. A
 lady's bicycle is propped against the wall, under the window. A little
 to the right of the porch a hammock is slung from two posts. A big
 canvas umbrella, stuck in the ground, keeps the sun off the hammock,
 in which a young lady is reading and making notes, her head towards
 the cottage and her feet towards the gate. In front of the hammock,
 and within reach of her hand, is a common kitchen chair, with a pile of
 serious-looking books and a supply of writing paper on it.]
 
 [A gentleman walking on the common comes into sight from behind the
 cottage. He is hardly past middle age, with something of the artist
 about him, unconventionally but carefully dressed, and clean-shaven
 except for a moustache, with an eager susceptible face and very amiable
 and considerate manners. He has silky black hair, with waves of grey and
 white in it. His eyebrows are white, his moustache black. He seems not
 certain of his way. He looks over the palings; takes stock of the place;
 and sees the young lady.]
 
 THE GENTLEMAN [taking off his hat] I beg your pardon. Can you direct me
 to Hindhead View--Mrs Alison's?
 
 THE YOUNG LADY [glancing up from her book] This is Mrs Alison's. [She
--**--**--
 
 VIVIE. Then I'll go and get you a chair. [She goes to the porch for a
 garden chair].
 
 PRAED [following her] Oh, pray, pray! Allow me. [He lays hands on the
 chair].
 
 VIVIE [letting him take it] Take care of your fingers; theyre rather
 dodgy things, those chairs. [She goes across to the chair with the books
 on it; pitches them into the hammock; and brings the chair forward with
 one swing].
 
 PRAED [who has just unfolded his chair] Oh, now do let me take that
 hard chair. I like hard chairs.
 
 VIVIE. So do I. Sit down, Mr Praed. [This invitation she gives with a
 genial peremptoriness, his anxiety to please her clearly striking her as
 a sign of weakness of character on his part. But he does not immediately
 obey].
 
 PRAED. By the way, though, hadnt we better go to the station to meet
 your mother?
 
 VIVIE [coolly] Why? She knows the way.
 
 PRAED [disconcerted] Er--I suppose she does [he sits down].
 
 VIVIE. Do you know, you are just like what I expected. I hope you are
 disposed to be friends with me.
 
 PRAED [again beaming] Thank you, my _dear_ Miss Warren; thank you. Dear
 me! I'm so glad your mother hasnt spoilt you!
 
 VIVIE. How?
 
 PRAED. Well, in making you too conventional. You know, my dear Miss
 Warren, I am a born anarchist. I hate authority. It spoils the relations
 between parent and child; even between mother and daughter. Now I was
 always afraid that your mother would strain her authority to make you
 very conventional. It's such a relief to find that she hasnt.
 
 VIVIE. Oh! have I been behaving unconventionally?
 
 PRAED. Oh no: oh dear no. At least, not conventionally unconventionally,
 you understand. [She nods and sits down. He goes on, with a cordial
--**--**--
 my while to face the grind since I was not going in for teaching; but I
 offered to try for fourth wrangler or thereabouts for fifty pounds. She
 closed with me at that, after a little grumbling; and I was better than
 my bargain. But I wouldn't do it again for that. Two hundred pounds would
 have been nearer the mark.
 
 PRAED [much damped] Lord bless me! Thats a very practical way of looking
 at it.
 
 VIVIE. Did you expect to find me an unpractical person?
 
 PRAED. But surely it's practical to consider not only the work these
 honors cost, but also the culture they bring.
 
 VIVIE. Culture! My dear Mr Praed: do you know what the mathematical
 tripos means? It means grind, grind, grind for six to eight hours a day
 at mathematics, and nothing but mathematics.
 
 I'm supposed to know something about science; but I know nothing except
 the mathematics it involves. I can make calculations for engineers,
 electricians, insurance companies, and so on; but I know next to
 nothing about engineering or electricity or insurance. I don't even know
 arithmetic well. Outside mathematics, lawn-tennis, eating, sleeping,
 cycling, and walking, I'm a more ignorant barbarian than any woman could
 possibly be who hadn't gone in for the tripos.
 
 PRAED [revolted] What a monstrous, wicked, rascally system! I knew it!
 I felt at once that it meant destroying all that makes womanhood
 beautiful!
 
 VIVIE. I don't object to it on that score in the least. I shall turn it
 to very good account, I assure you.
 
 PRAED. Pooh! In what way?
 
 VIVIE. I shall set up chambers in the City, and work at actuarial
 calculations and conveyancing. Under cover of that I shall do some law,
 with one eye on the Stock Exchange all the time. I've come down here by
--**--**--
 mean that. But you are so different from her ideal.
 
 VIVIE. Her what?!
 
 PRAED. Her ideal.
 
 VIVIE. Do you mean her ideal of ME?
 
 PRAED. Yes.
 
 VIVIE. What on earth is it like?
 
 PRAED. Well, you must have observed, Miss Warren, that people who are
 dissatisfied with their own bringing-up generally think that the world
 would be all right if everybody were to be brought up quite differently.
 Now your mother's life has been--er--I suppose you know--
 
 VIVIE. Don't suppose anything, Mr Praed. I hardly know my mother. Since
 I was a child I have lived in England, at school or at college, or with
 people paid to take charge of me. I have been boarded out all my life.
 My mother has lived in Brussels or Vienna and never let me go to her.
 I only see her when she visits England for a few days. I don't complain:
 it's been very pleasant; for people have been very good to me; and there
 has always been plenty of money to make things smooth. But don't imagine
 I know anything about my mother. I know far less than you do.
 
 PRAED [very ill at ease] In that case--[He stops, quite at a loss. Then,
 with a forced attempt at gaiety] But what nonsense we are talking! Of
 course you and your mother will get on capitally. [He rises, and looks
 abroad at the view]. What a charming little place you have here!
 
 VIVIE [unmoved] Rather a violent change of subject, Mr Praed. Why won't
 my mother's life bear being talked about?
 
 PRAED. Oh, you mustn't say that. Isn't it natural that I should have a
 certain delicacy in talking to my old friend's daughter about her behind
 her back? You and she will have plenty of opportunity of talking about
--**--**--
 
 PRAED [taking a desperate resolution] One word, Miss Warren. I had
 better tell you. It's very difficult; but--
 
 [Mrs Warren and Sir George Crofts arrive at the gate. Mrs Warren is
 between 40 and 50, formerly pretty, showily dressed in a brilliant
 hat and a gay blouse fitting tightly over her bust and flanked by
 fashionable sleeves. Rather spoilt and domineering, and decidedly
 vulgar, but, on the whole, a genial and fairly presentable old
 blackguard of a woman.]
 
 [Crofts is a tall powerfully-built man of about 50, fashionably dressed
 in the style of a young man. Nasal voice, reedier than might be expected
 from his strong frame. Clean-shaven bulldog jaws, large flat ears, and
 thick neck: gentlemanly combination of the most brutal types of city
 man, sporting man, and man about town.]
 
 VIVIE. Here they are. [Coming to them as they enter the garden] How do,
 mater? Mr Praed's been here this half hour, waiting for you.
 
 MRS WARREN. Well, if you've been waiting, Praddy, it's your own fault:
 I thought youd have had the gumption to know I was coming by the 3.10
 train. Vivie: put your hat on, dear: youll get sunburnt. Oh, I forgot to
 introduce you. Sir George Crofts: my little Vivie.
 
 [Crofts advances to Vivie with his most courtly manner. She nods, but
 makes no motion to shake hands.]
 
 CROFTS. May I shake hands with a young lady whom I have known by
 reputation very long as the daughter of one of my oldest friends?
 
 VIVIE [who has been looking him up and down sharply] If you like.
 
 [She takes his tenderly proferred hand and gives it a squeeze that makes
 him open his eyes; then turns away, and says to her mother] Will you
 come in, or shall I get a couple more chairs? [She goes into the porch
--**--**--
 done it, he's quite out of countenance. [Briskly] Come! sit up, George;
 and take your stick out of your mouth. [Crofts sulkily obeys].
 
 PRAED. I think, you know--if you don't mind my saying so--that we had
 better get out of the habit of thinking of her as a little girl. You see
 she has really distinguished herself; and I'm not sure, from what I have
 seen of her, that she is not older than any of us.
 
 MRS WARREN [greatly amused] Only listen to him, George! Older than any
 of us! Well she _has_ been stuffing you nicely with her importance.
 
 PRAED. But young people are particularly sensitive about being treated
 in that way.
 
 MRS WARREN. Yes; and young people have to get all that nonsense taken
 out of them, and good deal more besides. Don't you interfere, Praddy: I
 know how to treat my own child as well as you do. [Praed, with a grave
 shake of his head, walks up the garden with his hands behind his back.
 Mrs Warren pretends to laugh, but looks after him with perceptible
 concern. Then, she whispers to Crofts] Whats the matter with him? What
 does he take it like that for?
 
 CROFTS [morosely] Youre afraid of Praed.
 
 MRS WARREN. What! Me! Afraid of dear old Praddy! Why, a fly wouldn't be
 afraid of him.
 
 CROFTS. _You're_ afraid of him.
 
 MRS WARREN [angry] I'll trouble you to mind your own business, and not
 try any of your sulks on me. I'm not afraid of y o u, anyhow. If you
 can't make yourself agreeable, youd better go home. [She gets up, and,
 turning her back on him, finds herself face to face with Praed]. Come,
 Praddy, I know it was only your tender-heartedness. Youre afraid I'll
 bully her.
 
 PRAED. My dear Kitty: you think I'm offended. Don't imagine that: pray
--**--**--
 CROFTS [suspiciously] Then you know who he was?
 
 PRAED [with a touch of temper] I said no just now. Did you not hear me?
 
 CROFTS. Look here, Praed. I ask you as a particular favor. If you _do_
 know [movement of protest from Praed]--I only say, if you know,
 you might at least set my mind at rest about her. The fact is, I fell
 attracted.
 
 PRAED [sternly] What do you mean?
 
 CROFTS. Oh, don't be alarmed: it's quite an innocent feeling. Thats what
 puzzles me about it. Why, for all I know, _I_ might be her father.
 
 PRAED. You! Impossible!
 
 CROFTS [catching him up cunningly] You know for certain that I'm not?
 
 PRAED. I know nothing about it, I tell you, any more than you. But
 really, Crofts--oh no, it's out of the question. Theres not the least
 resemblance.
 
 CROFTS. As to that, theres no resemblance between her and her mother
 that I can see. I suppose she's not y o u r daughter, is she?
 
 PRAED [rising indignantly] Really, Crofts--!
 
 CROFTS. No offence, Praed. Quite allowable as between two men of the
 world.
 
 PRAED [recovering himself with an effort and speaking gently and
 gravely] Now listen to me, my dear Crofts. [He sits down again].
 
 I have nothing to do with that side of Mrs Warren's life, and never had.
 She has never spoken to me about it; and of course I have never spoken
 to her about it. Your delicacy will tell you that a handsome woman needs
 some friends who are not--well, not on that footing with her. The effect
 of her own beauty would become a torment to her if she could not escape
 from it occasionally. You are probably on much more confidential terms
 with Kitty than I am. Surely you can ask her the question yourself.
--**--**--
 cold.
 
 PRAED [calling] Yes, Mrs Warren. In a moment. I've just met a friend
 here.
 
 MRS WARREN. A what?
 
 PRAED [louder] A friend.
 
 MRS WARREN. Bring him in.
 
 PRAED. All right. [To Frank] Will you accept the invitation?
 
 FRANK [incredulous, but immensely amused] Is that Vivie's mother?
 
 PRAED. Yes.
 
 FRANK. By Jove! What a lark! Do you think she'll like me?
 
 PRAED. I've no doubt youll make yourself popular, as usual. Come in and
 try [moving towards the house].
 
 FRANK. Stop a bit. [Seriously] I want to take you into my confidence.
 
 PRAED. Pray don't. It's only some fresh folly, like the barmaid at
 Redhill.
 
 FRANK. It's ever so much more serious than that. You say you've only just
 met Vivie for the first time?
 
 PRAED. Yes.
 
 FRANK [rhapsodically] Then you can have no idea what a girl she is. Such
 character! Such sense! And her cleverness! Oh, my eye, Praed, but I can
 tell you she is clever! And--need I add?--she loves me.
 
 CROFTS [putting his head out of the window] I say, Praed: what are you
 about? Do come along. [He disappears].
 
 FRANK. Hallo! Sort of chap that would take a prize at a dog show, ain't
 he? Who's he?
 
 PRAED. Sir George Crofts, an old friend of Mrs Warren's. I think we had
 better come in.
 
 [On their way to the porch they are interrupted by a call from the gate.
 Turning, they see an elderly clergyman looking over it.]
 
 THE CLERGYMAN [calling] Frank!
 
 FRANK. Hallo! [To Praed] The Roman father. [To the clergyman] Yes,
 gov'nor: all right: presently. [To Praed] Look here, Praed: youd better
 go in to tea. I'll join you directly.
 
 PRAED. Very good. [He goes into the cottage].
 
 [The clergyman remains outside the gate, with his hands on the top of
 it. The Rev. Samuel Gardner, a beneficed clergyman of the Established
--**--**--
 REV. S. Brains are not everything.
 
 FRANK. No, of course not: theres the money--
 
 REV. S. [interrupting him austerely] I was not thinking of money, sir. I
 was speaking of higher things. Social position, for instance.
 
 FRANK. I don't care a rap about that.
 
 REV. S. But I do, sir.
 
 FRANK. Well, nobody wants y o u to marry her. Anyhow, she has what
 amounts to a high Cambridge degree; and she seems to have as much money
 as she wants.
 
 REV. S. [sinking into a feeble vein of humor] I greatly doubt whether
 she has as much money as y o u will want.
 
 FRANK. Oh, come: I havn't been so very extravagant. I live ever so
 quietly; I don't drink; I don't bet much; and I never go regularly to the
 razzle-dazzle as you did when you were my age.
 
 REV. S. [booming hollowly] Silence, sir.
 
 FRANK. Well, you told me yourself, when I was making every such an ass
 of myself about the barmaid at Redhill, that you once offered a woman
 fifty pounds for the letters you wrote to her when--
 
 REV. S. [terrified] Sh-sh-sh, Frank, for Heaven's sake! [He looks round
 apprehensively Seeing no one within earshot he plucks up courage to boom
 again, but more subduedly]. You are taking an ungentlemanly advantage of
 what I confided to you for your own good, to save you from an error you
 would have repented all your life long. Take warning by your father's
 follies, sir; and don't make them an excuse for your own.
 
 FRANK. Did you ever hear the story of the Duke of Wellington and his
 letters?
 
 REV. S. No, sir; and I don't want to hear it.
 
 FRANK. The old Iron Duke didn't throw away fifty pounds: not he. He
 just wrote: "Dear Jenny: publish and be damned! Yours affectionately,
--**--**--
 
 MRS WARREN [correcting him quickly in a loud whisper] Tch! Nonsense! Mrs
 Warren: don't you see my daughter there?
 
 
 
 
 ACT II
 
 
 [Inside the cottage after nightfall. Looking eastward from within
 instead of westward from without, the latticed window, with its curtains
 drawn, is now seen in the middle of the front wall of the cottage, with
 the porch door to the left of it. In the left-hand side wall is the door
 leading to the kitchen. Farther back against the same wall is a dresser
 with a candle and matches on it, and Frank's rifle standing beside them,
 with the barrel resting in the plate-rack. In the centre a table stands
 with a lighted lamp on it. Vivie's books and writing materials are on a
 table to the right of the window, against the wall. The fireplace is on
 the right, with a settle: there is no fire. Two of the chairs are set
 right and left of the table.]
 
 [The cottage door opens, shewing a fine starlit night without; and Mrs
 Warren, her shoulders wrapped in a shawl borrowed from Vivie, enters,
 followed by Frank, who throws his cap on the window seat. She has had
 enough of walking, and gives a gasp of relief as she unpins her hat;
 takes it off; sticks the pin through the crown; and puts it on the
 table.]
 
 MRS WARREN. O Lord! I don't know which is the worst of the country, the
 walking or the sitting at home with nothing to do. I could do with a
 whisky and soda now very well, if only they had such a things in this
 place.
 
 FRANK. Perhaps Vivie's got some.
 
 MRS WARREN. Nonsense! What would a young girl like her be doing with
 such things! Never mind: it don't matter. I wonder how she passes her
--**--**--
 upturned face of a moment, tempted. At last she kisses him, and
 immediately turns away, out of patience with herself.]
 
 MRS WARREN. There! I shouldn't have done that. I _am_ wicked. Never you
 mind, my dear: it's only a motherly kiss. Go and make love to Vivie.
 
 FRANK. So I have.
 
 MRS WARREN [turning on him with a sharp note of alarm in her voice]
 What!
 
 FRANK. Vivie and I are ever such chums.
 
 MRS WARREN. What do you mean? Now see here: I won't have any young scamp
 tampering with my little girl. Do you hear? I won't have it.
 
 FRANK [quite unabashed] My dear Mrs Warren: don't you be alarmed. My
 intentions are honorable: ever so honorable; and your little girl is
 jolly well able to take care of herself. She don't need looking after
 half so much as her mother. She ain't so handsome, you know.
 
 MRS WARREN [taken aback by his assurance] Well, you have got a nice
 healthy two inches of cheek all over you. I don't know where you got it.
 Not from your father, anyhow.
 
 CROFTS [in the garden] The gipsies, I suppose?
 
 REV. S. [replying] The broomsquires are far worse.
 
 MRS WARREN [to Frank] S-sh! Remember! you've had your warning.
 
 [Crofts and the Reverend Samuel Gardner come in from the garden, the
 clergyman continuing his conversation as he enters.]
 
 REV. S. The perjury at the Winchester assizes is deplorable.
 
 MRS WARREN. Well? what became of you two? And wheres Praddy and Vivie?
 
 CROFTS [putting his hat on the settle and his stick in the chimney
 corner] They went up the hill. We went to the village. I wanted a drink.
 [He sits down on the settle, putting his legs up along the seat].
 
 MRS WARREN. Well, she oughtn't to go off like that without telling me.
--**--**--
 
 MRS WARREN [nettled] Why not? Isn't my daughter good enough for your son?
 
 REV. S. But surely, my dear Mrs Warren, you know the reasons--
 
 MRS WARREN [defiantly] I know no reasons. If you know any, you can tell
 them to the lad, or to the girl, or to your congregation, if you like.
 
 REV. S. [collapsing helplessly into his chair] You know very well that I
 couldn't tell anyone the reasons. But my boy will believe me when I tell
 him there a r e reasons.
 
 FRANK. Quite right, Dad: he will. But has your boy's conduct ever been
 influenced by your reasons?
 
 CROFTS. You can't marry her; and thats all about it. [He gets up
 and stands on the hearth, with his back to the fireplace, frowning
 determinedly].
 
 MRS WARREN [turning on him sharply] What have you got to do with it,
 pray?
 
 FRANK [with his prettiest lyrical cadence] Precisely what I was going to
 ask, myself, in my own graceful fashion.
 
 CROFTS [to Mrs Warren] I suppose you don't want to marry the girl to a
 man younger than herself and without either a profession or twopence to
 keep her on. Ask Sam, if you don't believe me. [To the parson] How much
 more money are you going to give him?
 
 REV. S. Not another penny. He has had his patrimony; and he spent the
 last of it in July. [Mrs Warren's face falls].
 
 CROFTS [watching her] There! I told you. [He resumes his place on
 the settle and puts his legs on the seat again, as if the matter were
 finally disposed of].
 
 FRANK [plaintively] This is ever so mercenary. Do you suppose Miss
 Warren's going to marry for money? If we love one another--
 
 MRS WARREN. Thank you. Your love's a pretty cheap commodity, my lad.
--**--**--
 come in. He breaks off. Praed puts his hat on the dresser. There is an
 immediate improvement in the company's behavior. Crofts takes down his
 legs from the settle and pulls himself together as Praed joins him at
 the fireplace. Mrs Warren loses her ease of manner and takes refuge in
 querulousness.]
 
 MRS WARREN. Wherever have you been, Vivie?
 
 VIVIE [taking off her hat and throwing it carelessly on the table] On
 the hill.
 
 MRS WARREN. Well, you shouldn't go off like that without letting me know.
 How could I tell what had become of you? And night coming on too!
 
 VIVIE [going to the door of the kitchen and opening it, ignoring her
 mother] Now, about supper? [All rise except Mrs Warren] We shall be
 rather crowded in here, I'm afraid.
 
 MRS WARREN. Did you hear what I said, Vivie?
 
 VIVIE [quietly] Yes, mother. [Reverting to the supper difficulty] How
 many are we? [Counting] One, two, three, four, five, six. Well, two will
 have to wait until the rest are done: Mrs Alison has only plates and
 knives for four.
 
 PRAED. Oh, it doesn't matter about me. I--
 
 VIVIE. You have had a long walk and are hungry, Mr Praed: you shall have
 your supper at once. I can wait myself. I want one person to wait with
 me. Frank: are you hungry?
 
 FRANK. Not the least in the world. Completely off my peck, in fact.
 
 MRS WARREN [to Crofts] Neither are you, George. You can wait.
 
 CROFTS. Oh, hang it, I've eaten nothing since tea-time. Can't Sam do it?
 
 FRANK. Would you starve my poor father?
 
 REV. S. [testily] Allow me to speak for myself, sir. I am perfectly
 willing to wait.
 
 VIVIE [decisively] There's no need. Only two are wanted. [She opens
 the door of the kitchen]. Will you take my mother in, Mr Gardner. [The
--**--**--
 
 FRANK. Oh no, you wouldn't. Why should they take any grind when they can
 afford not to? I wish I had their luck. No: what I object to is their
 form. It isn't the thing: it's slovenly, ever so slovenly.
 
 VIVIE. Do you think your form will be any better when youre as old as
 Crofts, if you don't work?
 
 FRANK. Of course I do. Ever so much better. Vivvums mustn't lecture: her
 little boy's incorrigible. [He attempts to take her face caressingly in
 his hands].
 
 VIVIE [striking his hands down sharply] Off with you: Vivvums is not in
 a humor for petting her little boy this evening. [She rises and comes
 forward to the other side of the room].
 
 FRANK [following her] How unkind!
 
 VIVIE [stamping at him] Be serious. I'm serious.
 
 FRANK. Good. Let us talk learnedly, Miss Warren: do you know that all
 the most advanced thinkers are agreed that half the diseases of modern
 civilization are due to starvation of the affections of the young. Now,
 _I_--
 
 VIVIE [cutting him short] You are very tiresome. [She opens the inner
 door] Have you room for Frank there? He's complaining of starvation.
 
 MRS WARREN [within] Of course there is [clatter of knives and glasses
 as she moves the things on the table]. Here! theres room now beside me.
 Come along, Mr Frank.
 
 FRANK. Her little boy will be ever so even with his Vivvums for this.
 [He passes into the kitchen].
 
 MRS WARREN [within] Here, Vivie: come on you too, child. You must be
 famished. [She enters, followed by Crofts, who holds the door open with
 marked deference. She goes out without looking at him; and he shuts the
 door after her]. Why George, you can't be done: you've eaten nothing. Is
 there anything wrong with you?
--**--**--
 
 MRS WARREN. So it's come to that with you, George, like all the other
 worn-out old creatures!
 
 CROFTS [savagely] Damn you!
 
 [Before she can retort the door of the kitchen is opened; and the
 voices of the others are heard returning. Crofts, unable to recover his
 presence of mind, hurries out of the cottage. The clergyman appears at
 the kitchen door.]
 
 REV. S. [looking round] Where is Sir George?
 
 MRS WARREN. Gone out to have a pipe. [The clergyman takes his hat from
 the table, and joins Mrs Warren at the fireside. Meanwhile, Vivie comes
 in, followed by Frank, who collapses into the nearest chair with an air
 of extreme exhaustion. Mrs Warren looks round at Vivie and says, with
 her affectation of maternal patronage even more forced than usual] Well,
 dearie: have you had a good supper?
 
 VIVIE. You know what Mrs Alison's suppers are. [She turns to Frank and
 pets him] Poor Frank! was all the beef gone? did it get nothing but
 bread and cheese and ginger beer? [Seriously, as if she had done quite
 enough trifling for one evening] Her butter is really awful. I must get
 some down from the stores.
 
 FRANK. Do, in Heaven's name!
 
 [Vivie goes to the writing-table and makes a memorandum to order the
 butter. Praed comes in from the kitchen, putting up his handkerchief,
 which he has been using as a napkin.]
 
 REV. S. Frank, my boy: it is time for us to be thinking of home.
 
 Your mother does not know yet that we have visitors.
 
 PRAED. I'm afraid we're giving trouble.
 
 FRANK [rising] Not the least in the world: my mother will be delighted
 to see you. She's a genuinely intellectual artistic woman; and she sees
 nobody here from one year's end to another except the gov'nor; so you
--**--**--
 
 VIVIE. Do you think my way of life would suit you? I doubt it.
 
 MRS WARREN. Y o u r way of life! What do you mean?
 
 VIVIE [cutting a page of her book with the paper knife on her
 chatelaine] Has it really never occurred to you, mother, that I have a
 way of life like other people?
 
 MRS WARREN. What nonsense is this youre trying to talk? Do you want to
 shew your independence, now that youre a great little person at school?
 Don't be a fool, child.
 
 VIVIE [indulgently] Thats all you have to say on the subject, is it,
 mother?
 
 MRS WARREN [puzzled, then angry] Don't you keep on asking me questions
 like that. [Violently] Hold your tongue. [Vivie works on, losing no
 time, and saying nothing]. You and your way of life, indeed! What next?
 [She looks at Vivie again. No reply].
 
 Your way of life will be what I please, so it will. [Another pause].
 Ive been noticing these airs in you ever since you got that tripos or
 whatever you call it. If you think I'm going to put up with them, youre
 mistaken; and the sooner you find it out, the better. [Muttering] All I
 have to say on the subject, indeed! [Again raising her voice angrily] Do
 you know who youre speaking to, Miss?
 
 VIVIE [looking across at her without raising her head from her book] No.
 Who are you? What are you?
 
 MRS WARREN [rising breathless] You young imp!
 
 VIVIE. Everybody knows my reputation, my social standing, and the
 profession I intend to pursue. I know nothing about you. What is that
 way of life which you invite me to share with you and Sir George Crofts,
 pray?
 
 MRS WARREN. Take care. I shall do something I'll be sorry for after, and
--**--**--
 VIVIE [determinedly] Oh yes you can, if you like. I have a right to
 know; and you know very well that I have that right. You can refuse
 to tell me if you please; but if you do, you will see the last of me
 tomorrow morning.
 
 MRS WARREN. Oh, it's too horrible to hear you talk like that. You
 wouldn't--you _couldn't_ leave me.
 
 VIVIE [ruthlessly] Yes, without a moment's hesitation, if you trifle
 with me about this. [Shivering with disgust] How can I feel sure that I
 may not have the contaminated blood of that brutal waster in my veins?
 
 MRS WARREN. No, no. On my oath it's not he, nor any of the rest that you
 have ever met. I'm certain of that, at least.
 
 [Vivie's eyes fasten sternly on her mother as the significance of this
 flashes on her.]
 
 VIVIE [slowly] You are certain of that, at _least_. Ah! You mean that
 that is all you are certain of. [Thoughtfully] I see. [Mrs Warren buries
 her face in her hands]. Don't do that, mother: you know you don't feel
 it a bit. [Mrs Warren takes down her hands and looks up deplorably
 at Vivie, who takes out her watch and says] Well, that is enough for
 tonight. At what hour would you like breakfast? Is half-past eight too
 early for you?
 
 MRS WARREN [wildly] My God, what sort of woman are you?
 
 VIVIE [coolly] The sort the world is mostly made of, I should hope.
 Otherwise I don't understand how it gets its business done.
 
 Come [taking her mother by the wrist and pulling her up pretty
 resolutely]: pull yourself together. Thats right.
 
 MRS WARREN [querulously] Youre very rough with me, Vivie.
 
 VIVIE. Nonsense. What about bed? It's past ten.
 
 MRS WARREN [passionately] Whats the use of my going to bed? Do you think
--**--**--
 
 MRS WARREN. Oh, it's easy to talk, isn't it? Here! would you like to know
 what _my_ circumstances were?
 
 VIVIE. Yes: you had better tell me. Won't you sit down?
 
 MRS WARREN. Oh, I'll sit down: don't you be afraid. [She plants her chair
 farther forward with brazen energy, and sits down. Vivie is impressed in
 spite of herself]. D'you know what your gran'mother was?
 
 VIVIE. No.
 
 MRS WARREN. No, you don't. I do. She called herself a widow and had a
 fried-fish shop down by the Mint, and kept herself and four daughters
 out of it. Two of us were sisters: that was me and Liz; and we were both
 good-looking and well made. I suppose our father was a well-fed man:
 mother pretended he was a gentleman; but I don't know. The other two
 were only half sisters: undersized, ugly, starved looking, hard working,
 honest poor creatures: Liz and I would have half-murdered them if
 mother hadn't half-murdered us to keep our hands off them. They were the
 respectable ones. Well, what did they get by their respectability? I'll
 tell you. One of them worked in a whitelead factory twelve hours a day
 for nine shillings a week until she died of lead poisoning. She only
 expected to get her hands a little paralyzed; but she died. The other
 was always held up to us as a model because she married a Government
 laborer in the Deptford victualling yard, and kept his room and the
 three children neat and tidy on eighteen shillings a week--until he took
 to drink. That was worth being respectable for, wasn't it?
 
 VIVIE [now thoughtfully attentive] Did you and your sister think so?
 
 MRS WARREN. Liz didn't, I can tell you: she had more spirit. We both went
 to a church school--that was part of the ladylike airs we gave ourselves
--**--**--
 
 VIVIE. You were certainly quite justified--from the business point of
 view.
 
 MRS WARREN. Yes; or any other point of view. What is any respectable
 girl brought up to do but to catch some rich man's fancy and get the
 benefit of his money by marrying him?--as if a marriage ceremony
 could make any difference in the right or wrong of the thing! Oh, the
 hypocrisy of the world makes me sick! Liz and I had to work and save and
 calculate just like other people; elseways we should be as poor as any
 good-for-nothing drunken waster of a woman that thinks her luck will
 last for ever. [With great energy] I despise such people: theyve
 no character; and if theres a thing I hate in a woman, it's want of
 character.
 
 VIVIE. Come now, mother: frankly! Isn't it part of what you call
 character in a woman that she should greatly dislike such a way of
 making money?
 
 MRS WARREN. Why, of course. Everybody dislikes having to work and make
 money; but they have to do it all the same. I'm sure I've often pitied
 a poor girl, tired out and in low spirits, having to try to please some
 man that she doesn't care two straws for--some half-drunken fool that
 thinks he's making himself agreeable when he's teasing and worrying and
 disgusting a woman so that hardly any money could pay her for putting up
 with it. But she has to bear with disagreeables and take the rough with
 the smooth, just like a nurse in a hospital or anyone else. It's not
 work that any woman would do for pleasure, goodness knows; though to
 hear the pious people talk you would suppose it was a bed of roses.
 
 VIVIE. Still, you consider it worth while. It pays.
--**--**--
 tell you straight and she'll tell you crooked. Thats all the difference.
 
 VIVIE [fascinated, gazing at her] My dear mother: you are a wonderful
 woman: you are stronger than all England. And are you really and truly
 not one wee bit doubtful--or--or--ashamed?
 
 MRS WARREN. Well, of course, dearie, it's only good manners to be
 ashamed of it: it's expected from a woman. Women have to pretend to
 feel a great deal that they don't feel. Liz used to be angry with me for
 plumping out the truth about it. She used to say that when every woman
 could learn enough from what was going on in the world before her eyes,
 there was no need to talk about it to her. But then Liz was such a
 perfect lady! She had the true instinct of it; while I was always a bit
 of a vulgarian. I used to be so pleased when you sent me your photos
 to see that you were growing up like Liz: you've just her ladylike,
 determined way. But I can't stand saying one thing when everyone knows
 I mean another. Whats the use in such hypocrisy? If people arrange the
 world that way for women, theres no good pretending it's arranged the
 other way. No: I never was a bit ashamed really. I consider I had a
 right to be proud of how we managed everything so respectably, and never
 had a word against us, and how the girls were so well taken care of.
 Some of them did very well: one of them married an ambassador. But of
 course now I daren't talk about such things: whatever would they think
 of us! [She yawns]. Oh dear! I do believe I'm getting sleepy after all.
 [She stretches herself lazily, thoroughly relieved by her explosion, and
--**--**--
 where it ends in a little gravelled circus opposite the Rectory porch.
 Beyond the gate is seen the dusty high road, parallel with the wall,
 bounded on the farther side by a strip of turf and an unfenced pine
 wood. On the lawn, between the house and the drive, is a clipped yew
 tree, with a garden bench in its shade. On the opposite side the garden
 is shut in by a box hedge; and there is a little sundial on the turf,
 with an iron chair near it. A little path leads through the box hedge,
 behind the sundial.]
 
 [Frank, seated on the chair near the sundial, on which he has placed the
 morning paper, is reading The Standard. His father comes from the house,
 red-eyed and shivery, and meets Frank's eye with misgiving.]
 
 FRANK [looking at his watch] Half-past eleven. Nice hour for a rector to
 come down to breakfast!
 
 REV. S. Don't mock, Frank: don't mock. I am a little--er--[Shivering]--
 
 FRANK. Off color?
 
 REV. S. [repudiating the expression] No, sir: _unwell_ this morning.
 Where's your mother?
 
 FRANK. Don't be alarmed: she's not here. Gone to town by the 11.13
 with Bessie. She left several messages for you. Do you feel equal to
 receiving them now, or shall I wait til you've breakfasted?
 
 REV. S. I h a v e breakfasted, sir. I am surprised at your mother
 going to town when we have people staying with us. They'll think it very
 strange.
 
 FRANK. Possibly she has considered that. At all events, if Crofts is
 going to stay here, and you are going to sit up every night with him
 until four, recalling the incidents of your fiery youth, it is clearly
 my mother's duty, as a prudent housekeeper, to go up to the stores and
 order a barrel of whisky and a few hundred siphons.
--**--**--
 
 PRAED. Certainly not. Don't stand on the slightest ceremony with me.
 
 REV. S. Thank you. I'll--er--er--[He stammers his way to the porch and
 vanishes into the house].
 
 PRAED. Curious thing it must be writing a sermon every week.
 
 FRANK. Ever so curious, if he did it. He buys em. He's gone for some
 soda water.
 
 PRAED. My dear boy: I wish you would be more respectful to your father.
 You know you can be so nice when you like.
 
 FRANK. My dear Praddy: you forget that I have to live with the governor.
 When two people live together--it don't matter whether theyre father and
 son or husband and wife or brother and sister--they can't keep up the
 polite humbug thats so easy for ten minutes on an afternoon call.
 Now the governor, who unites to many admirable domestic qualities the
 irresoluteness of a sheep and the pompousness and aggressiveness of a
 jackass--
 
 PRAED. No, pray, pray, my dear Frank, remember! He is your father.
 
 FRANK. I give him due credit for that. [Rising and flinging down his
 paper] But just imagine his telling Crofts to bring the Warrens over
 here! He must have been ever so drunk. You know, my dear Praddy, my
 mother wouldn't stand Mrs Warren for a moment. Vivie mustn't come here
 until she's gone back to town.
 
 PRAED. But your mother doesn't know anything about Mrs Warren, does she?
 [He picks up the paper and sits down to read it].
 
 FRANK. I don't know. Her journey to town looks as if she did. Not that
 my mother would mind in the ordinary way: she has stuck like a brick to
 lots of women who had got into trouble. But they were all nice women.
 Thats what makes the real difference. Mrs Warren, no doubt, has her
--**--**--
 PRAED. Hush, pray. Theyre coming.
 
 [The clergyman and Crofts are seen coming along the road, followed by
 Mrs Warren and Vivie walking affectionately together.]
 
 FRANK. Look: she actually has her arm round the old woman's waist. It's
 her right arm: she began it. She's gone sentimental, by God! Ugh! ugh!
 Now do you feel the creeps? [The clergyman opens the gate: and Mrs
 Warren and Vivie pass him and stand in the middle of the garden looking
 at the house. Frank, in an ecstasy of dissimulation, turns gaily to Mrs
 Warren, exclaiming] Ever so delighted to see you, Mrs Warren. This quiet
 old rectory garden becomes you perfectly.
 
 MRS WARREN. Well, I never! Did you hear that, George? He says I look
 well in a quiet old rectory garden.
 
 REV. S. [still holding the gate for Crofts, who loafs through it,
 heavily bored] You look well everywhere, Mrs Warren.
 
 FRANK. Bravo, gov'nor! Now look here: lets have a treat before lunch.
 First lets see the church. Everyone has to do that. It's a regular old
 thirteenth century church, you know: the gov'nor's ever so fond of it,
 because he got up a restoration fund and had it completely rebuilt six
 years ago. Praed will be able to shew its points.
 
 PRAED [rising] Certainly, if the restoration has left any to shew.
 
 REV. S. [mooning hospitably at them] I shall be pleased, I'm sure, if
 Sir George and Mrs Warren really care about it.
 
 MRS WARREN. Oh, come along and get it over.
 
 CROFTS [turning back toward the gate] I've no objection.
 
 REV. S. Not that way. We go through the fields, if you don't mind. Round
 here. [He leads the way by the little path through the box hedge].
 
 CROFTS. Oh, all right. [He goes with the parson].
 
 [Praed follows with Mrs Warren. Vivie does not stir: she watches them
--**--**--
 VIVIE [very angry] Why not?
 
 FRANK. Because she's an old wretch, Viv. If you ever put your arm around
 her waist in my presence again, I'll shoot myself there and then as a
 protest against an exhibition which revolts me.
 
 VIVIE. Must I choose between dropping your acquaintance and dropping my
 mother's?
 
 FRANK [gracefully] That would put the old lady at ever such a
 disadvantage. No, Viv: your infatuated little boy will have to stick to
 you in any case. But he's all the more anxious that you shouldn't make
 mistakes. It's no use, Viv: your mother's impossible. She may be a good
 sort; but she's a bad lot, a very bad lot.
 
 VIVIE [hotly] Frank--! [He stands his ground. She turns away and
 sits down on the bench under the yew tree, struggling to recover her
 self-command. Then she says] Is she to be deserted by the world because
 she's what you call a bad lot? Has she no right to live?
 
 FRANK. No fear of that, Viv: _she_ won't ever be deserted. [He sits on
 the bench beside her].
 
 VIVIE. But I am to desert her, I suppose.
 
 FRANK [babyishly, lulling her and making love to her with his voice]
 Mustn't go live with her. Little family group of mother and daughter
 wouldn't be a success. Spoil o u r little group.
 
 VIVIE [falling under the spell] What little group?
 
 FRANK. The babes in the wood: Vivie and little Frank. [He nestles
 against her like a weary child]. Lets go and get covered up with leaves.
 
 VIVIE [rhythmically, rocking him like a nurse] Fast asleep, hand in
 hand, under the trees.
 
 FRANK. The wise little girl with her silly little boy.
 
 VIVIE. The dear little boy with his dowdy little girl.
 
 FRANK. Ever so peaceful, and relieved from the imbecility of the little
--**--**--
 I am.
 
 VIVIE. It does you great credit, I'm sure.
 
 CROFTS. Oh, I don't mean to praise myself. I have my faults, Heaven
 knows: no man is more sensible of that than I am. I know I'm not
 perfect: thats one of the advantages of being a middle-aged man; for
 I'm not a young man, and I know it. But my code is a simple one, and, I
 think, a good one. Honor between man and man; fidelity between man and
 woman; and no can't about this religion or that religion, but an honest
 belief that things are making for good on the whole.
 
 VIVIE [with biting irony] "A power, not ourselves, that makes for
 righteousness," eh?
 
 CROFTS [taking her seriously] Oh certainly. Not ourselves, of course. Y
 o u understand what I mean. Well, now as to practical matters. You may
 have an idea that I've flung my money about; but I havn't: I'm richer
 today than when I first came into the property. I've used my knowledge of
 the world to invest my money in ways that other men have overlooked; and
 whatever else I may be, I'm a safe man from the money point of view.
 
 VIVIE. It's very kind of you to tell me all this.
 
 CROFTS. Oh well, come, Miss Vivie: you needn't pretend you don't see what
 I'm driving at. I want to settle down with a Lady Crofts. I suppose you
 think me very blunt, eh?
 
 VIVIE. Not at all: I am very much obliged to you for being so definite
 and business-like. I quite appreciate the offer: the money, the
 position, _Lady Crofts_, and so on. But I think I will say no, if you
 don't mind, I'd rather not. [She rises, and strolls across to the
 sundial to get out of his immediate neighborhood].
--**--**--
 will be if you think better of my offer. Not that theres any mystery
 about it: don't think that. Of course you know by your mother's being
 in it that it's perfectly straight and honest. I've known her for many
 years; and I can say of her that she'd cut off her hands sooner than
 touch anything that was not what it ought to be. I'll tell you all about
 it if you like. I don't know whether you've found in travelling how hard
 it is to find a really comfortable private hotel.
 
 VIVIE [sickened, averting her face] Yes: go on.
 
 CROFTS. Well, thats all it is. Your mother has got a genius for managing
 such things. We've got two in Brussels, one in Ostend, one in Vienna,
 and two in Budapest. Of course there are others besides ourselves in
 it; but we hold most of the capital; and your mother's indispensable
 as managing director. You've noticed, I daresay, that she travels a good
 deal. But you see you can't mention such things in society. Once let out
 the word hotel and everybody thinks you keep a public-house. You wouldn't
 like people to say that of your mother, would you? Thats why we're so
 reserved about it. By the way, youll keep it to yourself, won't you?
 Since it's been a secret so long, it had better remain so.
 
 VIVIE. And this is the business you invite me to join you in?
 
 CROFTS. Oh no. My wife shan't be troubled with business. Youll not be in
 it more than you've always been.
 
 VIVIE. _I_ always been! What do you mean?
 
 CROFTS. Only that you've always lived on it. It paid for your education
 and the dress you have on your back. Don't turn up your nose at business,
 Miss Vivie: where would your Newnhams and Girtons be without it?
--**--**--
 Why the devil shouldn't I invest my money that way? I take the interest
 on my capital like other people: I hope you don't think I dirty my own
 hands with the work.
 
 Come! you wouldn't refuse the acquaintance of my mother's cousin the Duke
 of Belgravia because some of the rents he gets are earned in queer ways.
 You wouldn't cut the Archbishop of Canterbury, I suppose, because the
 Ecclesiastical Commissioners have a few publicans and sinners among
 their tenants. Do you remember your Crofts scholarship at Newnham? Well,
 that was founded by my brother the M.P. He gets his 22 per cent out of
 a factory with 600 girls in it, and not one of them getting wages enough
 to live on. How d'ye suppose they manage when they have no family to
 fall back on? Ask your mother. And do you expect me to turn my back on
 35 per cent when all the rest are pocketing what they can, like sensible
 men? No such fool! If youre going to pick and choose your acquaintances
 on moral principles, youd better clear out of this country, unless you
 want to cut yourself out of all decent society.
 
 VIVIE [conscience stricken] You might go on to point out that I myself
 never asked where the money I spent came from. I believe I am just as
 bad as you.
 
 CROFTS [greatly reassured] Of course you are; and a very good thing too!
 What harm does it do after all? [Rallying her jocularly] So you don't
 think me such a scoundrel now you come to think it over. Eh?
 
 VIVIE. I have shared profits with you: and I admitted you just now to
 the familiarity of knowing what I think of you.
 
 CROFTS [with serious friendliness] To be sure you did. You won't find
--**--**--
 I operate?
 
 VIVIE. Frank: have you been listening?
 
 FRANK [coming down into the garden] Only for the bell, I assure you; so
 that you shouldn't have to wait. I think I shewed great insight into your
 character, Crofts.
 
 CROFTS. For two pins I'd take that gun from you and break it across your
 head.
 
 FRANK [stalking him cautiously] Pray don't. I'm ever so careless in
 handling firearms. Sure to be a fatal accident, with a reprimand from
 the coroner's jury for my negligence.
 
 VIVIE. Put the rifle away, Frank: it's quite unnecessary.
 
 FRANK. Quite right, Viv. Much more sportsmanlike to catch him in a
 trap. [Crofts, understanding the insult, makes a threatening movement].
 Crofts: there are fifteen cartridges in the magazine here; and I am a
 dead shot at the present distance and at an object of your size.
 
 CROFTS. Oh, you needn't be afraid. I'm not going to touch you.
 
 FRANK. Ever so magnanimous of you under the circumstances! Thank you.
 
 CROFTS. I'll just tell you this before I go. It may interest you, since
 youre so fond of one another. Allow me, Mister Frank, to introduce you
 to your half-sister, the eldest daughter of the Reverend Samuel Gardner.
 Miss Vivie: you half-brother. Good morning! [He goes out through the
 gate and along the road].
 
 FRANK [after a pause of stupefaction, raising the rifle] Youll testify
 before the coroner that it's an accident, Viv. [He takes aim at the
 retreating figure of Crofts. Vivie seizes the muzzle and pulls it round
 against her breast].
 
 VIVIE. Fire now. You may.
 
 FRANK [dropping his end of the rifle hastily] Stop! take care. [She lets
 it go. It falls on the turf]. Oh, you've given your little boy such
 a turn. Suppose it had gone off! ugh! [He sinks on the garden seat,
--**--**--
 
 [Honoria Fraser's chambers in Chancery Lane. An office at the top of New
 Stone Buildings, with a plate-glass window, distempered walls, electric
 light, and a patent stove. Saturday afternoon. The chimneys of Lincoln's
 Inn and the western sky beyond are seen through the window. There is a
 double writing table in the middle of the room, with a cigar box, ash
 pans, and a portable electric reading lamp almost snowed up in heaps of
 papers and books. This table has knee holes and chairs right and left
 and is very untidy. The clerk's desk, closed and tidy, with its high
 stool, is against the wall, near a door communicating with the inner
 rooms. In the opposite wall is the door leading to the public corridor.
 Its upper panel is of opaque glass, lettered in black on the outside,
 FRASER AND WARREN. A baize screen hides the corner between this door and
 the window.]
 
 [Frank, in a fashionable light-colored coaching suit, with his stick,
 gloves, and white hat in his hands, is pacing up and down in the office.
 Somebody tries the door with a key.]
 
 FRANK [calling] Come in. It's not locked.
 
 [Vivie comes in, in her hat and jacket. She stops and stares at him.]
 
 VIVIE [sternly] What are you doing here?
 
 FRANK. Waiting to see you. I've been here for hours. Is this the way you
 attend to your business? [He puts his hat and stick on the table, and
 perches himself with a vault on the clerk's stool, looking at her with
 every appearance of being in a specially restless, teasing, flippant
 mood].
 
 VIVIE. I've been away exactly twenty minutes for a cup of tea. [She takes
 off her hat and jacket and hangs them behind the screen]. How did you
 get in?
 
 FRANK. The staff had not left when I arrived. He's gone to play cricket
--**--**--
 
 FRANK. Well, I want to know what you've done--what arrangements you've
 made.
 
 VIVIE. Everything was settled twenty minutes after I arrived here.
 Honoria has found the business too much for her this year; and she was
 on the point of sending for me and proposing a partnership when I walked
 in and told her I hadn't a farthing in the world. So I installed myself
 and packed her off for a fortnight's holiday. What happened at Haslemere
 when I left?
 
 FRANK. Nothing at all. I said youd gone to town on particular business.
 
 VIVIE. Well?
 
 FRANK. Well, either they were too flabbergasted to say anything, or else
 Crofts had prepared your mother. Anyhow, she didn't say anything; and
 Crofts didn't say anything; and Praddy only stared. After tea they got up
 and went; and I've not seen them since.
 
 VIVIE [nodding placidly with one eye on a wreath of smoke] Thats all
 right.
 
 FRANK [looking round disparagingly] Do you intend to stick in this
 confounded place?
 
 VIVIE [blowing the wreath decisively away, and sitting straight up] Yes.
 These two days have given me back all my strength and self-possession. I
 will never take a holiday again as long as I live.
 
 FRANK [with a very wry face] Mps! You look quite happy. And as hard as
 nails.
 
 VIVIE [grimly] Well for me that I am!
 
 FRANK [rising] Look here, Viv: we must have an explanation. We parted
 the other day under a complete misunderstanding. [He sits on the table,
 close to her].
 
 VIVIE [putting away the cigaret] Well: clear it up.
 
 FRANK. You remember what Crofts said.
 
 VIVIE. Yes.
 
 FRANK. That revelation was supposed to bring about a complete change in
 the nature of our feeling for one another. It placed us on the footing
 of brother and sister.
--**--**--
 FRANK [staring] But this is ever so surprising! [He goes back to his
 chair]. I thought our whole relations were altered in your imagination
 and conscience, as you put it, the moment those words were out of that
 brute's muzzle.
 
 VIVIE. No: it was not that. I didn't believe him. I only wish I could.
 
 FRANK. Eh?
 
 VIVIE. I think brother and sister would be a very suitable relation for
 us.
 
 FRANK. You really mean that?
 
 VIVIE. Yes. It's the only relation I care for, even if we could afford
 any other. I mean that.
 
 FRANK [raising his eyebrows like one on whom a new light has dawned, and
 rising with quite an effusion of chivalrous sentiment] My dear Viv:
 why didn't you say so before? I am ever so sorry for persecuting you. I
 understand, of course.
 
 VIVIE [puzzled] Understand what?
 
 FRANK. Oh, I'm not a fool in the ordinary sense: only in the Scriptural
 sense of doing all the things the wise man declared to be folly, after
 trying them himself on the most extensive scale. I see I am no longer
 Vivvums's little boy. Don't be alarmed: I shall never call you Vivvums
 again--at least unless you get tired of your new little boy, whoever he
 may be.
 
 VIVIE. My new little boy!
 
 FRANK [with conviction] Must be a new little boy. Always happens that
 way. No other way, in fact.
 
 VIVIE. None that you know of, fortunately for you.
 
 [Someone knocks at the door.]
 
 FRANK. My curse upon yon caller, whoe'er he be!
 
 VIVIE. It's Praed. He's going to Italy and wants to say goodbye. I asked
 him to call this afternoon. Go and let him in.
 
 FRANK. We can continue our conversation after his departure for Italy.
 I'll stay him out. [He goes to the door and opens it]. How are you,
--**--**--
 PRAED [puzzled] Of course it's very different from Verona. I don't
 suggest for a moment that--
 
 VIVIE [bitterly] Probably the beauty and romance come to much the same
 in both places.
 
 PRAED [completely sobered and much concerned] My dear Miss Warren:
 I--[looking enquiringly at Frank] Is anything the matter?
 
 FRANK. She thinks your enthusiasm frivolous, Praddy. She's had ever such
 a serious call.
 
 VIVIE [sharply] Hold your tongue, Frank. Don't be silly.
 
 FRANK [sitting down] Do you call this good manners, Praed?
 
 PRAED [anxious and considerate] Shall I take him away, Miss Warren? I
 feel sure we have disturbed you at your work.
 
 VIVIE. Sit down: I'm not ready to go back to work yet. [Praed sits]. You
 both think I have an attack of nerves. Not a bit of it. But there are
 two subjects I want dropped, if you don't mind.
 
 One of them [to Frank] is love's young dream in any shape or form: the
 other [to Praed] is the romance and beauty of life, especially Ostend
 and the gaiety of Brussels. You are welcome to any illusions you may
 have left on these subjects: I have none. If we three are to remain
 friends, I must be treated as a woman of business, permanently single
 [to Frank] and permanently unromantic [to Praed].
 
 FRANK. I also shall remain permanently single until you change your
 mind. Praddy: change the subject. Be eloquent about something else.
 
 PRAED [diffidently] I'm afraid theres nothing else in the world that I
 _can_ talk about. The Gospel of Art is the only one I can preach. I know
 Miss Warren is a great devotee of the Gospel of Getting On; but we
 can't discuss that without hurting your feelings, Frank, since you are
 determined not to get on.
 
 FRANK. Oh, don't mind my feelings. Give me some improving advice by
--**--**--
 with an effort] I hope not. [More emphatically] I hope not, Miss Warren.
 
 FRANK [whistles] Whew!
 
 VIVIE. You are not making it easy for me to tell you, Mr Praed.
 
 PRAED [his chivalry drooping before their conviction] If there is
 anything worse--that is, anything else--are you sure you are right to
 tell us, Miss Warren?
 
 VIVIE. I am sure that if I had the courage I should spend the rest of my
 life in telling everybody--stamping and branding it into them until they
 all felt their part in its abomination as I feel mine. There is nothing
 I despise more than the wicked convention that protects these things
 by forbidding a woman to mention them. And yet I can't tell you. The two
 infamous words that describe what my mother is are ringing in my ears
 and struggling on my tongue; but I can't utter them: the shame of them
 is too horrible for me. [She buries her face in her hands. The two men,
 astonished, stare at one another and then at her. She raises her head
 again desperately and snatches a sheet of paper and a pen]. Here: let me
 draft you a prospectus.
 
 FRANK. Oh, she's mad. Do you hear, Viv? mad. Come! pull yourself
 together.
 
 VIVIE. You shall see. [She writes]. "Paid up capital: not less than
 forty thousand pounds standing in the name of Sir George Crofts,
 Baronet, the chief shareholder. Premises at Brussels, Ostend, Vienna,
 and Budapest. Managing director: Mrs Warren"; and now don't let us forget
 h e r qualifications: the two words. [She writes the words and pushes
 the paper to them]. There! Oh no: don't read it: don't! [She snatches it
 back and tears it to pieces; then seizes her head in her hands and hides
 her face on the table].
--**--**--
 PRAED. What an amazing revelation! I'm extremely disappointed in Crofts:
 I am indeed.
 
 FRANK. I'm not in the least. I feel he's perfectly accounted for at
 last. But what a facer for me, Praddy! I can't marry her now.
 
 PRAED [sternly] Frank! [The two look at one another, Frank unruffled,
 Praed deeply indignant]. Let me tell you, Gardner, that if you desert
 her now you will behave very despicably.
 
 FRANK. Good old Praddy! Ever chivalrous! But you mistake: it's not the
 moral aspect of the case: it's the money aspect. I really can't bring
 myself to touch the old woman's money now.
 
 PRAED. And was that what you were going to marry on?
 
 FRANK. What else? _I_ havn't any money, nor the smallest turn for making
 it. If I married Viv now she would have to support me; and I should cost
 her more than I am worth.
 
 PRAED. But surely a clever bright fellow like you can make something by
 your own brains.
 
 FRANK. Oh yes, a little. [He takes out his money again]. I made all that
 yesterday in an hour and a half. But I made it in a highly speculative
 business. No, dear Praddy: even if Bessie and Georgina marry
 millionaires and the governor dies after cutting them off with a
 shilling, I shall have only four hundred a year. And he won't die until
 he's three score and ten: he hasn't originality enough. I shall be on
 short allowance for the next twenty years. No short allowance for Viv,
 if I can help it. I withdraw gracefully and leave the field to the
 gilded youth of England. So that settled. I shan't worry her about it:
 I'll just send her a little note after we're gone. She'll understand.
 
 PRAED [grasping his hand] Good fellow, Frank! I heartily beg your
--**--**--
 and pretty a sparrow hopping in the roadway--and you saw a steam roller
 coming in your direction, would you wait for it?
 
 MRS WARREN. Oh, don't bother me with your sparrows. What did she run away
 from Haslemere like that for?
 
 FRANK. I'm afraid she'll tell you if you rashly await her return.
 
 MRS WARREN. Do you want me to go away?
 
 FRANK. No: I always want you to stay. But I _advise_ you to go away.
 
 MRS WARREN. What! And never see her again!
 
 FRANK. Precisely.
 
 MRS WARREN [crying again] Praddy: don't let him be cruel to me. [She
 hastily checks her tears and wipes her eyes]. She'll be so angry if she
 sees I've been crying.
 
 FRANK [with a touch of real compassion in his airy tenderness] You know
 that Praddy is the soul of kindness, Mrs Warren. Praddy: what do you
 say? Go or stay?
 
 PRAED [to Mrs Warren] I really should be very sorry to cause you
 unnecessary pain; but I think perhaps you had better not wait. The fact
 is--[Vivie is heard at the inner door].
 
 FRANK. Sh! Too late. She's coming.
 
 MRS WARREN. Don't tell her I was crying. [Vivie comes in. She
 stops gravely on seeing Mrs Warren, who greets her with hysterical
 cheerfulness]. Well, dearie. So here you are at last.
 
 VIVIE. I am glad you have come: I want to speak to you. You said you
 were going, Frank, I think.
 
 FRANK. Yes. Will you come with me, Mrs Warren? What do you say to a
 trip to Richmond, and the theatre in the evening? There is safety in
 Richmond. No steam roller there.
 
 VIVIE. Nonsense, Frank. My mother will stay here.
 
 MRS WARREN [scared] I don't know: perhaps I'd better go. We're disturbing
 you at your work.
 
 VIVIE [with quiet decision] Mr Praed: please take Frank away. Sit down,
--**--**--
 day. I simply sent it back to be placed to your credit, and asked them
 to send you the lodgment receipt. In future I shall support myself.
 
 MRS WARREN [not daring to understand] Wasn't it enough? Why didn't
 you tell me? [With a cunning gleam in her eye] I'll double it: I was
 intending to double it. Only let me know how much you want.
 
 VIVIE. You know very well that that has nothing to do with it. From this
 time I go my own way in my own business and among my own friends. And
 you will go yours. [She rises]. Goodbye.
 
 MRS WARREN [rising, appalled] Goodbye?
 
 VIVIE. Yes: goodbye. Come: don't let us make a useless scene: you
 understand perfectly well. Sir George Crofts has told me the whole
 business.
 
 MRS WARREN [angrily] Silly old--[She swallows an epithet, and then turns
 white at the narrowness of her escape from uttering it].
 
 VIVIE. Just so.
 
 MRS WARREN. He ought to have his tongue cut out. But I thought it was
 ended: you said you didn't mind.
 
 VIVIE [steadfastly] Excuse me: I _do_ mind.
 
 MRS WARREN. But I explained--
 
 VIVIE. You explained how it came about. You did not tell me that it is
 still going on [She sits].
 
 [Mrs Warren, silenced for a moment, looks forlornly at Vivie, who waits,
 secretly hoping that the combat is over. But the cunning expression
 comes back into Mrs Warren's face; and she bends across the table, sly
 and urgent, half whispering.]
 
 MRS WARREN. Vivie: do you know how rich I am?
 
 VIVIE. I have no doubt you are very rich.
 
 MRS WARREN. But you don't know all that that means; youre too young. It
 means a new dress every day; it means theatres and balls every night;
 it means having the pick of all the gentlemen in Europe at your feet;
--**--**--
 that out, like other women, at forty, when you've thrown yourself away
 and lost your chances; or won't you take it in good time now from your
 own mother, that loves you and swears to you that it's truth: gospel
 truth? [Urgently] Vivie: the big people, the clever people, the managing
 people, all know it. They do as I do, and think what I think. I know
 plenty of them. I know them to speak to, to introduce you to, to make
 friends of for you. I don't mean anything wrong: thats what you don't
 understand: your head is full of ignorant ideas about me. What do the
 people that taught you know about life or about people like me? When did
 they ever meet me, or speak to me, or let anyone tell them about me? the
 fools! Would they ever have done anything for you if I hadn't paid them?
 Havn't I told you that I want you to be respectable? Havn't I brought you
 up to be respectable? And how can you keep it up without my money and my
 influence and Lizzie's friends? Can't you see that youre cutting your own
 throat as well as breaking my heart in turning your back on me?
 
 VIVIE. I recognize the Crofts philosophy of life, mother. I heard it all
 from him that day at the Gardners'.
 
 MRS WARREN. You think I want to force that played-out old sot on you! I
 don't, Vivie: on my oath I don't.
 
 VIVIE. It would not matter if you did: you would not succeed. [Mrs
 Warren winces, deeply hurt by the implied indifference towards her
 affectionate intention. Vivie, neither understanding this nor concerning
 herself about it, goes on calmly] Mother: you don't at all know the sort
 of person I am. I don't object to Crofts more than to any other coarsely
--**--**--
 to. I kept myself lonely for you. You've no right to turn on me now and
 refuse to do your duty as a daughter.
 
 VIVIE [jarred and antagonized by the echo of the slums in her mother's
 voice] My duty as a daughter! I thought we should come to that
 presently. Now once for all, mother, you want a daughter and Frank wants
 a wife. I don't want a mother; and I don't want a husband. I have spared
 neither Frank nor myself in sending him about his business. Do you think
 I will spare you?
 
 MRS WARREN [violently] Oh, I know the sort you are: no mercy for
 yourself or anyone else. _I_ know. My experience has done that for me
 anyhow: I can tell the pious, canting, hard, selfish woman when I meet
 her. Well, keep yourself to yourself: _I_ don't want you. But listen to
 this. Do you know what I would do with you if you were a baby again?
 aye, as sure as there's a Heaven above us.
 
 VIVIE. Strangle me, perhaps.
 
 MRS WARREN. No: I'd bring you up to be a real daughter to me, and not
 what you are now, with your pride and your prejudices and the college
 education you stole from me: yes, stole: deny it if you can: what was it
 but stealing? I'd bring you up in my own house, I would.
 
 VIVIE [quietly] In one of your own houses.
 
 MRS WARREN [screaming] Listen to her! listen to how she spits on her
 mother's grey hairs! Oh, may you live to have your own daughter tear and
 trample on you as you have trampled on me. And you will: you will. No
 woman ever had luck with a mother's curse on her.
 
 VIVIE. I wish you wouldn't rant, mother. It only hardens me. Come: I